Authors
Ralph Benner
Number of Reviews
34

Title
Review for Passage to India, A (1984)
     E.M.Forster's A PASAGE TO INDIA attempts to deal with the
ignominious behavior of the English towards their Indian captives by
using a relationship between a sexually repressed Englishwoman -- the
spoiled, unattractive Adela Quested -- and an exceedingly felicitous
Indian doctor named Aziz. On her first trip to India, Quested is eager
to "know" the Indians, whom the English have notoriously, cruelly
snubbed, and quickly befriends Aziz who, in return, extends manners and
amicability by offering to take her sight-seeing, particularly to the
cryptic Marabar Caves. Aziz, however, is not at all aware of Quested's
festering and fateful obsession with sex -- he's oblivious to her
attraction to his tanned, rich-looking skin, his glistening eyes, teeth
and hair (attractions Forster himself had to Indians) -- so when
Quested, alone in the caves, loses control of her heated flashes,
precipitated by the thrusting echoes of his voice, he has no idea of
her fit of hysteria and is rightly perplexed when he's arrested for
rape. The immoral pointer is that the smug English immediately become
satisfied with Aziz's guilt and expected conviction during the trial.
The presumption of transgression -- out of historical prejudice,
superiority and unflagging insensitivity -- is so die-hardly cast that
the uncertainty of the alleged crime is not thought to matter. To make
more contrived what is essentially a simple story, Forster, a highly
regarded travel writer (his THE HILL OF DEVI is considered by some the
basis for INDIA), lays on some touristy Indian mysticism and attempts
to link it to what he regards is a possibly better morality, a fairer
jurisprudence. While it's a subjective read, and told in a genteel
reproving manner (Forster was once a don) to shame the Rajperialists,
it also fails to make connections, not unlike the way the more elevated
D.H. Lawrence novel THE PLUMED SERPENT, which starts out as an
indictment of a Celtic woman's initial prejudicial views of Mexican
culture, gets bogged down and is unable to bond themes.
     D.H. Lawrence once wrote, "A man of strong soul has too much
honour for the other body -- man or woman -- to use it as a means of
masturbation. So he remains neutral, inactive. That is Forster."
Because we now know more about Forster than Lawrence might have, this
description is not altogether true, but it's an apt one for Forster the
writer -- and David Lean as director. On hearing that the rights to A
PASSAGE TO INDIA were finally being offer by holder King's College (in
Cambridge), Lean reported that the first thing he said to the
purchaser, producer John Brabourne (of MURDER ON THE ORIENT EXPRESS)
was, "What did happen in the caves?" Lean is suggesting that the
incident in the caves is unsolved mystery, and it is if you're willing
to believe that Forster was a mannered, prim asexualist who wouldn't
consider self-manipulation. The key to the sequence is Quested's
measured contriteness afterwards, and since we know Aziz didn't
physically violate her, she either got spooked by something in the
caves or masturbated. She may even have had a spontaneous orgasm -- but
would Forster have known about such things? (And had he, wouldn't that
have made him and not Lawrence the first priest of sex?) If Quested had
been terrified by anything other than her own wet panties, would she
have acquiesced to the imperialism? A viewer might ask: Didn't she
really want Aziz? A closet homosexual (who once had W.H. Auden as a
lover) Forster couldn't overtly tackle the agony of hiding the rush and
liberation of sex -- which is why he waited until after his death to
allow publication of MAURICE, about his own first gay loves. He binds
Quested in much the same way: she doesn't know how to respond to what
her own society has told her is forbidden -- her own sexual feelings,
especially any with racial overtones; instead, she allows society to
reflexively respond for her. (This may be the unheralded moral of the
novel -- that silence is as much of a breaker of the 9th Commandment as
overt false trespass.) In Lean's wringy hands, though, the guessing
game continues. He's handled the murkiness in the caves with such god
damn good taste that we don't have any idea what happened; even when
Quested is on the stand testifying, the flashbacks are all repeats --
of insignificance.
     We can not be surprised: Lean de-sexes sexual moments. The bits of
fiery hunger between Rod Steiger and Julie Christie in DOCTOR ZHIVAGO
were not guided by Lean but by Steiger, who, somewhat in the
Stanislavsky mode, instigated real friction between himself and
Christie in order to put an animalism into their scenes. Are we to
believe Peter O'Toole's T.E.  in LAWRENCE OF ARABIA went ravenously
blood hungry after sadist Jose Ferrer violated his privates? (The
incident, written as almost exquisite homoeroticism in SEVEN PILLARS OF
WISDOM, may not have happened; and if it did, the hunger might indeed
have been for what he was supposedly repelled by.) While there's no
lack of comprehension in Sarah Miles' disappointment in Robert
Mitchum's stamina in RYAN'S DAUGHTER, her lust for limping Christopher
Jones got clammy and, finally, preposterous. Our suspicions of the
director's fear of sex have been confirmed on a recent A & E Biography
about Robert Mitchum, in which Miles did a funny capsulation on Lean's
cigarette-puffing discomfort. Sometimes Lean's sexual intent can get
unintentionally funny: When Rossano Brazzi and Katharine Hepburn smooch
in SUMMERTIME and we get the climaxy fireworks, did anybody in the
audience believe for a minute he could really get it up for that bag of
bones? In A PASSAGE TO INDIA, Lean had his best shot at being less than
his usual tastefully panicked self because he didn't have to worry
about censors as he did with LAWRENCE and RYAN'S DAUGHTER. He must have
been thinking quite seriously about the incident in the caves because
he was displeased with those nature provided and required that some be
dynamited. The way the movie is constructed, it appears that what
happened in the caves would become The Rape of the Seven Veils, with
Quested's eventual testimony as flashbacks unveiling each layer until,
if only for the audience, the revelation of no rape at all. But that
doesn't happen; in fact, literally, figuratively, filmicly, absolutely
nothing happens. (Had James Ivory directed, we might have gotten the
autoerotic alternative.) On second thought, Lean isn't so much a
"strong soul" but a weak one afraid of offending those who are still
afraid of masturbation. Admirers of the novel will say that Lean shows
fidelity -- because Quested in the book reveals nothing. But one of
Forster's intrigues, one of his plants, is that he allows a wife and
son to have unexpressed suspicions -- probably the same ones we have.
     It's no accident that Paul Scott's four novels, together known as
"The Raj Quartet," and made into a multi-part TV series under the title
of his first, THE JEWEL IN THE CROWN, are reasonably similar in general
plot structure to A PASSAGE TO INDIA: Scott found Forster's novel to be
a truncated reading experience -- the cruel panoply of India under
British rule downplayed -- and he was determined to write about India
as it really was; therefore, he used his rape much more decisively, in
a more Britishly sadistic way. Scott's right because Forster got so
wrapped up in manners and his travel writing that he ends up almost
exonerating his true rapists and their indifference: few Englishmen
show regret. (In fact, the novelist dares our tolerance by suggesting
that the accuser is "brave" and showed "courage" and at one point
allows her to declare herself "honest.") And the one character in
Forster's novel who could have stopped the farce of Aziz's trial -- the
noble Mrs. Moore -- unaccountably dies without so much as one quiet
showdown with Quested, whom Mrs. Moore suspects is being pressured into
false testimony. Scott refuses to be kind: he blisters the agonistic
British mindset, its stiff self-righteousness and superciliousness.
(Having died of cancer in 1978, Scott never got the chance to see his
quadrilogy turned into one of the tube's more enthralling miniseries.
Boozy maverick Christopher Hitchens, in his PREPARED FOR THE WORST,
does him justice too.)
     As Quested, the Australian Judy Davis is almost a ringer for a
puffy Lee Grant, and she gives her lines a hardened edge that recalls
Glenda Jackson. Unlike Jackson's let-it-bleed toughness, which is often
convincing in a sexual, masochist context, Davis looks consciously held
back: we must take for granted that she's been fearsomely hit by a
tidal wave of carnality. One of India's major actors, Victor Banerjee
as Aziz is just too on the brink of every emotion; he seems to be
enjoying it, but do we? His eager-beaver work is meant to be as
crowd-pleasing as John Mills' idiot in RYAN'S DAUGHTER, yet there's an
anxiety that goes beyond the character: he appears over-willing to be
intimidated. Alec Guinness in bad Indian drag is Lean's idea of comic
relief, though am I the only one to detect Donald Pleasence's villainy
in the voice? As the novel's beloved Mrs. Moore, Dame Peggy Ashcroft's
seasoned grace and amenity are the movie's only warm spots, but
frankly, I think our interest in her -- at the time the movie was
released -- had much more to do with her real acting in THE JEWEL IN
THE CROWN, in which she put on quite a show as Barbie Batchelor. As
Lean directs her, she's not much more than a flighty English version of
our dearly American Martha Scott. (Ashcroft won the Oscar for INDIA,
but it's very likely the Academy members were glued to their TVs during
voting time, when JEWEL was first shown in this country.  And for those
who have seen the series, perhaps they'd agree that of all of Scott's
character summations, the most dissatisfying lack of comeuppance was
regarding Barbie's nemesis, the drunk-bitch Mildred Layton, played to
the imperious hilt by Judy Parfitt, who's a dead-ringer for Bea
Lillie.) It's James Fox as the conscience-of-England Fielding who
manages to make the most of his role. His hair bleached, arms swaying
without affectation, manner imperturbable, this Fielding grows ever
more likable and not only is he the only Englishman to do right by the
Indians, he also does right by Mrs. Moore. It is the film's only
moving, spiritual moment when Aziz, who saw in Mrs. Moore the kindest
of faces, realizes that through Fielding "she lives."
     You can make a successful epic out of mediocre material, but, as
Lean proved with RYAN'S DAUGHTER, you can't if the material is
minimal.  As Scott knew, and as most readers acknowledge, Forster's A
PASSAGE TO INDIA is pretty thin stuff. He wanted it to be a seriocomic
read, and he even provided a silly finale to secure his aim. This is
the kind of novel that has boulders talking to one another, and horses,
the earth, temples, birds and the sky resisting reconciliation. Of
course Forster saw India, its space, mysticism and people as
spectacular. But within the environs and attributes -- one of which was
his prophecy about India's eventual sovereignty -- his is still a very
small story full of "pathos-is-the-highest-quality-in-art" traps,
guesses and empty pauses.  And that's what's clearly wrong with the
movie: Lean is a director who "sees" big, and that's not the same as
thinking in a big, meaningful way.  Small stories, however big the
metaphors in them, get in the way of his visions; there's simply not
enough scale to impersonalize, which has become his real specialty, his
refuge. Forster once said, "Gauguin and Van Gogh were too much for me."
It's likely that he'd say of Lean's inflated nothingness, which exposes
the thinness of INDIA as novel, "There's not enough for me."

Title
Review for JFK (1991)
     In the February 1992 Vanity Fair, no less than Norman Mailer wrote
that despite director Oliver Stone's clumsiness with facts, "The first
thing to be said about JFK is that it is a great movie, and the next is
that it is one of the worst great movies ever made." Leave it to Mailer to
have it both ways, but he's doing nothing that Stone himself is not: JFK
confirms that the Warren Report is bunk; it also has built-in protections
against criticism that Stone's hero, New Orleans district attorney Jim
Garrison, was discredited back in the late 60s when he attempted to prove
a wide conspiracy in John Kennedy's assassination. Clever of Stone to put
those fail-safes into the movie's Garrison. And clever of Mailer to avoid
refuting much of Stone's composite theory. It's been years since I've seen
a movie I consciously fought against seeing -- but ended up loving. Trying
to avoid JFK had nothing to do with what Stone was doing with the
purported facts and the ever-expanding periphery of lies, concoctions,
suppositions; he is, after all, THE movie provocateur of our time and it's
his undisputed right to scorn whatever or whoever he wishes. I hesitated
because I didn't want to see that g.d. Zapruder home movie again, or have
to once again swallow the claims the Warren Commission didn't cover up
what happened. We all feel, no matter what side we take, that whatever the
government not only really knows but also what it doesn't know about
Kennedy's death, it isn't sharing. It's morally unconscionable that an
unelected committee has the authority to deny us files associated with the
assassination and enforce that they be kept from disclosure until 2029 --
when the Kennedy and pre-Kennedy generations will be goners. A simple
question: What are "they" hiding? Considering the torrent of obfuscation,
we the living and -- much worse -- history may never know. (I agree with
Edmund Berkeley's prediction: LBJ, with a little help from J. Edgar,
Dulles, perhaps Nixon, instigated a coup d'etat. And inspite of his
lengthy, detailed "Oswald's Tale: An American Mystery," Mailer himself
concludes that he's only about 75% sure that Oswald did it, and maybe only
60% sure that it did it alone. Not enough for a conviction.) This
inconclusiveness the stuff of conspiracy: the government hasn't any
irrefutable evidence to support the "lone nut with a rifle" theory -- and
Stone's greatest contribution is in destroying, once and for all, Lee
Harvey Oswald's marksmanship: not only do Oswald's own military records
indicate that he was less than average as a shot, but Gerald Ford, the
only living enthusiast-patsy of the Warren Commission, cheerfully embraces
the psychodramaturgy that Oswald was a "failure," "sexually impotent, a
"victim" of his wife's constant berating, all of which suggests an
emotional instability that lessens his chances of being able to fire off,
with trees obstructing his view, three rounds from a cheap 6.5 Italian
Carbine in roughly six seconds. (One round fired in 0.9 of a second after
a previous shot -- an impossibility.) Then there's the "magic" bullet --
the pristine projectile that's the crux of the Warren Report. Ballistics
proved it came from Oswald's rifle, yet in exhaustive tests, it was proved
not to be the bullet that hit John Connally. Neither could ballistics
prove when the bullet was fired nor has anyone explained how it ended up
on a Parkland Hospital stretcher. The commission ignored the ballistics
conclusions. The disturbing multi-part documentary "The Men Who Killed
Kennedy," shown on A & E's "Investigative Reports," produces convincing
eyewitnesses who claim one of the shots that struck the president was
indeed fired from the infamous grassy knoll -- witnesses whose testimony
was omitted from the WR, which also ignored a credible witness who
reported seeing two gunmen aiming from the TBR, and, most discomforting,
accepted an altered autopsy report on Kennedy that's contradictory to what
the Parkland doctors originally claimed. JFK attacks and is an admission
of the fact that we the people have, in the end, zilch power.
     As pure entertainment, JFK is the American movie of its year.
That's its major surprise. Making it inexplicably great is that many of us
still can't figure out how Stone was able to put the jangling disparity
together in such an intensely consumable style. In scene after scene,
we're eating it all up, even when we sense he's gone too far -- especially
with the homosexual and Vietnam angles. He's holding us so rapt that we
get carried along, feeling surges of excitement we haven't felt from movie
viewing in a longer time than we're willing to admit. Of course, if you're
a Warren Report diehard, you'll go crazy; if you're a skeptic, as most
are, submitting to Stone's disputations is rather like reeling from a
pent-up citizenry's vindictive high. The main pleasure is in the acting:
does anyone is this three hour epic give a bad performance? Arguably Joe
Pesci as David Ferry does, if you don't buy into his paranoia. I did: his
performance, like Stone's conspiracy theory, represents a composite of a
tawdry underground; Pesci's style of smoking, eyebrows and hair reek of a
60s effeminacy, yet the internalized fury and craziness are authentic to
the period. (I've met his physical type.) Ed Asner is a square-faced
menace you would think twice about having a drink with; Jack Lemmon does
well his renowned weakling number; Donald Sutherland as -- don't snicker
-- Mr. X is super-riveting as he lists the various possibilities of why
Kennedy got knocked off; Sissy Spacek matches perfectly with megastar
Kevin Costner; John Candy and Kevin Bacon are prime comic relief; and
Tommy Lee Jones, as Clay Shaw/Bertrand, is resurrected as an actor. Even
the real Jim Garrison, looking as if near death (and was), shows up as
Chief Justice Earl Warren.
     Kevin Costner's portrayal of Garrison is not accurate on many
accounts, but Stone's intention is not to depict him as he really was,
because that might have left us with a character not entirely sympathetic.
There was and still is something heroic in Garrison's persistence in
establishing substantial doubt about the excessively wordy Warren Report;
but there was nothing but pity and strange, pathetic ridicule left when in
real life he was denied at every turn his chance to prove his case --
because all of his central witnesses died before the trial. (This irony
supports conspiracy buffs.) Stone sees Costner as a 90s narrator of a
smorgasbord docudrama about alleged facts that have come to light long
after Clay Shaw was acquitted of any links to Kennedy's death. This is the
central reason why Costner's summation runs on and on -- Stone wants to
get every conceivable denunciation he can on the filmic record. With the
exception of BULL DURHAM, in which he was absolutely dead-on, Costner
usually works against himself: he looked like a Playgirl photo op in
SILVERADO; he was puny in and misfitted for NO WAY OUT and THE
UNTOUCHABLES; in DANCES WITH WOLVES his voice-overs wiped out the tanned
romantic illegitimacy of his soldier & Indians fantasy. As executive
producer of REVENGE, he was plucking so hard to save the bomb that he lost
sight of whatever tiny vision of a movie he was making. His voice proves
he's no ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF THEIVES. (A rushed movie, the only things
worth commending are Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio's unexpected
user-friendliness and some top notch action sequences.) Here in JFK,
Costner's vocal limitations are noticeable only in that he's providing a
southern accent as affectation that Garrison didn't have or use. In bad
clothes, pedestrian glasses and with touches of gray in his hair, he's
deglamourized; he's so earnestly bland that while most everyone else
around him leaps with paranoid energy, he gains our respect by his sheer
ordinariness.
     In a speech before the National Press Club in Washington,
televised by C-SPAN, Oliver Stone said of the WR, "Ladies and gentlemen,
this is not history, this is myth. It is myth that a scant number of
American have ever believed. It is a myth that has sustained a generation
of journalists and historians who have refused to examine it, who have
refused to question it, and, above all, who close ranks to criticize and
vilify those who do. Some journalists from the 60s are self-appointed
keepers of the flame. They talk about our history and fight savagely those
who would question it. But confronted with the crime of the century with
no motive and hardly any alleged perpetrators, they stand mute." A few
days after the speech, Andy Rooney, on 60 Minutes, joked that Stone was
this era's Orson Welles looking for his Rosebud. Rooney unwittingly
confirmed Stone's legitimate deploring of our dangerously lazy press: the
Rosebud of JFK may be LBJ. (Perhaps if he lives to be able to complete his
multi-volume biography of Johnson, author Robert A. Caro will corroborate
Stone's contention.) What Stone has really made is his own and much more
horrifying and brutal MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE. Stone's polemic is
counter-myth, a refutist's grand mal that gets carried away with spasms of
conjecture and invective. It's dazzling, work-me-over movie making in the
most flagrant traditions of disreputable press muckraking -- what Ayn
Rand's Ellsworth Toohy might accomplish if he were a frothing liberal let
loose on The Banner. As you watch the movie unfold, and after you leave
the theatre, you think the worst possible thoughts about everybody.
Stone's message is much beyond his multi-layered conspiracy: he's
admonishing all of us for acquiescing to the volumes of prevarication. JFK
makes us feel used, abused and powerless. This combo is the movie's
clarion call.

Title
Review for Last Temptation of Christ, The (1988)
     Martin Scorsese had for years wanted to make a movie of Nikos
Kazantzakis's novel THE LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST. Even if he seemed an
odd choice to do it, because his movies seem so explosively modern and
contentious (MEAN STREETS, TAXI DRIVER, RAGING BULL), when we got to
know him, through watching his movies, most of them tinged with
Catholicism and alienation, and listening to or reading about him, we
knew he was more than up for the at best dubious challenge: He's just
the right kind of intense, anguished Catholic, completely enveloped by
the mysticism of his religion, to give us a fresh perspective on Christ
as a man. I hope I can say this with support from other recovering
Catholics: I also loved the majesty of the Church -- its physical
grandeur and harmonious theme (that we as people must forgive ourselves
before we can expect to be forgiven by a God, at least that's how I've
always viewed the main tenet of Christianity throughout my Catholic
education) -- and as a teenage moviegoer, I too was overwhelmed by
movies like THE GREATEST STORY EVER TOLD. The image of Christ was story
book perfect -- the epitome of ethereal iconolatry. But when reaching
adulthood, and trying to make sense of what I now see as legend, my
view of Christ got tarnished: He was no longer Max von Sydow. Scorsese
succinctly puts it this way about what he wouldn't do: "I didn't want a
Christ who glowed in the dark."
     Chief among the reasons religion is appealing to many is that
there is no answer to the earthly finality of death, so therefore we
hope there is something more, something beyond death, a God or supreme
power with an eternity of answers. It is a matter of faith, yet maybe
more realistically a matter of comfort. (Or, as C.S. Lewis might
suggest, a way to avoid the fear of death as nothingness.) But out of
this beautiful simplicity comes the various roads to God, each so
detoured by hidden mines of biased interpretation and dictatorship that
poor put-upon Madalyn Murray-O'Hair is right -- religion has caused
mankind more misery and death than any other single idea in history.
(It certainly would be hard to argue that the idea has brought us
everlasting peace and love -- its primary goals.) The lasting power of
the God myth to believers isn't that they've seemingly resolved death,
it's in accepting otherworld perfection -- something we can't really
relate to or achieve, something we can only be in awe of through
imagination. Realism, then, becomes the enemy. While it's hard to
comprehend all the arguments being made against Scorsese's film, the
easiest to understand is that fundamentalist Christians vehemently
reject as blasphemy the notion that a God, in this case a God's "son"
named Christ, can be viewed as a human being and therefore subject to
all human temptations. At the very core of Scorsese's belief is that
his God sent his own son as a man of human flesh and blood and possible
moral weakness precisely so that we could relate to him, and it's an
admirable, if not altogether impossible position to take, because soon
after it's unveiled, up pop so many contradictions and inconsistencies
that, while we sure as hell aren't getting "a glow in the dark" Christ,
we start hoping for one. Scorsese's naturalism exposes how rigged the
religious game is.
     In the 8/21/88 issue of the Los Angeles Times entertainment
tabloid Calender, Lawrence Christon (honest, that's his name) wrote,
"The protesters represent a much larger group of the alienated and
disaffected, whose spiritual hunger has never been truly satiated. In
THE LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST they see not only the deadly literalness
of the reified image that displaces the spiritual imagination, but they
also sense that this one last apprehension of divine purity, this
single incorruptible ideal that they've held against the manifold
pollutions of the modern world, has been taken away from them and used
up by the movie." To paraphrase Blanche in A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE,
they don't want realism, they want magic. Perhaps this explains why
George Stevens' THE GREATEST STORY EVER TOLD was far less successful
with critics than with the alienated and disaffected. When Stevens made
his epic, his goal was to fuse reverence with skepticism by using
nature as the bond; the huge panoramas of his colored Ansel Adams-like
locales were used to enhance the basic belief that there had to be
something that or someone who created it all. Stevens also knew that to
succeed he had to re-define the sepulchral trap that often befalls the
actor playing Christ, performing as the "receptacle of sacred relics."
Max von Sydow is the very essence of Michelangelo or Raphael, and his
screen persona seems otherworldly.  Nevertheless, he managed to get all
the epigrams and platitudes to resonate with stunning clarity of
meaning. The big Cinerama screen helped as well -- the magic had
magnified power. (Some of us still remember, in the original roadshow
version of the movie before United Artist unmercifully cut it, the
"dropping" of the thirty pieces of coin on the soundtrack during
Judas's betrayal.) More significantly, there is no "real thing" about
Von Sydow to trouble us, even if right now most of us claim to only
want reality. Von Sydow's as far from real as Charlton Heston is as
Moses -- we feel safe, secure in the knowledge that Stevens isn't going
to explode possible falsehoods.
     But it is the "real" in Christ that Scorsese as artist and
troubled Catholic searched for in THE LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST, and it
would have been hypocritical of him to make a movie that supported the
other kind of view. That in the end he concluded that there was
resistance to temptation and that he actually deviated little from
mythology says this about Scorsese: he's deeply respectful. And
certainly far more than the dummmy-headed protestors who never bothered
to see the movie they feigned distress over. (Sound familiar? Rather
like Dole screaming about violence in movies he's never seen while
avoiding condemnation of the violence in movies made by Arnold and
Bruce, who support his drearidacy.) Yet in weighing his sincere
intentions with what's on the screen, the movie, very much like the
novel, is a failure. There's naturalism to a degree: the movie has the
most realistic look yet at what Judea might have been like, and the
spikes being hammered into Christ's flesh are terrifyingly big, and we
get Christ questioning and fearful of his father's plans -- but there's
no spell. The center is severely crippled by Willem Defoe as Jesus.
Unfair as it is, too many of us spend our time looking at the spaces
between his teeth, and it is exactly that kind of visual handicap we
don't need to deal with. If an actor playing the most discussed and
mythicized figure of western civilization attempts to play him as an
emotional, mental maelstrom, it has to be a performance ripped from
within the character he's portraying, without the burden of
distractions. After all, it is this daring conception that is the very
heart of the novel and what Scorsese aimed for. How can we become
involved with the interpretation when the actor's defects overshadow
it? Defoe is also torn in another direction -- he's less the novel's
Christ than he is Scorsese as Christ. (De Niro's least satisfying work
in his movies with Scorsese comes when he too plays Scorsese instead of
his characters.) Most of the yahoo fundamentalists who see the movie
will not notice the substitution, but for the movie lovers out there,
the resemblance of Defoe's urban intensity, his wiry nervousness, his
manic jabberishness to Scorsese's is unquestionable, and so the element
of the natural Scorsese wants and we want for him gets lost. The result
is that not only does Kazantzakis's Christ get usurped, so does Christ
himself.
     I found myself surprised by some commendable things in the movie:
Harvey Keitel's Judas is a man already out to kill Jesus and after he
discovers the beauty behind the Christian message, he is torn between
love and betrayal; both could be divinely-inspired duty. To see this
view of him realized without apology is -- I can't resist it --
miraculous.  Watching Christ dancing, drinking, contemplating
fornication with Mary Magdalene will be labeled as blasphemy by the
blankhead religious but how could Christ resist temptation without
first recognizing what it is? If Christ has foreknowledge that he'll
succeed in resisting, what is the lesson for imperfect man? It's brave
that the cannibalistic aspect of Catholicism gets its sickie due --
that we see wine turned into blood.  (This ritual is as repulsive as it
is infantile.) The dream sequence, wherein Christ contemplates
temptation, is a mistake in conception: not only too long but
unconvincing; you can hardly wait till Christ rejects what Lucifer
offers. Sex and children barely make it as lures into the lair of the
devil. They're integral, are they not, to a God's master plan?  (It was
St. Boniface who said, "Man's road to God always begins with a sexual
act." That's why I reject the Virgin Birth and priest celibacy -- they
undermine the strength of the family. Think about how the Church
glorifies men, represses women, demands the faithful to accept the
dictums of supposed celibates -- one of whom claims inhuman
infallibility. How can so exclusive a fraternity pretend to be an
advocate of "the family" when so much of what it celebrates undermines
the family's strength?) Though Scorsese's temptations are all subduedly
played out, you find yourself wishing for a few De Mille orgies as an
entertainment reprieve. Peter Gabriel's music comes on with such
African-Brazilian roots that I wondered if it weren't lifted from some
of Sergio Mendes's less commercial recordings, like "Primal Roots."
Still, it's potent stuff, and heavily so during the slow-motion walk
Christ endures at the beginning of his crucifixion. With Jews smiling
and laughing and mocking him from behind, it's likely to be recognized
as the movie's most memorable, if not controversial moment. Adding to
the power of this scene are two women on either side of Christ, in the
foreground. Their faces are exaggeratedly compelling and repulsive --
you want to slap them out of sight.
     Putting aside one's admiration of Scorsese's courage to make
TEMPTATION, it's an an oddly indifferent movie made by a man so
committed to his religious spirituality: the story has neither a
mythological nor intellectual hold of us. Hard as Scorsese tries, he
can't unleash the power of the myth; the defiantly implausible material
acts as its own gainsayer. Inevitable it is: when you dance with
religious myth, you end up with blisters filled with contradiction. No
matter how you finagle the material, you get trapped by its
preposterousness, not too unlike how creation scientists get trapped by
their blatant dismissal of not the theory but fact of evolution. The
best you can do is avoid disgracing yourself, which as novelist
Kazantzakis and as movie maker Scorsese managed to do. THE LAST
TEMPTATION OF CHRIST is Scorsese being true to himself; he's been
tortured for what to viewers seems like aeons by befuddled beliefs and
remains so. And he can not be accused of being a blasphemer or a
hypocrite to his masochistic pleasures. His tango, however, is over:
Realism has no function in religion.

Title
Review for Network (1976)
        Nothing written by Pauline Kael during her reign as America's
bitch supreme is more embarrassingly lacking of her usual perception and
foresight than her review of 1976's NETWORK entitled "Hot Air," which can
be found in her collections "When the Lights Go Down" and "For Keeps." The
expected salient observations are made: that the movie has a crummy,
hurried-up look, that the late Paddy Chayefsky's prophetic screenplay is
scatterbrained, and that William Holden's a marvellous camera subject once
he decided that he didn't need movie goddess tricks to cover up his age.
(Panicky Warren Beatty should follow suit.) You can't fault personal taste
either: if a movie doesn't appeal to her, it just doesn't appeal. However,
as readers of her criticism are well aware, Kael never let simplicity get
in the way of her "crow bar" examinations. "Hot Air" is an excoriation of
Chayefsky's supposed case of the N.Y. hates, with the boob tube used as
his central metaphor. As you read the first paragraph of this lengthie,
your radar is swirling: My God, how can she miss what's so obvious? She
discerns the author's rant on television, then blows it by using his
hatred-warning against him. Crashing blindly into her own rhetoric, she
berates, "Television, he says, is turning us into morons and humanoids."
Not buying what has come to fruition, she asks, thousands of words later,
what is inherently answered in her question: when Howard Beale tells
viewers to scream, "I'm mad as hell and I'm not going to take this any
longer," she reduns: "Is the viewers' obedience proof of their sheeplike
response to TV or is it evidence that the Prophet has struck a nerve -
that the public is as fed up as he is?" Kael somehow missed that it's
both. She commits her own coup de grace when foaming about this:
"Chayefsky, it seems, can be indignant about people becoming humanoids,
and then turn a somersault and say it's inevitable and only a fool
wouldn't recognize that. And he's wrong on both counts. There are a lot of
changes in the society that can be laid at television's door, but
soullessness isn't one of them. TV may have altered family life and social
intercourse; it may have turned children at school into entertainment
seekers. But it hasn't taken our souls, any more than movies did, or the
theatre and novels before them." Attacking Chayefsky for exactly what
television has done -- for being the very instrument that has robbed us of
our collective soul. Movies, theatre and books rarely alter a nation's
psyche because they require discrimination of purchase and effort in
assimilating. If not the omnipresent box, what then could have mugged us?
Corrupt politics? Pervasive amorality and violence? The contemptible
phoniness and hate of God squads? Not without the power of television.
Years ago, in "Movies on Television," the second article she penned for
The New Yorker before becoming one of its critics, Kael enunciated the
stunningly false principle that all we get from the box is television. The
piece a failure for the same reason "Hot Air" is -- her love of movies
(and books, jazz, classical music and theatre in descending order) had,
for too long, prevented her from acknowledging what so many recognized
even before NETWORK: that television is IT. You can't reject or fight TV's
promiscuous invasiveness by denying its power, which is in devouring all.
It's the black hole of Earth -- nothing escapes. The sad fact is, we've
all become little Dianas. Only our hots aren't generated by ratings, like
Diana's, but by trash, scandal and hate. Psycho Dan Rather wrote years ago
that "the camera never lies." In spite of wanting to believe the truism as
safeguard against ever lowering thresholds of standards, today we ask:
does the camera ever tell the truth?

Title
Review for Wolf (1994)
     The most visually striking sequence to grace a Mike Nichols movie
thus far is the opening one for WOLF. A wink to THE SHINING, Jack
Nicholson is driving his car through snowy mountainous terrain; the
long shots are tenebrous, a little Germanic and foreboding -- a setting
as Xmas card from Lon Chaney, Jr. It's so moody and enveloping, and
augmented by (finally!) some real movie music by Ennio Morricone, that,
based on his other pictures, you wonder if Nichols had anything to do
with it. The zoom & swirl of Haskell Wexler's work in WHO'S AFRAID OF
VIRGINIA WOOLF? the one exception, Nichols' movies are
functional-looking -- just enough of whatever it takes to make them
pass as movies. That's why some of us dread going to a Nichols movie;
we're paying to see what is basically TV monitor. And WOLF
unfortunately becomes television too -- the office sets, Michelle
Pfeiffer's guest house digs and the conclusion make you cringe from
their lack of appeal and ingenuity. However, because of the opening,
and because Nicholson's darting eyes and brows are being utilized most
fittingly, WOLF maintains a hold.
     The little boy-caught-withkie-jar kind of acting that Nicholson
relies on has a limited charm; when the part can soak up his
"immaturity," like in THE WITCHES OF EASTWICK, he's disarming -- he
makes us smile when we know he hasn't earned it. We give in because
he's our idea of a capricious satyr. He can also be damned awful when
he tips the degenerate scales: his whacked out Johnny Carson stuff in
THE SHINING is memorable precisely because he lost control. (In his
defense, he gave the material what it deserved; Kubrick, though, tried
to layer it as an intellectostrata it couldn't support.) In WOLF, as
one, he's got carte blanche built in to literally chew things up but,
minus the last thirty minutes, he reins himself in; for the first hour
or so, his metamorphosis is comicly subtle and engaging: this actor's
born to sniff out the scent of booze and sex, to use his mouth to undo
the clothing of his mate, to growl. It seems natural for Nicholson to
have his carnal senses intensified -- and appreciated: says his wife
(Kate Nelligan) on the answering machine, "You animal." Though the
credits don't acknowledge Chaney's THE WOLF MAN, scripters Jim Harrison
and Wesley Strick update it in a way that perhaps unconsciously borrows
from Diane Keaton's BABY BOOM.  In that one Keaton's a high priestess
in Executiveland who gets the temporary shaft in a conspiracy led by
(if memory serves) James Spader.  Spader indeed plays conspirator in
WOLF, conniving to take over Nicholson's senior editor position when
money bags Christopher Plummer buys out the publishing firm. And, like
Keaton, Nicholson seeks revenge.  He warns Spader, "I'm going to get
you," and there's no doubt that he will. It's a pleasure to watch
Nicholson plotting this way -- he's using his innate likability, his
common sense, his rarely used gift of calm -- and even more pleasurable
is that he's not loaded down with obscenities.  The regret is that
Nichols and the writers decided to forego Nicholson's "normal state"
and opt for a goofy climax and final that betray him, and Michelle
Pfeiffer too. You really want him back in the office, snarling at
management to protect his stable of writers. At least between full
moons.
     With the kind of talent gathered here to make junk food from the
recipe of a horror classic, audiences have the right to believe the
chefs would bring something new to the dish. What's the point of a
remake if they don't? WOLF doesn't add much to mix except two super
stars.  Maybe Nichols, who isn't the top choice for a project like
this, thought Nicholson and Pfeiffer would be enough; bordering on the
offensive is that he relied on them to gloss over what he, out of
laziness, didn't make clever. When the climax comes about, we're
stupefied by Pfeiffer's utterances: she's covering up the series of
events that don't need to be covered up. All the pieces fall into place
and yet we're asked to accept that the cops will continue to hunt down
the innocent. The writers dismiss the canine blood and the amulet --
the former sufficient evidence against the killer, the latter a
sufficient controller of behavior. The climax and ending cheat us out
of the sophisticated wrap we all deserve: it's a criminal waste to have
stars of this magnitude in this day and age surrendering to the call of
the wild. My idea of the perfect ending for WOLF: Nicholson and
Pfeiffer get hitched, and at the reception, Pfeiffer's daddy Plummer
bestows his generosity: "I've got my jet ready to take you on the
honeymoon of your dreams." The next shot: the beauty & the beast arrive
at a resort called Chaney's. The closing shot: Jack puts an amulet
around Michelle's neck and, flashing his incorrigible, wicked smile,
says, "You're gonna need this."

Title
Review for Braveheart (1995)
     You gotta give to Mel Gibson what he deserves -- a movie Hall of
Shame award for having his publicity machine spend $25 million dollars to
buy ten Oscar nominations (including best makeup!) for a movie that,
thrice at the box office gate, only collected a domestic total of
something around $70 million, the same amount he spent to make his
blooded-up poem of an epic, one that's progressively more gruesome and
childish to sit through as the minutes turn into almost three hours.
BRAVEHEART, about Sir William Wallace, the 13th Century Scottish renegade
lionized as the heroic impetus for Scotland's freedom from England's
tyranny, looks like it was no picnic to make, and, for all but his beer
guzzling, blood thirsty compadres, it's not a whole lot of fun to watch.
It's a militia instructional manual -- directed by Rambo of Scots. 
     As with Spain's Rodrigo Diaz de Vivar, about whom little is known
except legend born out of the anonymously written "Cantar de mio Cid,"
Wallace's place in Scottish history is dependent upon a poem written by
Scotsman Henry the Minstrel some two hundred years after Wallace's death.
Historians are in agreement that the author lacks the foundation to build
but a mythical monument, yet, witness the examples, a lack of fact has
never stopped a nation from veneration. History accepts, however, that
Wallace was the driving force behind Scotland's revolt against the
English, and the following accounts in BRAVEHEART are factual occurrences:
that Wallace defeated the British at Stirling Bridge and sacked Edward I's
northern-most outposts; that Wallace was defeated at Falkirk; and that,
after exiling to France for an unknown period, Wallace returned, was
captured by Sir John de Menteith, was tried, convicted and executed.
Everything else in the movie, except for the presence of the English king
and his gay son Edward II, is fictional filler. 
     The movie's structure has SPARTACUS branded all over it,
especially the presentation of the armies and their anxious biding before
combat. On more than one occasion we're reminded of Kirk Douglas, only
here Wallace has been updated to Sylvester Stallone: when shouting from
atop his horse, Gibson (unintentionally) sounds like him, packing the same
fake, butch frenzy. I think this is where the movie gets into trouble:
borrowing his hair from the prairie rat in THE ROAD WARRIOR and his war
paint from RAMBO, something phooey is being dispatched -- a village
people's "Macho Man" gung ho that displaces the Rodrigo chivalry. If some
of us can't suspend disbelief long enough to get passed his poor
Scotsspeak, or get passed the fact that's he's too contemporary a famous
figure to become history, I can't accept that it's our fault: a more
discriminating director would have scaled back the cheap plugs and steals
and enfantilism (sic). And is there any other box office idol more in love
with his own bare ass? Is his eager display a pitch for the virtues of
sodomy? Or a way to avoid the fact that he's boxed himself in, hoping we
don't recognize that he's not exercising enough as an actor? That he's
vegging in his second childhood? There's a rigged effort to deemphasize
Gibson's comely appeal in BRAVEHEART while at the same time baiting us --
Quick, find me in that chorus line of frontal nudity. His famous
flirtatious "on the couch" charm hasn't much of a place on the hills of
Scotland, yet the bloody and painted face is a new criterion for barbarous
sensuality -- he's a visual primer for a Stallone course about T.E.
Lawrence as warrior of darkness. It's repulsive, but considering the
current hunger for carnage, some will get their kicks. It's what those
Oscar noms represent.
     Rod Lurie blurbs that BRAVEHEART is "one of the best films I've
ever seen...the most sumptuous and involving historical epic since David
Lean's LAWRENCE OF ARABIA." What total bull shit. Photographed by John
Troll, BRAVEHEART has an Argus-eyed ambiance, with the same overcast
picturesqueness as ROB ROY. (Consider ourselves fortunate that neither is
as cloudy, misty, hazy as THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS or 1492: CONQUEST OF
PARADISE. Only the meteorologists earned their pay on those foggers.)
Raves about the battle scenes too -- "Some of the most vivid ever
filmed...The most spectacular battle scenes ever." Vivid they're not and
what's spectacular about them is the breakneck speed of the editing.
During the Stirling Bridge battle, the images warp by us so fast that
they're almost blurry and we're watching in busy fashion, hoping to catch
at least half of what's going on. The plunges, stabbings, chops, slices
and decapitations whiz by in both this sequence and at Falkirk, so we're
spared spurts of blood and splatterings of innards. Yet we're removed from
the suffering; we just sit there viewing the aftermath, wonder more about
what hell the horses might have gone through. (According to NBC's
Dateline, not much.) Gibson standing in the middle of the dead and
half-living is meant to cause grief and revulsion, like Kenneth Branagh's
slow-motion staging walloped us in HENRY V. Yet Branagh's futility of war
isn't Gibson's Spartacus-like call for freedom at any price; becoming
selective about emotions, Gibson posits that body counts (and torture)
equal heroism.  
     Lifting the "let my people go" from SPARTACUS, appropriating the
gallantry of EL CID and, given the repeated treacheries, foisting itself
off partly as a sort of darkened, humorless LION IN WINTER, Randall
Wallace's script concocts scenarios more fitting a rigger than legendary
liberator: the ladies are eager to disrobe, a ghostly wife relieves the
pain of martyrdom, an unwilling Judas becomes Braveheart's champion.
Wallace manages to work in "fock," the original Scottish spelling and
pronunciation of that more famous four letter expletive. One problem:
though the Scots were probably the first to use the slang pejoratively, it
wasn't in use until the 15th Century. Another problem: GLAADers are up in
armed purses again over Gibson's homophobia, this time protesting
BRAVEHEART because of the treatment of Edward I's son Edward II. They're
onto something still unexpressed: Gibson, so quick to flaunt his pretty
little ass on the big screen, has stereotypic views on gays -- he's the
kind of Roman Catholic who notices not the priests ogling the alter boys
but only the flaming hairdressers -- and he's brought his prejudices to
Eddie 2, who, played by an actor who could be Rachel Ward's brother, is a
swish weakling. But would Edward II have betrayed his arranged-for bride
(Sophie Marceau, wearing a headdress that, under the crown, looks like
white cerebra) at the very point of taking wedding vows? In front of his
father? Patently foolish, this corrupt character establishment is for the
unsophisticated Oscar voter; its message is that even royal homos, of whom
history knows many, are contemptible lowlifes. (Quite a few, including
Alexander the Great and Richard the Lionheart, were anything but.)
GLAADers are also upset that junior's lover gets it, but, breaching my
libertarianism, I found the lover's exit the movie's one amusing and
best-directed interior shot. Additionally, and very clumsily, director
Gibson gets swept away by masochistic intent over content: the Christ-like
torture sequence has the obligatory Inquisitional flavor -- complete with
its own combo of Basil Rathbone and Vincent Price -- but the crowd's
reactions are mood alteringly inappropriate; there are too many "Look, Ma,
I'm in this here movie" grins. Yet such errors earn Best Film Editing
nominations.
     Gibson is WYSIWYG, seemingly so uncomplicated that, until now,
it's been just about impossible not to like him. We've overlooked his lack
of finesse, his apparently convenient lack of tolerance about what the
real world is made up of, because once he flashes that smile, or locks
onto us with those eyes, we're wasted: we all become Sigourney Weaver's
Jill in THE YEAR OF LIVING DANGEROUSLY. Even his Pizzahead in THE MAN
WITHOUT A FACE disarms. Gibson's directorial debut, FACE is a much better
directed movie than BRAVEHEART. A proud dad of (is it?) six, he knows the
wandering adventures, use of forbidden language, insensitivities, the
instant querulous eruptions of kids. As director, he appears to know the
ill-effects of falsifying otherwise innocent situations: if FACE has the
depressing moralistic posturing of Diane Keaton's THE GOOD MOTHER -- that
sometimes truth isn't enough to open the minds of Philistines -- it's also
a reminder that children are used to shield adults from the fear of truth.
(In America, we're more afraid of what is true than the Judeo-Christian
belief of damnation for breaking the 9th Commandment.) The way Gibson
handles the subject matter that inevitably springs up is evidence of
sensitivity to society's punishing hypocrisies; it confirms he's got a
golden heart. What angers many of us about Gibson's choices of movies is
that he so frequently retreats from humanity. As if he's afraid of losing
his kinship with his fellow prankster buddies in the audience. No longer a
theory, Gibson's popularity among men isn't based on his comic lunacy and
sport -- these are his least worthy attributes -- but on tantalizing
solicitation, something resembling a subliminal communal desideratum.
While the growing numbers of sexually insecure American men would balk
with faked hostility at the suggestion, how else do they explain male
movie makers exploiting his Nautilized gluteus maximus? Strictly for the
distaffers? Demographics are well known: the majority of those seeing the
LETHAL WEAPON pukers, and most especially in repeats, are blue collar
swains, so whose secret reveries are being teasingly fed?  Gibson elicits
these feelings, he knows it, and his public denials are disguised conceit.
He told Larry King that he'd like to return to Shakespeare, perhaps on
stage, and play Iago in "Othello." With his penchant for making villainous
mock out of inverts, what would he do to the Bard's murderous coxcomb?
Many of us want to believe some of Gibson's material is method towards
aesthetics. That the highs -- from THE ROAD WARRIOR to LIVING DANGEROUSLY
to MRS. SOFFEL to HAMLET to WITHOUT A FACE to looking more stunning in
kilt on Jay Leno than any Scot I've ever seen -- are indications that a
doctrine of artistry is being strived for. But then the money making
juvenilia -- lows that have eventually done in every other superstar.
(Just ask Burt Reynolds.) And, apparently, Gibson's agreeable to stumping
so low as to purchase a flock of undeserving awards nominations. Like it
did with Shirley MacLaine for TERMS OF ENDURANCE and Clint Eastwood for
UNFORGIVEN, Hollywood may decide to honor Gibson with awards he doesn't
artistically earn just to shut him up. The 1995 Oscar nominations recall
those of 1988. Foofs blame the FISH CALLED WANDA voting block for the foul
smell winners generated that year. Some insiders think THE POSTMAN has the
surging dark horse gallop to surpass the competition. Others think APOLLO
13 will be Opie's lucky number. If not, then 1995 will have the smell of
BRAVEFART.

Title
Review for Philadelphia (1993)
     Imagine what Jonathan Demme's PHILADELPHIA would be like without
Denzel Washington as the homophobic lawyer. As it is, this first major
Hollywood movie about AIDS is play-it-safe, respectfully detached,
sometimes melodramatic and occasionally false. Without Denzel, it would
have been impossibly dreary, stacked, banal. It comes very close to being
these things anyway, but as the business card-pushing, TV pitching lawyer,
Denzel is the high octane fuel that keeps Demme's motor running. Once Tom
Hanks -- as the highly promising lawyer who is fired by his firm for
alleged incompetence but much more likely because he has AIDS -- asks
Denzel to take the case and refuses, we're in full view of Denzel's
bigotry against gays. There's nothing that he says about or how he
responds to homosexuals that provide comfort to anyone except uneducated
haters. In the movie's pivotal plot-turning sequence, at a public library
where Hanks is researching HIV-related discrimination, Denzel happens by
chance to also be there and he watches -- hiding behind his own pile of
material -- as Hanks, suffering from the outer manifestations of AIDS, is
being pressured by a librarian to move out of the general reading area and
into a smaller, more private spot. We can see both embarrassment and a
whole history's worth of discrimination in Denzel's face, which is puffed
out with an unchewed turnover of some kind. His reluctance to help Hanks
dissipates as he recognizes that there is, in spite of his bias against
gays, an analogy between what Hanks is experiencing and what his own race
has and still is going through. This kinship is never discussed, but we
can sense how troubling it is for Denzel to accept. As the case proceeds
through court, he says to Hanks that his anti-gay feelings are derived
from what most of us in the audience know are often exaggerated
stereotypes: that gays are people who wear their mothers' clothing; gays
are the kind of people who won't fight; are the kind who go after
children; are always wanting to get "in your pants." In what is the
picture's most moving sequence, Denzel watches a wasting away Hanks "live"
out a Maria Callas aria -- "La mama morta" from Giordano's "Andrea
Chenier" -- and sees that his fear of gays (and, of course, his FRAIDS) is
the result of deliberate ignorance. What is startling is that, once Denzel
realizes the extent to which Hanks -- and by extension so many other gays
--- have been hiding their sexual orientation as a means of preservation,
only to see their privacy being used against them, he charges into the
bigoted defendants with bold abandon, challenging them on their own
sexuality, hurling raw (even a few fresh) epithets. He zeroes in on what
isn't the actual legal but voyeuristic case: what Hanks, or any gay, does
in the bedroom. Denzel's lawyer starts at the beginning of PHILADELPHIA as
a shyster; by end, he becomes the Black Knight he never knew he was. Had a
younger Sidney Poitier performed the part, it would have been hokier than
it is and, much worse, condescending, gaggy. The kind of work Denzel
Washington does here, and has done in the first half of CRY FREEDOM, and
in GLORY and MALCOLM X surpasses anything done by Poitier and rivals
Morgan Freeman. And, I think, bests him: Freeman isn't loose enough in
front of the camera to work us up emotionally, and without that ability,
he's an expert at technique; his icy tightness keeps him from being the
inclusive movie actor Washington isn't afraid to be. 
     Movie politics being what they are dictated Tom Hanks would get
the best actor Oscar that Washington should have been nominated for. In
the William Hurt-KISS OF THE SPIDER WOMAN vein, Hanks gets accolades
because, as a straight, he plays a role so many others would run away
from. With the exception of the marvellous makeup effects, Hanks isn't
doing much as an actor that would distinguish him. His most taxing
moments, while in the courtroom, tend to tax us as well -- we're waiting
rather impatiently for him to get to his transitional point; his halts and
self-recognizing bits of physical agony are taking tolls on all of us
because he's getting to them inappropriately. This isn't meant to be as
cold-hearted as it sounds; Hanks simply isn't playing the strings of the
violin as means by which the character unfolds, but as a means to sustain
our sympathies. One could debate the timing of Hanks' deterioration: I
don't think it belongs in the courtroom, as it belabors with MADAME X
dramatics what is already a foregone conclusion. (The jury foreman
capsulizes the case perfectly.) The cushion of safety around Hanks isn't
reassuring, it's artifice -- paralleling Harold Brodkey's in The New
Yorker -- and gay groups protesting the movie for a variety of reasons are
right to point out that Hanks avoids his character's preference. There's a
clad-in-Navy suits dance, and a kiss of a yellowish hand, and clumsy
inferences of gay promiscuity, but it's as if the ghost of William
Friedkin's CRUISING and the religious fundamentalists were acting as newly
revised Hayes hounds. Hanks has two splendid, heartbreaking moments that
grab and shake us: his battle to control, outside Denzel's office, the
swelling of the pain of yet another rejection in his quest for justice,
and, at the conclusion of the aria by Callas, when the red on the screen
returns to normal light, he has the brief, tragic handsome maturity that
sometimes comes at certain stages of terminal illness. (Rock Hudson, Brad
Davis and Ray Sharkey also showed this.)  
     PHILADELPHIA, of course, isn't the first film about AIDS. There
was, initially, the cable production of the play AS IS, starring Robert
Carradine and Jonathan Hadary. Next came Aidan Quinn, Ben Gazzara and Gena
Rowlands in  the double-barrelled AN EARLY FROST. American soaps have
tackled it, too: "All My Children," "The Young and the Restless," "Days of
Our Lives," and though not directly about AIDS, "One Life to Live" dealt
with hatred of gays a season or two ago with writing worthy of but was
denied Humanitas recognition. Judith Light and Lucas Haas did THE RYAN
WHITE STORY. And there's LONGTIME CAMPION, and Julie Andrews and
Ann-Margret did a mothers' perspective on their sons' illness in a TV
special.. Then HBO brought us AND THE BAND PLAYED ON, the all-star version
of Randy Shilts's best seller about scapegoating that I've thus far
successfully managed to avoid. I did catch ROOMATES, which provided Randy
Quaid with a powerful, horribly scary moment of absolute fear (when
there's a knock at the door and he drops the towels). And I caught USA's A
MOTHER'S PRAYER with Linda Hamilton really pushing it. It's probably true
that Demme wouldn't have been able to make PHILADELPHIA as a mainstreamer
had he included scenes that showed homosexual coupling, yet isn't it
hypocritical of him to shy away from the very realities requesting our
tolerance after getting audiences to cheer on a cannibal? Leaving the
theatre, I heard a woman remark to another, "Lawyers  -- they're all scum,
aren't they?" That may be the more honest reaction to Demme's soft-headed
proselytizing. The script is chock full of holes, but the one question I'd
like answered is about the casting of Joanne Woodward's husband: Is he
meant to be a liberal Marlin Fitzwater? 

Title
Review for City of Joy (1992)
     Dominique Lapierre's THE CITY OF JOY is a dense nonfiction (with
blessedly short chapters) that has the momentum of a novel written as a
collection of portraits of unimaginably joyous survivors of the worst
slums in all of India and probably the world -- those of Calcutta.
Starting out as a depressing travelogue, we quickly come to feel we're
going to know the city more than we might really want -- and come very
dangerously close to reeling in indigenous epigrams and platitudes: "Coal
doesn't change its color when you wash it. What can't be cured must be
endured"; "My memory is like camphor. It evaporates with time"; "Fishes
can't afford to live on bad terms with the crocodiles in the pool." By the
fifth chapter, Lapierre settles down and digs into Calcutta -- "a mirage
city to which in the course of one generation six million starving people
had come in the hope of feeding their families...(a) metropolis situated
at the heart of one of the world's richest yet at the same time most
ill-fated regions, an area of failing or devastating monsoons causing
either drought or biblical floods. This is an area of cyclones and
apocalyptic earthquakes, an area of political exoduses and religious wars
such as no other country's climate or history has perhaps ever
engendered...(one) earthquake in 1937 caused hundreds of thousands of
deaths ...six years later a famine killed three and a half million people
in Bengal alone...in 1965 a cyclone (hit India with the force of) ten
three megaton H-bombs...Calcutta condemn(s) its ten million inhabitants to
living on less than twelve square feet of space per person, while the four
or five million of them who squeeze into its slums have sometimes to make
do with barely three square feet each." You begin to feel you have to be a
masochist to go further, because the descriptions of the living conditions
in Calcutta's largest slum -- Anand Nagar, the City of Joy -- are
tummy-turning: the rot of the tin and cardboard shacks, the hunger, the
lepers, eunuchs and the scorching heat and pestilence match the revulsion
of the residents regularly wading through waste-high excrement that floods
through the slums when the rains come or the sewers get backed up because
of the endless strikes. Albeit upchucky, Lapierre's diary is absorbing and
in some cases you might even re-read passages again and again out of total
disbelief: your mind wanders in unspeakable directions when you come upon
lepers having sex, and it's indescribable your feelings when one leper
gives birth. (There are no precise numbers but it's estimated that India
has as many as five millions lepers.) Lapierre writes about the dwellers
of the City of Joy: "No amount of wretchedness, not even utter destitution
on a piece of pavement in Calcutta, could alter that they are the world's
cleanest people." And they do it with less than a pint of water for each
daily public bath.
     If you're a sinner like moi, you'll be absolved of all sins when
you finish the first half, and if you make it all the way through -- this
should be easy to do because you'll be hooked by then -- you're likely
going to be a candidate for sainthood. While there's mention of and a bit
of history about Mother Teresa, this isn't her story. It's about a real
Polish Catholic priest and (during the last third of the book) a real
American Jewish doctor who join forces to provide, with scant financial
resources, whatever medicinal comfort is feasible. It can't come as any
surprise to the reader that though their work is needed, admired and
honored, it is within these two outsiders that the City of Joy has its
ironic impact. (And it has impacted readers around the world: by October,
1986, Lapierre had received over 40,000 letters, many of them containing
donations, so moved were they by the emotionally wrenching stories. The
author has also donated one half of his royalties to Anand Nagar's
inhabitants.) Reading some copy about the movie version, the feature
writers are describing the book as "sentimental" but it's no such thing:
though immersed in awesome poverty, this book isn't schmaltzy
fictionalized pap -- it doesn't cheapen or romanticize or distort the
residents of the City of Joy. 
            I wish I could say the movie doesn't, either, but I can't:
director Roland Joffe and screenwriter Mark Medoff have indeed cheapened
the story in every way and worst of all is they have taken the good
American doctor -- played by Patrick Swayze -- and turned him into an
example of the pretensions of the "art" of dramatic writing right out of
Lajos Egri's college text. They've given him a false crisis, made his
character diametrically the opposite of what he is in Lapierre's book in
order put him into repeated conflicts that Loeb only rarely or never
encounters, made him inexplicably suicidal, and gave him a resolution
that, evidently satisfying to the members of the audience who don't know
how Lapierre ends his story, is simply hackneyed. The next worse things
they've done: they eliminated entirely the priest -- it's now Pauline
Collins as Sister (Saint) Joan -- and have created a super vicious slum
Mafiosi, played by Art Malik. Anyone who reads the book can see it as a
ready-made screenplay and all an honest director needs is a cast, a
Steadicam and a story editor who has respect for the material. There are
more scenes of real conflict, heartbreaking drama, spiritual wonderment
and impossible-to-believe-but-true vignettes in the book than a moviemaker
could ever hope to use -- for example, the young doctor amputating without
anesthesia a leprous arm and watching "a mangy dog carrying it off in its
mouth"  -- but why Joffe and Medoff had to go dreaming up new ones is
beyond the pale. In the book -- and his first appearance comes about half
way through and becomes focal only in the last third -- Miamian Max Loeb,
who's just about to get his medical degree from Tulane, has read all about
the selfless priest of Calcutta and decides, because he needs "a change of
air, to be of service," to join him. In the very first scenes of the
movie, he's Max Lowe -- changed to a less Jewish-sounding name because the
movie was being filmed during the Gulf War and there were constant
anti-American and anti-Israeli protests -- and already an established
doctor from Houston who abruptly decides to abandon his profession because
he lost a child-patient on the operating room table. (What drives him to
Calcutta specifically is never adequately explained except by the
all-purpose search for "enlightenment.") In the book Loeb, on his first
day in the slums, helps deliver a breeched baby to a leper couple. In the
movie, Lowe checks into a seedy hotel, entertains a prostie and is set up
to get drunk, beaten and robbed by local Mafia terrorizer Malik. And this
movie Max sort of stumbles onto the slums. (He eventually gets to that
leper's baby, though.) 
     Objecting to what Joffe has done to Lapierre's book might not have
been necessary had he at least been faithful to the atmospherics of the
slums even half way right. At first glance the faked City of Joy,
photographed approximating the color of diluted urine, appears wretched
and diseased, and when we see the blackened open trench that snakes its
way through the slums, we expect to get a dose of biological reality --
that is, shown how the dwellers poop. As we get into the book, we wait for
Lapierre to account for the disposal methods, since there are no bathrooms
as Westerners acknowledge the meaning. He doesn't disappoint; as horrific
and appearing-to-be lacking of dignity as it might seem, it's quite the
reverse, and a queer sense of admiration occurs within the reader when the
Polish priest says, "Before reaching the public conveniences, I had to
cross a veritable lake of excrement. This additional trial was a courtesy
of the cesspool emptiers, who had been on strike for five months. The
stench was so foul that I no longer knew which was the more unbearable:
the smell or the sight. That people could actually remain good humored in
the middle of so much abjection seemed quite sublime to me. They laughed
and joked -- especially the children who somehow brought the freshness and
gaiety of their games into that cesspool. I came back from that escapade
as groggy as a boxer knocked out in the first round." (And they don't use
any form of toilet paper -- only a tinful of water to wash up afterwards.)
Joffe not only avoids what has to be running through the minds of viewers
when they see that sewer, and avoids the common overspills of the sewer
into the homes, he also avoids the bathing practices which are even more
of a marvel. (The women are able to fully clean themselves while still in
their saris.) Part of the omission most likely has to do with the
persistent protests that occurred during the filming -- many Indians felt
that Joffe might be robbing residents of their self-respect if all aspects
of life in the City of Joy were documented. But in that Joffe faked his
city and flood, could he not fake the urges or baths elsewhere? And
perhaps do it in longshot? Readers will also note what other elements are
missing: cobras and infestations of rats and bugs; how the people use cow
dung cakes as fuel to cook their food (made ultra spicy because much of it
is rotten); and the ravages of the heat -- so hot that the bare feet of
the horses who pull the rickshaws would stick to the pavement of the
streets and the callous outer skin would peel off and the under skin would
become bloody and infected. 
     So what do we get in the movie version? Instead of endemic
cholera, there's frequent Mafia-administered punches into Max's stomach
and a stab into rickshaw puller Hasari (played by Om Puri), who also
suffers from a badly treated case of tuberculosis. When the monsoon
arrives and then the flood, instead of numerous bodies and dead rodents,
dogs and other animals floating through the alley streets of the slum,
there's Max nearly drowning after saving a leper and his baby. In the
book, Max is exasperated by a lack of medical supplies and though he's
often discouraged -- he periodically heads to one of Calcutta's grand
hotels for a little R&R -- he's faithful to Hippocrates; movie Max has to
be goaded into staying true to his oath. (One assumes that because Joffe
and scripter Medoff reversed Loeb at the start, they could redeem
themselves by having movie Max stay indefinitely in Anand Nagar, slyly
one-uping Loeb, who eventually returned to America, though he founded an
organization to supply the slum with medicines and equipment, and makes
regular return visits.) 
     Had Joffe only condensed the material, he might have provided
Patrick Swayze with the role he excitedly told Oprah and Larry King had
changed his life. You want to believe his humbleness when he said that
this is his best work so far as an actor, but if he could say this, and
tell us that when he first arrived in Calcutta Joffe sent him directly to
work with Mother Teresa before filming started, and that he's playing a
role of a doctor whose life has been fundamentally changed because of his
experiences in the City of Joy, it's not suspiciously disingenuous, it's a
little more like too sincere star-thumping. He's doing his own advance
work on his still unformulated humanatations. (He even admitted his
emotional discombobulation to King.) If Swayze had played his Max as he's 
promoting himself, he'd have been a sensation, and not coincidentally much
closer to the real Max. It's not Swayze's fault that the part is now about
a stereotypic angry young man, yet given the confines of such, he's far
from bad. In fact, what saves him is his own deportment -- his own sense
of agog; he's at once thrilled and yet disbelieving that he's playing so
life-changing a role. And there's something quite appealing about his
slightly Oriental face, which, perhaps because he fell ill for three weeks
during production, has finally lost its fattiness, and its repellent
grubbiness; in his Bugle Boys and sun-bleached hair, he's warm,
personable. (Even the real kids of Anand Nagar liked him enormously.) If
he can't redeem the awful scenes in which he's mouthing the silly, badly
written bitterness that's supposed to be telling us something about his
character, the fact is no one could (Joffe originally wanted Richard
Dreyfuss; Lapierre wanted Mel Gibson) because Medoff disemboweled the
book's Max, who was skeletal to begin with. (Two scenes from the thirty
minutes cut from the theatrical release include Max's attempted suicide,
which never happens in the book, and a seduction of Sister Joan; in the
book, Max has an Indian sexual outlet as part of his R&R.) Swayze does
affect us during a few of the movie's dramatic wallops, and in one I got
quite flushed with feelings and teary-eyed. The problem is, I can't
remember the exact moment anymore -- it has completely vanished from my
mind. This fleetness is central to Joffe's vamoosed vision; he's made not
a movie version of THE CITY OF JOY but one about The City of Vapors.
Everything that's genuinely moving about the book has been evaporated.
     Joffe is most faithful to the book's rickshaw puller Hasari, who
is the salt of Indian earth. Om Puri's performance is unquestionably the
movie's major asset, though you find yourself losing patience with his
mania for honor. (You could discreetly skim over his virtues in the book
but you're stuck enduring them in the theatre.) Pauline Collins is wasted
as an amalgam of the religious characters that Joffe thought could be
vacated without spiritual loss. (One of the small surprises of the book is
that even in the Anand Nagar Christian Christmas is celebrated.) This may
be, more than anything else, what tells us is so dummy-headed wrong with
the movie. It's maddeningly compromising when no dilution is necessary. So
what if Indians were protesting? When do they not? But you know why Joffe
phonied it up -- he's got one eye on the potentially huge box office of
India. (There's a funny line at the beginning when an Indian woman tells a
young child to keep away from the movie houses -- Indians being among the
world's most avid moviegoers.) What will rankle lovers of the book and
probably enrage fair-minded Indians about the movie THE CITY OF JOY is
that if this is the movie that Joffe really wanted to make, it's even more
insulting to the Indians he placated because it makes so many of them look
like the fools he and Medoff made of themselves.                          

Title
Review for Farewell to Arms, A (1957)
        It's maddening to one's sense of fairness to read back cover 
promotion like this: A FAREWELL TO ARMS is "the best American novel to 
emerge out of World War I...an unforgettable story of an American 
ambulance driver on the Italian front and his love for a beautiful English 
nurse. Hemingway's frank portrayal of the love between Lt. Henry and 
Catherine Barkley, caught in the inexorable sweep of war, glows with an 
intensity unrivaled in modern literature...his description of the German 
attack on Caporetto bears comparison to Stendhal's depiction of the 
retreat from Waterloo. Richer in language, more subtle in expression, and 
emotionally astute, (the novel) also symbolizes Hemingway's farewell to an 
attitude, a time, and a literary method. Published when Hemingway was just 
thirty, it confirmed his stature as the greatest single influence on the 
American short story and novel." After that, what's left but the Nobel 
prize? If the cult around Hemingway is culturally ingrained, it's also a 
bit much. Undeniably he has a gift for the laconic -- his shorthand prose 
and dialogue achieve his stories' limited purposes better than just about 
any other stylist. For example, when at her end Catherine says, "It's just 
a dirty trick," you'll be tempted to pooh-pooh the fatalism and jeer at 
the melodramatic setup, but at the same time you'll find yourself 
applauding Papa's 1929 audacity. (It's the kind of "paying for your sins 
of happiness" one could expect Carol Burnett's skit writers to make into 
classic camp.) And irrefutable is that his viral technique of punchy 
economy has infected generations of writers who follow him -- there's an 
endless contagion of wanna-be boxers. Your immune system warns of them in 
just about every kind of entertainment writing -- high classers, pulp 
fiction, pop trash, science fiction, horror stuff. You hear them in 
movies, on TV dramas and sitcoms and soaps, on talk-radio. Even news has 
become bastardized Hemingway: the day's stories are compacted into pugil 
stick tutorials and pithy reproaches. (Theatre more or less escaped, only 
to become technoholic.) Hemingway's brooding impatience, arrogance and 
intense lack of subtly represent who we think we are; even if some of us 
aren't as appreciative of his art as others hold we should be -- Camille 
Paglia thinks it's scandalous that some resist worshipping him as "the 
inventor of the lingua franca of American journalism" -- what he gives us 
as imagery of himself is so powerful that, like we do with Mailer, we 
absorb the bravura myth disproportionate to what's real. They may be 
monsters, but they're our monsters as literary royalty. What Hemingway 
doesn't produce as writer is in-depth character and expository detail: 
unlike Mailer, he doesn't have the tolerance to do much other than 
broadstroking, he can't be bothered with biography or, in FAREWELL, with 
much history. The book, which took thirteen months to write and resulted 
in Italy designating the author persona non grata during the 30s, is a 
blend of some of his nonfiction pieces and a whole lot of personal and 
travel experiences that eclipse the catastrophe of the war; it's simply 
bogus praise that he can be compared to Stendhal (or John Reed, the real 
architect of American-style news reporting) when what he's really doing is 
editorially dramatizing a travelogue. The more you get into Hemingway, the 
harder it is to adapt him to the screen, which is the weirdest of ironies 
because you'd think that the way he writes -- his chatter is film noir 
before it was ever coined -- would be a breeze to reenact. But it's Aldous 
Huxley who found the cloak of insufficiency inherent in the argot: "What 
Hemingway had to say was in the white spaces between the lines." Ben 
Hecht, who gets the screenplay credit for the `57 A FAREWELL TO ARMS 
screamed at producer David O. Selznick, "That sonofabitch writes in 
water!" In his "An Open Book," John Huston writes that "Hemingway's 
stories don't dramatize readily. Scenes seem to a beginning, a middle and 
an end when in fact they don't." Charles Vidor directed the picture, but 
Huston was first choice; after receiving a sixteen page single-spaced 
typewritten memo from Selznick -- a condensed version of the drivel is 
published in "Memo from David O. Selznick" -- he wisely opted out. He also 
exposes what you tend to feel while watching the movie: Selznick's "love 
for Jennifer Jones was very real and touching but in it lay the seeds of 
the failures that marked the last years of his life. Everything he did was 
for Jennifer. His life centered upon her, to the detriment of his good 
judgment. He never did anything worth a damn after he married her." The 
movie's been turned into one of those Wednesday matinee hard ticket 
weepies -- with Jones suffering for the martini'd blue hairs in the 
audience. Already seventeen years older than her character Catherine, a 
VAD more Scot than English, Jones is more than a little embarrassing to 
watch; deluded by Selznick's and the production's inflation, she thinks 
she can do the "I've-slapped-you-now-you-pump-me" routine. But there's one 
facet about which we come to believe: that not only is Catherine in her 
own words "a little gone off," so is Jones. In what performance isn't she 
titling towards Bonkersville? (Could anyone call her certifiably sane in 
SONG OF BERNADETTE, DUEL IN THE SUN, LOVE IS A MANY SPLENDORED THING, THE 
MAN IN THE GRAY FLANNEL SUIT?) Despite her "condition," which includes a 
fear of rain, she can't say no to Rock. But who'd fault her weakness? In 
his dark and shiny nonregulation-cut hair, Hudson's not too bad; king of 
the amiable glamour boys who knew that the way to movie star success was 
regularly stopping by Villa Hag, he's the epitome of 50s heartthrob. 
Unmistakably an American strapper, with a super-rare drop-dead 
friendliness, flashing a "take me, I'm yours" smile, he's nothing if not a 
CinemaScope glossy. He's not Hemingway as Hemingway writes about himself 
in the novel, but he's quite possibly what Hemingway might have hoped for 
himself at his most physically ideal. During the 50s and early 60s, who 
didn't want to be Rock or be Rocked? (What a John Waters moment it must 
have been when the studios discovered that Hudson was getting more fan 
male than fan mail.) Vittorio De Sica and the other Italian actors often 
sound looped and Mario Nascimbene's score gets a little too funereal with 
the organ. Oswald Morris did some photography but was eventually fired by 
Selznick. I'd love to know if he did the opening tourist panoramas; they'd 
make great additions to MS Scenes.  

Title
Review for House of the Spirits, The (1993)
        No first novel since Harper Lee's TO KILL A MOCKINGBIRD has moved
me more deeply than Isabel Allende's THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS. For days
after completing it, I wondered why: among the legion of international
readers overwhelmed, I too was dizzied by the swirling romanticism, stoned
on the superbly crafted interweaving of close family observation and
political raison d'etre -- the most educated of Latin American countries
succumbing to the historic inevitability of fascism. But why were there
these waves of emotions every so often that crushed me? Why did I
suddenly, frequently start welling up, even before the ending? In a word
-- Barrabas. Cynics might describe the use of Clara the Clairvoyant's dog
as manipulative, and if a reader has never been attached to a pet of any
kind, shrugging off his importance isn't only easy, it's fatal to one's
receptiveness: Barrabas isn't the center of this sprawling yet intimate
epic of the Trueba family, but he is its spiritual symbol. Barrabas, more
than celestial Clara, rises from the ashes of ruin. 
        THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS has been compared to Nobel prize winner
Gabriel Garcia Marquez's ONE HUNDRED YEARS OF SOLITUDE, about a Colombian
family named the Buendias and through which Garcia Marquez turns a
century's worth of the ordinary and the solitude of their lives into
"magic realism." For nearly four decades Latin American novelists, short
story tellers and poets who have employed this legerdemain as genre have
been the rage among the literati, who have exalted to the most high Garcia
Marquez as its master, sometimes without acknowledging that Jorge Luis
Borges's A UNIVERSAL HISTORY OF INFAMY carpet rides through Garcia
Marquez's most famous work. The smart set doesn't remind us, either, that
Cuban novelists Alejo Carpentier, with his THE LOST STEPS, and Jose Lezama
Lima, with his PARADISO and Peruvian Mario Vargas Llosa were the early
laborers-keepers of the path Borges helped explore. There's scarce mention
of the first Latin American ever to win the Nobel for literature, Chilean
Gabriela Mistral, for her passionately spiritual poetry, and, having
become her protege and subsequent winner of the coveted prize, even rarer
tribute to Pablo Neruda, whose poems established him as first a symbolist,
then surrealist, finally a realist. The same mostly Latin intellectuals,
who shower acclaim on Manuel Puig's melodramatics like the fraudulent KISS
OF THE SPIDER WOMAN, genuflect to Carlos Fuentes, fake an understanding of
Borges's avant garde puzzle making, mention rather cursorily Isabel
Allende, as if not to would be the larger crime than not giving her the
praise she so justly earns for THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS. The reticence may
be the result of how machismo has for long governed the established
dictates of Latin protocol: the weaker vessel as novelist is not thought
to be worthy of serious consideration. Shortly into the first chapters of
THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS, we're not only hooked, we're in the presence of
a writer so graceful and enveloping that how could we be anything but in
awe over how, borrowing from Garcia Marquez's metier, she enlarges the
experience of a magical mystery tour by breaking our hearts and at the
same time fill us with joy? The feeling derived is similar to a comment
Neruda made about his most widely read book TWENTY LOVE POEMS AND A SONG
OF DESPAIR: "By some miracle which I do not understand, this tormented
book has opened the road to happiness for many, many people." ONE HUNDRED
YEARS OF SOLITUDE might have drown of incredulity had Garcia Marquez not
been an alchemist swimmer -- a virtuoso who strokes words into pieces of
the hidden St. Joseph's gold and make them, despite the surrounding sea of
detail, "glow like embers in the darkness." The lava-like rush that comes
at the conclusion of his novel would have been more impacting than it is
had, one, he not foreshadowed the storm (one of those irritating genre
traits), and two, had he a real or reader-felt emotional investment in his
characters and not his technique of transmutation. His is a wondrous,
flabbergasting achievement but a queerly cold-blooded "fervor for the
written word (as) an interweaving of solemn respect and gossipy
irreverence." Allende's a loving tribute to Garcia Marquez, yet, as if
using her skills as a long time journalist to dissect and discover what
was left wanting of ONE HUNDRED YEARS, an emotional blockbuster. She does
the impossible: we glide effortlessly through her entrancing, precisioned
prose -- we're never in danger of sinking to her near-bottomless pit of
itemization. We're not weighed down by the hocus pocus Garcia Marquez
sometimes infuriates with -- like Remedios the Beauty's ascent to heaven
without a follow-up (readers wanted a news flash about Heaven) or his pair
of doomed lovers fornicating in muriatic acid. And we don't lose our
patience as we came close to doing with Garcia Marquez's exasperating
repetition of genealogical nomenclature (which required of me twenty pages
of notes just to keep track of) or risk tolerance with her like some of us
did over the insanity of Puig's belief that it's acceptable to make a
heroine out of gay man by sacrificing himself as something or someone he's
not, and never was. (Puig's Molina is really a candidate for
transsexuality.) With Allende, we reel in a high with no after-effects:
she's not only penning a quixotic diary-romance within the realities of
Chile's tragedy -- her slain uncle Salvador Allende is here, as well as
Neruda, who, as the Chilean Ambassador to France, lost his life during the
early stages of the Pinochet coup -- but she's also taking us on an
exhilarating journey to the heart of egalitarianism, a doctrine that will
be used again in the EVA LUNA stories and her first novel on America, the
touristy THE INFINITE PLAN.
        As we get deep into Allende's slightly autobiographical novel and
come across Clara, her twin boys, daughter Blanca, granddaughter Alba, the
"Mora Sisters, the Rosicrucians, the Theosophists, the telepathists, the
rainmakers, the peripatetics," we're positive they'd all be perfectly at
home in Garcia Marquez's Macondo. Early in HOUSE Allende mocks a priest's
visions of hell and damnation through Clara's one-liner, while Garcia
Marquez has a priest failing to attract people to his church by using
levitation (and one of the many Jose Arcadio Buendias tries to answer the
question of the existence of God by attempting to photograph him); in
HOUSE there's a builder of animal-based crches, in ONE HUNDRED YEARS a
maker of little fish; both books have characters who ethereally wander. If
Allende's book dedication is any measure, however, I'd postulate she might
have been more feministly influenced by Humberto Sols's 1968 movie epic
of Cuban independence, LUCIA, a trilogy of political epochs told from the
point of view of three women named the same. And perhaps shaded her novel
with factually-based realism out of Patricio Guzman's documentary THE
BATTLE OF CHILE. Both of these films tend to expose their explicit
political themes: LUCIA tries, with one part delirium, one part
melancholy, one part demagogic sexism, to applaud Communism, Castro-style,
but what it ends up as is a celebration of true freedom; despite the
mandatory exclamation points as virtues of Communism, LUCIA subversively
reveals the folly of a bankrupt system by bringing to the surface emotions
and sex that betray the very intentions aimed for. And though THE BATTLE 
OF CHILE seems to have the heaven-sent imprimatur of the dead first
Marxist-Socialist president of Chile, by the time it's over, we're fairly
sure that any attempt-experiment to enforce Marxism through constitutional
law is an unenforceable contradiction. Allende's novel has the feel of an
artful polemic, too, but she's a humanitarian foremost; skirting
definitive failure and blame, she allows her uncle to escape severe
excoriation by more than suggesting his administration was maligned not
only by the Conservatives and the military, with assistance from Nixon and
Kissinger (we had ships off the coast of Chile during the coup), but also
by the huge influx of naive, inexperienced socialist reformers who knew
not the ways to navigate and manipulate the otherwise paralyzing labyrinth
of bureaucracy. As with LUCIA, Allende frames her women as victims of
cultural traps. This pitfall as trait -- building a political and life
style base out of pumped-up pride and sexual prowess that is so very
distinctive in Latin countries -- is part of the basis that makes machismo
the most dangerously attractive of all isms. Those  experiences with Latin
men, like the women in LUCIA, ONE HUNDRED YEARS OF SOLITUDE and THE HOUSE
OF THE SPIRITS, would I think agree there's little that's more demonic or
demagogic than Latin machismo and the worship of it gone amuck. 
        This kind of worship tends to discourage equality movements and
dampen convictions and helps create a void shrouded by premonition: In ONE
HUNDRED YEARS, Garcia Marquez flirts with the "insomnia plague," which,
until there's an arrival of antidote, causes the residents of Macondo to
forget everything -- even forget that they're forgetting. (A bit like
Borges' A THEOLOGIAN IN DEATH.) Readers wait for the plague to be used as
a metaphor for what V.S. Naipaul, in his THE RETURN OF EVA PERON, wrote of
Argentina: "A country where government has never been open and
intellectual resources are scant, the rhetoric of the regime is usually
all that survives to explain it. Argentina has the apparatus of an
educated, open society. There are newspapers and magazines and
universities and publishing houses; there is even a film industry. But the
country has as yet no idea of itself. Streets and avenues are named after
presidents and generals, but there is no art of historical (and critical)
analysis; there is no art of biography. There is legend and antiquarian
romance, but no real history." In describing Macondo's banana workers'
rebellion that saw three thousand killed and dumped in the sea and later
covered up not only by the government but also by all but three of
Macondo's residents, and in the novel's very last sentences, Garcia
Marquez confirms that denying realities and human rights means being
repeatedly condemned to oppression. As Michael Wood's SWEAT OF THE SUN,
TEARS OF THE MOON likewise attests, in Latin America this seemingly
inherited forgetfulness springs forth the plague of the legacy of
Bolivarian machismo -- a fatalism that ensures fascism. (America has its
own fascist plague -- the WRWC, the White Right Wing Christers.)
         If you either read the novel and weren't caught up in Allende's
spell, or didn't read it, you'll most probably dislike Bille August's
adaptation of THE HOUSE  OF THE SPIRITS, perhaps intensely: he's neither
magician nor sensualist and one and preferably both are sine qua non. If,
however, you're among those overwhelmed by the novel, then the movie will
be like a refresher course; watching it, even with its changes, the
original story comes flooding back. That is both praise and caution: Bille
August and his too extraordinary cast have given us a labor of love, and
no lover of the book could deem it less charitably; the concern is that
the big Anglo names, who worked for next-to-nothing salaries in order to
help secure the financing, might displace Allende's intimate epic on Chile
and become, more or less, guest victimas -- a Juicio en Santiago. There is
a risky element of the trickster as we watch August roll out Jeremy Irons,
Vanessa Redgrave, Armin Mueller-Stahl, Glenn Close, and, most apparent,
Meryl Streep. Some of us even felt fear: that the cast would generate
derision, and in pre-release screenings howls from detractors erupted,
especially with Irons' flattened, tongue-twisted accent and Streep being
at a minimum two decades too old to play a young Clara the Clairvoyant.
It's common knowledge that Garcia Marquez has forbade any discussion of
ONE HUNDRED YEARS as movie, and it's been reported that he'd release LOVE
IN THE TIME OF CHOLERA only to a Latin American movie maker. (He had a
Latin direct a handful of his own screenplays, including OLD MAN WITH
ENORMOUS WING, THE SUMMER OF MISS FORBES with Hanna Schygulla, and I'M THE
ONE YOU'RE LOOKING FOR, which had the most promise: about a rape victim
seeking out her attacker, only to discover that what she wishes
retribution for is what she wants, it lacks the delirious lust that drives
such obsessions.) The carpers are saying that, at the least, a Latin
should have filmed THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS, because, they bitch, how can
Irons, Streep, Close, Redgrave, Ryder pose as Chileans when they're
unquestionably WASPy and the director's a milky white, frosty Dane? Some
of the reviewers are balking that the movie doesn't even look South
American. In a desperate ploy to gain audience share, Miramax is printing
in full Janet Maslin's favorable N.Y. Times review, yet in it she says
that purists should beware: the movie does "not retain the flavor of
Allende's setting, which here seems oddly European at times." Nescience
knows no bounds: Santiago, like Buenos Aires, was, and remains largely, a
carbon copy of a European capital. My travel agent hit it on the head when
he said of B.A.: "It's Vienna on a bad day." If it weren't for the
co-mingling of Indian-blooded, often serape-clad South Americans in these
cities, you'd swear the city dwellers were European. Because so many,
especially the ruling class, are of European blood, they see themselves as
Europeans first -- as does the patriarch of the Trueba family -- and Latin
second. (Colombian Garcia Marquez looks Barcelonian; the late Puig
resembled a bit the late Borges, whom few would have tagged as Argentine;
and Allende's physicality is now lost to Californization, but in certain
pictures she looks amazingly like Jihan Sadat.) I'm more than suggesting
that as August casts the principals, he's not to be castigated for not
going "native." And, proving the carpers didn't read much of the novel,
Santiago is not predominantly used; it's an equal split between a
fictitiously named capital and the countryside. Though exteriors were shot
in Portugal, what he gave us is more than sufficient.
        It takes some time to accept this cast, that much I grant. While
the novel has six women who are the hub of spiritual and egalitarian
emanations, as if touched by Gabriela Mistral, the movie, because of time
constraints, rather daringly puts curmudgeon patriarch Esteban Trueba at
the center, with Blanca, his and Clara's daughter, the narrator. In
biological and political terms, Esteban is the nucleus of the book: all
that happens he's either directly or subversively involved. He's a
walking, talking dinosaur of sexism, of archaic conservative persuasion,
and as much as a reader wants to hate him, his firecracker responses are
Scroogy funny and even when he's at his ugliest -- raping a girl not
totally as a means of power or violence but of sexual release, attempting
to kill his daughter's lover, denying his bastard Indian son, sleeping
with the junta -- there's a suspicion held all along in the reader that
he's going to evolve into someone honorable. To play and retain the
ruinous stubbornness of Esteban, Jeremy Irons strips himself of his own
British voice and gives us something like a hoarse Sam Elliott rattling
off a patrician form of Esperanto. Not very long into the picture and up
to the point of aging as an old man, when he looks somewhat like Burt
Lancaster walking like Borges, Irons is surprisingly butch in his snobbish
portliness -- like a tanned, old-world Edward Albee. (On horse and wearing
a riding hat, he brings to mind Sam Neill as Albee.) This mutability
doesn't hurt him; in fact he may be one of the rarest of British actors
who is best not being British, though what makes this apparently true is
unfair: his physicality can make one's flesh crawl, as it did for me
watching his snot-filled virility in DAMAGE, Louis Malle's insipid rip-off
of LAST TANGO IN PARIS. (Or in Harold Pinter's unyielding BETRAYAL.)
Working away from his country's sickly, drab demeanor, Irons springs to
entertaining life: inexplicably it's his prissified masculinity that makes
him so unimaginably right for the twin psychos in DEAD RINGER and equally
super-fitting for the chilled-out, postured indifference of necrophilic
vampire Claus von Bulow in Barbet Schroder's ghoulish REVERSAL OF FORTUNE.
(When Irons declares, "Innocence has always been my position," he earns
the undisputed crown for giving the star performance of 1990 -- the most
sophisticatedly kinky-sick let-it-bleed assault on drollness since any
you-name-it by Sir John Gielgud; it spooked the hell out of me much more
than Hopkins' munchies.) Hating his stuffy Esteban is as much "solemn" fun
as it is in the novel, but in that August cuts out the symbolic Barrabas,
viewers are short-changed of the concluding uplift of spirituality -- a
finale which, Allende confessed on a Discovery Channel documentary about
sleep, came to her in a vivid dream.
        Before the movie began, some audience members wondered outloud
what accent Meryl Streep would foist on us as Clara. Castilian? Catalan? A
hybrid? The laughs Irons gets from the clods at the beginning quickly
becomes one of disappointment when Streep doesn't provide any. There's a
second or two of shock that she has the courage to play Clara as a young
woman, when no matter what director August does to help her (and it isn't
much), the inescapable fact is, there's no way for her to convince us that
she can -- and troubling because it's so damn distracting. She doesn't
help ingratiate herself to us, either: there's an aura of depression, not
the supernatural, hanging around her -- she looks and acts exhausted, not
too unlike Julie Andrews's last hour in HAWAII. Allende describes Clara as
"the most elegant, discreet and charming lady of (her) social circle," but
you'd be hard-pressed to find traces of these attributes in the movie. If
you haven't read the novel, then Clara's self-imposed muting will confuse.
August changes the focus of the "respectful" at Clara's funeral: gone is
"the hodgepodge of delegations -- poor children, students, labor
unionists, nuns, mongoloid children, bohemians, spiritualists" and in are
the conspirators, right out of THE BATTLE OF CHILE. A minor miracle,
though, that we believe it when Streep's Clara says good-bye to Esteban's
sister Ferula, played by Glenn Close, or when she makes after-death
visitations. She does a great collapse when Irons slaps her, and she wears
her hair as illustrated on the cover of the 1986 Bantam book edition. As
Clara's parents, Vanessa Redgrave is merely extending her magnanimity from
Howards End, and Armin Mueller-Stahl sounds as if he's looping in real
time his own performance. Hinting once more at Anne Revere, this time as
an Oriental version, Close, who was August's first choice to play Clara
some years back (with William Hurt as Esteban), has the movie's one
totally manufactured bit -- going to the priest to confess her attraction
to Clara. The accusation of the lesbian is in the novel but expressed only
by Esteban, but why August thought it necessary for us to have this movie
Ferula suffer the embarrassment of the probable truth isn't quite
understandable: doesn't August realize that Ferula would literally die
before she could ever admit it? Her death is precipitated by having been
denied by the jealous Esteban her friendship and loving care of Clara, and
likely by her guilt of amorous feelings she couldn't handle. A more
satisfactory alteration would have been for Close, before her character
wills herself to death, to rage at Irons, because there's plenty to rage
about. And no American actress rages more chillingly than Close. (This is
the second movie in which she plays a victim to Irons -- the first as the
nincompoopy Sonny in REVERSAL OF FORTUNE.) Am I the only to have noticed
that when Ferula's & Esteban's mother dies, the size of the coffin
wouldn't be quite up to the task? 
        Allende describes Blanca as having "Arabian eyes," a "Moorish,
languid air about her. She was tall and well endowed, of a rather helpless
and tearful temperament that roused men's ancestral instinct for
protection." Winona Ryder looks neither Arabic nor tall and teary, and the
toughness she brings to the role is duality: to compress the tragedies
within the family tree, August has Blanca endure what her own daughter
Alba does in the novel -- the torture of the junta. (Allende has Blanca
and her beloved Pedro escaping to Canada while Alba is left behind and
repeatedly violated by one of Esteban's offspring.) This change
unobjectionable in that the story lines of Blanca and Alba are much the
same, but what isn't acceptable -- and is the movie's biggest mistake --
is Ryder's narration. Her voice is so ordinary, overly uninspired and
lacking of resonance and out of pithy sync with the sweeping emotionality
of Allende's plangent language that both the author's and our
sensitivities get mugged. 
        Watching Bille August's version, I was startled by what fidelity
he held to the narrative itself; compacting the novel's major scenes, he
gets to the quick of each and only in a few major instances did I feel he
skimped glaringly: the truncation of how the Conservative politicians, in
cahoots with the military headed by Pinochet and assisted by American
hanky panky, sabotaged Salvador Allende's attempts at social and political
reform, and the absence of Barrabas. The lack of the former is easier to
pardon because author Allende, as the niece of the slain Chilean
president, provides a safety net for herself: she's practically taking
aspirin to reduce the rising fever of socialism and her political scenes
are all clichs and truisms. Her most daring bit is using Nobel-winning
Neruda as The Poet and having him die under Pinochet's junta, a death that
passed in America without regret. (Neither Richard Nixon in his
recollections nor Henry Kissinger in his two bloated volumes of mendacious
memoirs have the decency to call the junta they supported to account for
the outrage, probably because Neruda was in fact the Chilean Communist
Party's candidate for president in 1970, and his politics caused him
trouble as far back as 1948, when he was indicted as a subversive and had
to escape to the Andes on horseback.) The Poet is not included in the
movie, and American involvement is only insinuated. 
        Barrabas's absence is another matter altogether. Being a sucker
for dogs, when in the novel Barrabas is assassinated as political warning,
I don't think I'm the only reader who quickly choked up. The shock and
cruelty of it seemed like rivets pounded into the heart. When Esteban has
the dog taxidermied as rug for Clara, at whose feet he died, there's a
riff between intention and outcome: the rug was done to please Clara the
eternal spiritualist, but she will have no part of it; she condemns the
remains to the basement. But Barrabas rises from the cellar in two moments
of such breathtaking love that I still get goose bumps thinking about it:
when Clara dies, her beloved granddaughter Alba is found after the funeral
to be sleeping on Barrabas, and, after Esteban slowly acknowledges and
regrets that his acquiescence to the military in order to "save" the
country from Allende has been submission to fascism, he surreptitiously
works to free both his daughter and her lover from the hands of Pinochet's
henchmen and, as if to cleanse, decides to open up his Santiago home and
put on loving display Barrabas. "Let's leave him here," he says, "this is
where he always should have been." Though Allende claims to like -- and
approve of the changes for -- the movie, August only proved that a movie
maker could make THE HOUSE OF THE SPIRITS. Unlike ONE HUNDRED YEARS OF
SOLITUDE, which is rather like a movie fantasist's dream of a screenplay
never to be dared, HOUSE isn't an insurmountable challenge -- in that the
story is factually based, its magic has receptive narrative continuity.
What August proved even more is that the next time around, probably as a
deluxe TV miniseries, the book will be in the hands of a sensualist like
Bertolucci or perhaps a fantasist like Hector Babenco, or better yet
Humberto Sols (who could bring out the appropriate melancholic refrains
over failed Revolutions, as he tried to do in 1975's CANATA DE CHILE) and
marvellous facets of imagination like green hair, Nivea's head, Clara's
twins and the Mora Sisters will return and, above all else, Barrabas will
rise, not fall.

Title
Review for Secret Ceremony (1968)
     A list of loony tune movies out of the 60s wouldn't be complete
without Joseph Losey's SECRET CEREMONY. The 11th Hour psycho craze had
already started ebbing by the time prostie Elizabeth Taylor and
unhinged, rich waif Mia Farrow pretended to be mother and daughter,
with Robert Mitchum sniffing around as a nubilphile stepdaddy. But the
shock of Liz -- double chinned, teeth eaten away by the booze, in
Woolworth black pajama-like blouse and skirt, legged in diamond-shaped
mesh stockings -- on her way to St. Mary Magdeline Church to pray after
apparently fellating a john and then heading towards the church's
cemetery to drop flowers on her daughter's grave, with wacky Mia
trailing her, delusionally believing Liz is her own mother come back
from the dead,is just too irresistibly bad not to get suckered in.
     Adapted by George Tabori from an award-winning short story by
Argentinean Marco Denevi, SECRET CEREMONY was at first a vehicle for
Ingrid Bergman, who wanted to make in South America. Difficulties with
rights and other factors intervened, and it's our loss, because, one
surmises, Bergman probably wanted a stab at "magic unrealism," which is
the territory the original story seem to be headed. Under Tabori, and
Losey's dullard's cool, it has become a crash course on pseudo Henry
Jamesion schizophrenia, molestation and a mother's love gone bonkers.
Throw in Dames Peggy Ashcroft and Pamela Brown as "slightly Jewish" dyke
kleptos for good measure and it all becomes a comedic 60s freakfest. We'll
never know what Bergman would have allowed; with Liz, any pretensions
toward refinements were put on the back burner and what's cookin' is a
meal of mockery, debasement and sexual peccadilloes. She serves up one
deliciously bad entree after another: every moment she's in she's so
over-seasoned that watching her could cause a fast track to the toilet.
But she's a shitcan kind of actress anyway -- blowing out lines and facial
reactions that only the trisulfide of matches could dissipate. One of the
worst sequences she's ever had as an actress is here: dressed in a grape
juice lavender suit to hide her bulging tummy and flabby ass cheeks
(Mitchum's Albert calls her "a cow"), she warns Ashcroft and Brown to quit
their heisting at Mia's mansion or she'll "cig the cops" on them. You
can't quite be sure if Lousy, I mean Losey allowed Liz her various bad
accents, her awful inflections and readings, because it would be best to
leave well enough alone -- this movie being one of the few in which the
world's most famous movie star never caused any trouble -- or if he
thought that what's transpiring is supposed to this terribly funny. There
is, to be sure, intentional satire: Liz has the queenly first name of
Leonora, but we hee-hee at her last: Grabowski. She's a blond when
prostituting but in natural dark when washing out her mouth and on a bus
on her way to church. The quintessence of self-ridicule is when, roughly
twenty minutes into the movie, Mia, calling Liz "mummie," serves
breakfast. Stuffing her face with sausages and croissants, belching
afterwards, it's got to be Liz deprecating, because if it were anything
else, we'd all die from the embarrassment. 
     After we get to know famous actors' acting styles, in most cases
we end up unavoidably "seeing" their duplication of technique; we see in
their performances a laziness, a reliance on what worked in the past,
using tricks and methods we reluctantly accept out of fondness. And no
celebrated star as actress has been more guilty of laziness than Liz. Out
of the MGM School of Acting, Liz knows how to hits her marks and play
scenes, as opposed to playing a sustained characterization. I don't think
she has ever been totally successful as an adult character, not even in
WHO'S AFRAID OF VIRGINIA WOOLF?, in which she has about a half dozen of
cinema's greatest bitchouts. Part of this has to do with her lack of
training, part of it her own limitations, part of it directors afraid of
her fame and its accompanying power. Most of it has to do with Liz's own
use of fame: she does what she pleases because she is Liz. Her string of
flops after WOOLF? -- including SECRET CEREMONY -- are no one's fault but
hers; she took the millions and in the process lost millions of viewers.
People got tired of seeing her in roles she was too old for (THE TAMING OF
THE SHREW, THE ONLY GAME IN TOWN) and too young for (BOOM!), and most
especially got fed up with her variations of Martha: in BOOM!, SECRET
CEREMONY and, though she's as her most zesty and audience-pleasing vulgar,
X, Y AND ZEE. She got so lazy as an actress that she accepted herself in
movies she clearly shouldn't have done: HAMMERSMITH IS OUT, the abominable
DIVORCE HIS; DIVORCE HERS, NIGHT WATCH, THE MIRROR CRACK'D. Even if it's a
dressup fantasy, ASH WEDNESDAY has a few scenes in which the old Liz magic
of "scene playing" is on display: looking more beautiful than one can
imagine, she dances with butched up (well, as butch as possible) Helmut
Berger and you can really feel her apprehensions. To her credit, Liz has
never been afraid of doing the controversial: CAT ON A HOT TIN ROOF,
SUDDENLY, LAST SUMMER, WOOLF?, as well as the way off offbeat stuff --
REFLECTIONS IN A GOLDEN EYE, SECRET CEREMONY and THE DRIVER'S SEAT. She
was onto something daring, onto modern madness in SEAT, about a woman bent
on having someone kill her, but she needed a director who knew what a
movie should look like, and how to frame the subject. (It's appalling, but
that's what makes it watchable.) For SECRET CEREMONY, Losey decided to let
Liz look as seedy as the story and as seedy as he looked (see pictures of
him in Michel Ciment's CONVERSATION WITH LOSEY), and while more effective
today because the movie's a curiosity piece, he'd have gotten more out of
his star had he curbed her swaying delineation: she's all over the place,
grabbing bits of Martha's shrew for this scene, faking two or three
accents for that scene, going for a displaced glamour when everything else
fails. She looks fat, but seems the smallest, most inconsequential against
skinny Mia.
     Farrow is absolutely terrific as the deranged nubile with the
nail-scratching-against-the-blackboard name of Cenci who may or may not be
a vixen - a fruitcake bi-Peter Pan trapped in permanent adolescence. I can
recall that when I first saw the movie, I was turned off by her; maybe I
couldn't get passed the fact that she could never be Frank Sinatra's wife.
(Ava Gardner's famous quip still resonates: "I always knew Frank would end
up in bed with a little boy.") In fact, the marriage was in deep trouble
during the movie's filming, so this could be one of those "lose myself"
roles as form of protection; whatever it is, it works. She's a marvel at
every turn: she's instant bananas when she sits down next to Liz on the
bus; she's eerily uncomfortable to us when she's brushing Mummie's hair
and could be attempting to put the make on her; and again she unnerves us
when she joins Liz in a post-CLEOPATRA bathtub; she has just the right
teasing ambiguity playing games with stepdaddy Mitchum; she's
indescribably perfect feigning rape and pregnancy; she's flesh crawling
when rubbing Liz's back; and she pulls out all the sedated
dementia-in-full-bloom stops to achieve her finale -- not unexpected but
very effective. If SECRET CEREMONY eventually becomes  a cult classic --
and it could -- it will be Mia who gets the credit: here's a lunatic eager
for sin.
     In his leprechaun beard, great swagger (which Brown and Ashcroft
have fun mimicking) and boozy W.F. Buckley face, Robert Mitchum's a rather
subdued roue, a stepfather who casually dismisses incest as "a rather
boring symptom of the private property system." He can never give a
permanent address because he's always on the run from the law, chasing him
down over his inability to keep his hands off female students. When
Mitchum signed on to do the role of Albert, he said Losey and Tabori did
"some weird things with that script. They were in trouble when I got
there, and I don't think I improved the situation any." Yet he did: though
Albert isn't in the original story, his inclusion - however Psyche 101, or
powered as if on remote control - is part of Mia's Cenci's cause and
effect of sexual precocity. 
     The craziness is the intended star, but it's the real house that
steals the picture. Colder, mazier urban British digs would be difficult
to find: construction starting in 1898, and completed five years later,
its eclectic style is the result of several architects, and its most
outstanding features, aside from the labyrinth of halls, rooms, nooks and
crannies, are the Moorish style balconies and woodwork and the blue and
aquamarine tiles that are in the interior and on the exterior. Scouting
locations, Losey remembered the house because he'd often pass it when he'd
take his son to a nearby school, and even production Richard MacDonald
knew of it, though at first he thought it wasn't quite right for the
picture's neurotic ambiance. Until, that is, he and Losey went to see it:
having ironically been used for a time by a church organization to house
the mentally ill, they found it a gold mine of possibilities. (They only
had to clean up grounds, restore the William Morris wallpaper, the art
nouveau objects, fixtures and add furniture. Mia's mother's bedroom and
attached bath were sets but their designs were faithful to the house.)
Notwithstanding Losey's claims, there's nothing about the sickies who live
within the story that we'd care to believe as "realistic," but we can
giggle our way through the psychoturgy by seeing these dementia peacocks
perform their rituals as a result of the house's influence: they've been
overtaken by the its maddening esoterics.

Title
Review for El Cid (1961)
        The era of the roadshow -- big budgeted movies designed to battle
the rapid intrusion of television on box office receipts in the Fifties
and Sixties -- was mostly a pompous affair: movies that were one or two
hours longer than needed, elevated prices for reserved seats and
refreshments (like BEN-HUR candy bars), mementos such as stagebills &
souvenir booklets & sometimes glossy still packets, preludes, overtures,
intermissions, exit music. Most of these nothing-money-can't-buy
spectaculars, in spite of honorable intentions, weren't worth the trouble;
they were mostly globs of lush sets, costumes, over-scored music, special
effects demonstrations, ear-splitting sound, eye-popping panoramas --
reasons to spend money, to advance movie technology, to keep a lot of
people working. What other reasons were there for Sam Bronston to make THE
FALL OF THE ROMAN EMPIRE? (But in Bronston's defense: his pre-Epcot Rome
has never been equaled, though the pornographic CALIGULA has a few
settings that come close, and Richard Fleischer's BARABBAS is so plausibly
evocative of the period that its "realism" is out and out depressing.) Of
all the epics that received the deluxe treatment, Joseph L. Mankiewicz's
CLEOPATRA and George Steven's THE GREATEST STORY EVER TOLD were so badly
butchered by executive fiat -- editing the movies down because of
complaints by the few and for the additional purpose of trying to squeeze
in more showings per day for more bucks -- that they have become objects
of sympathy. (Fox's video of CLEOPATRA, even without letterboxing, might
be the first quietly "restored" spectacle, yet Fox's two video releases of
GREATEST STORY remain 65 minutes short of its original running time.)
After the successful restoration of LAWRENCE OF ARABIA, spearheaded by
Steven Spielberg and Martin Scorsese, and following the renovation of
SPARTACUS, Scorsese set his sights on Anthony Mann's EL CID, considered by
many lovers of the genre as its epitome. Most of Scorsese's push to
restore these (and soon-to-be other) films has to do with the fear of
losing the productions, as intended by their makers, to the destructive
elements of time, environment and neglect on original negatives. As he
said of EL CID, "They can't make them like this anymore." He guesstimated
that the 1960-61 $14,000,000 cost of EL CID would approximate $129,000,000
in 1993 dollars. Probably an exaggerated figure, but producers reportedly
spent something close to $80-to-100 million on the megabomb THE LAST
ACTION HERO and something like $170 million on WATERWORLD, and some movie
makers are trying get $100 million to make an epic on the Crusades (with
Arnold!), so Scorsese's regrets should not be confused with future
possibilities. What he's saying is movie makers most likely won't attempt
to re-make a LAWRENCE or an EL CID again, and that's the strongest
imperative behind the restorations.
        When released in 1961, EL CID received some good reviews -- ending
up on Time's and the N.Y. Times' "Ten Best" lists -- but it came nowhere
near the domestic box office of BEN-HUR. It also met with unjust
comparisons: looking at BEN-HUR today, there's such fraudulence -- crammed
with faked backdrops, matte shots, obvious dummies on the miniature ships
and in the galley, embarrassingly revealing bits of stand-ins for the
principals -- that it becomes a hoot. (The 1926 BEN-HUR often more
realistic, like that tempting bare-assed slave chained in the galley.) You
wonder: What drove the masses to see it? Of course, the chariot race. And
superb marketing, with equally grand art work, tailored to religious suck
ups. (Every parochial school bused students downtown to Saturday morning
showings, hoping they'd be mesmerized, overwhelmed, therefore resurrected
by the solemn hymns; the hope being Hollywood could do in a few hours what
the Church took years to do -- transforms the kids from sinners to angelic
submissives.) Having but one splendid action sequence to grab and exhaust
us -- the two-man battle for the city of Calahorra directed by second unit
wizard Yakima Canutt (its other action scenes more than adequate,
notwithstanding Heston's comments in his self-congratulatory 1978  THE
ACTOR'S LIFE) -- EL CID had handicaps and prejudices to overcome. Coming
on the heals of biblical stories like THE ROBE, QUO VADIS, BEN-HUR,
SOLOMON AND SHEBA, THE BIG FISHERMAN and KING OF KINGS, another Bronston
spectacle, EL CID suffered not only because it's an "old Hollywood style"
epic, loaded down with pageantry, encased in stilted aphorisms much like
KNIGHTS OF THE ROUND TABLE and IVANHOE, but also because it's an account
of Spain's greatest hero about whom American audiences were neither aware
of nor really cared about. EL CID is indeed propelled along by an
extensive use of epigrams, and Loren delivers more of them than any other
cast member. Her best: "Since my love is not like other men, my life will
not be like other lives." (When Herbert Lom, the treacherous Emir Ben
Yussuf, is berating his men as softies and the camera moves in on the
indispensably nellie Frank Thring, he lashes out, "You have become
women!") And "old fashion" in style it is: perfunctory scenes are used to
advance the story along, there's pomp and clash & bang galore, the
mandatory insertion of good over evil. But unlike other medieval epics, EL
CID has been lavishly wrapped in authenticity: its sets are huge but
subdued in scale and detail for the 11th Century. The restoration of color
and clarity have given us the chance to ooh and aah at not only the
tapestries, murals, flags and other regalia but the real leathers used in
costumes for Heston and Raf Vallone: they're so vividly rich that you can
practically reach out and touch the textures. (Only one costume set sticks
out as atrocious: King Ferdinand's crown and cape of arms look like badly
sown together car decays. Forgiven when, having died, he's laid out on a
black and gold tapestry, which should be sold by JCPenny. And not the only
decoration from a Bronston epic that should be duplicated: Armstrong or
Mannington should consider selling replications of the best floor in all
of movies -- the inlaid masterpiece for Herod's palace in KING OF KINGS.)
The use of Spain's real castles and landscapes add immeasurable legitimate
weight -- underlining some of the overtly false, flimsy settings of
BEN-HUR. For those who have only seen the pre-restored EL CID on TV, or on
one of the two very poor quality video versions available, there must be
disappointment because not only is the color washed out, and no overtures
or exit music, but of course they miss entirely the sweep, the grandeur --
and a lot of tidbits: like watching the troops build their multi-story
ramps, or catching the facial reactions of the various ladies-in-waiting,
or getting to giggle at Thring's earrings or at Ben Yussuf's armies capped
in turbans that in succession look like mushrooms, candied jujubes, peanut
shells and the Elephant Man's head, or getting a good look at Vallone's
blooded-up chest, with its skin peeled back. State of the Art might not
have been a term yet coined, but Vallone's wounds, and Heston's facial
scar and the arrow that's embedded into his chest are excellent 1961
makeup effects. 
        No American actor was born to play historic figures more than
Charlton Heston. His only rivals are Englishmen -- Rex Harrison, Peter
O'Toole, and Laurence Olivier, who, never looking more magisterial, steals
SPARTACUS away from Kirk Douglas. The epic as genre would have continued
on its loony, chaotic way without Heston, but as its center, he gave it
legitimacy; somehow his mid-Western intonational Voice of All Ages and his
handsome physical stature imposingly fused. He had the odd, unearned gift
of penetrating our modern cynicism and could redeem the stilted formal
lingo of spectaculars. And little quarrel that his shadow eclipsed those
in Hollywood epics who came before him, like Gregory Peck, or the
unnerving Robert Taylor, who always seemed to be waiting to break for a
cigarette. Part of this has to do with Heston's ability to look
appropriately weathered and flawed, as in EL CID. Yet he's not oversized,
either, like the stockyard beefiness of misfit Victor Mature; there's
something reassuring about how Heston's masculinity remains strongly
intact despite the furs, flowing capes and silks he's often been required
to wear. Because we'll never know what the men of history he's played will
sould like, Heston's legacy could be that we would expect them to come
close to matching him. (Especially true when he's done up as Andrew
Jackson.) That doesn't mean Heston's performances have always been
successful: I didn't believe but a minute or two of his Moses, no matter
what vulgarian DeMille declared about the hunt for elusive facts. But
Heston's inadvertently funny; how could he not be opposite Anne Baxter's
camp-tramp Nefertiri? While not playing a known figure as Judah, his
Oscar-winning performance was based on novelist Lew Wallace's suggestion
of what Jewish royalty might have been like during the time of Roman rule
over Judea. In retrospect, BEN-HUR is a spectacle of stereotype and hate:
all the Romans look and act like primped-up pansies. Not unintentional:
Gore Vidal, who did some of the re-writing of the script, changed the
psychology of the friendship between Ben-Hur and Stephen Boyd's evil
Messala to a revenge on unrequited lust -- without Heston's acknowledge.
The question of the House of Hur's Jewish faith also gets cloudy: will
Judah, his mother and sister convert as Christers after the climatic cure
of leprosy? (They do in the novel.) The best thing about 55 DAYS AT
PEKING, in which Heston's under-ultilized as an American marine battling
the Boxer Rebellion, is that Peking-Imperial City set. The Roman Forum was
being built for ROMAN EMPIRE when Heston signed on to do PEKING, so
Bronston had his standing army of carpenters re-construct the forum into
the Chinese city. God only knows what kind of pressure Heston exerted on
Sir Carol Reed to avoid playing Michelangelo as a homosexual in THE AGONY
AND THE ECSTASY, and though there were many other things wrong with the
epic -- like the mini-documentary which opens it and avoids giving us a
full frontal of David -- Heston's reticence to record the great master as
he was is its major failing. Was the closely cropped beard the only hint
at inclination Heston would permit? Did he not see that the Sistine Chapel
is wrought with religio-homoeroticism? He insinuates with one daring
pre-Freud, pre-genetic line, "God crippled me." As John the Baptist in THE
GREATEST STORY EVER TOLD, Heston not only once again looked the part, he
bellowed it out with great gusto. KHARTOUM, about the British general
Charles Gordon, played by Heston, who must defend the city against the
fanatic Arab Mahdi, performed in a left-over-tan-from-OTHELLO by Laurence
Olivier, was epic short on length and viewers. Audiences were by 1966
suspicious of, if not burnt out on roadshows. And this one's got a musical
score that would otherwise be litigious: composer Frank Cordel steals from
SPARTACUS, LAWRENCE OF ARABIA, CLEOPATRA, even from THE AMERICANIZATION OF
EMILY. Heston's not at all bad in his accent, and he's terrifically
appealing in receding grayish hair and those formal duds -- particularly
his gold-on-black dress uniform. Yet once again his refusal to play out
the historical facts -- Gordon was gay, and probably more neurotic and
blood thirsty than T.E. Lawrence -- stunts the characterization.
(Beginning to see a phony "family values" pattern?) Judging from the
reviews of his stage appearances as Sir Thomas More in A MAN FOR ALL
SEASONS, he was persuasive as the myopic numskull stuck on God's mandates.
But then Heston made the fatal mistake of directing himself in a
TNT-production. What a complete shambles it is. The house of cards
playwright Robert Bolt built collapses; there's no distinction between the
reasonable assumption of moral laws and Heston's politics. As if
comeuppance, he becomes a man of no season. 
        EL CID is the movie most of Heston's fans and many lovers of epics
have enthusiastically embraced. For good reason: he's at his most
chivalrous. In this present age of misogyny, watching his Cid refuse to be
vanquished by or turn ugly over his love's avenging duty is reassuring;
it's meant to be noble, and honorable, and it's both, but it's also
something of a resurrection of sexual chemistry: the Cid's and Chimene's
loin lust will not be tamed. Under Mann's direction and the marvellous
lighting by cinematographer Robert Krasker, much of this hormonal alchemy
is transmuted through framed posing; and it is in the barn, minutes before
intermission, that they are finally relieved of their prolonged
pentupness. It's the the healthiest sequence in the entire movie, with
Loren at her most relaxed. Smart observers, and readers of Heston's book,
will also note that there's a discernible tension between the two stars
during most of the first half. If Heston's account is to be trusted, it
came about because "All in all, the most trying time with an actress I can
ever recall. Mind you, (Loren) is not a bitch...just more star than pro."
In turn, Loren says not a word about Heston in her own book, and she's not
the only actress to pointedly ignore him: Ava Gardner chose the silent
routine in her bio. But watching Loren opposite Mr. Clean makes you
believe her intuition early on picked up the need to create some friction
because without it, their characters wouldn't spark. Mr. Clean wouldn't
admit it, but Loren's gambit helps him enormously; this is his only
performance in any of his epics in which the audience senses that he isn't
more in love with his enemies or horses than with his leading ladies.
        The Cid's other highly attractive virtue is his selfless
righteousness. For example, it's fact that when he recaptured Valenica
from the Emirs, he did not accept the crown of the city, as was demanded
by his followers, but instead, in order to unite Spain against the
invaders, took it in the name of King Alfonso, who had previously banished
him into exile because he publicly humiliated the King into swearing that
he had no part in the (real) assassination of his brother Sancho. Yet
here's where the movie and what's known about the royal family gets
factually shaky: when Ferdinand died, he willed that his empire be divided
into three parts for his sons, Sancho, Alfonso and Garcia. In the movie,
he wills to Sancho, Alfonso and daughter Dona Urraca, and never once is
Garcia's name uttered. History records no will to a daughter. The script
changed Garcia (who was in fact killed in a power grab by Alfonso) to
Urraca for dramatic tension, and it is at her feet that Sancho's death
lay. The writers, Philip Yordan and Fredric M. Frank, a pseudonym for
blacklisted Ben Barzman, who also worked on THE TEN COMMANDMENTS and THE
FALL OF THE ROMAN EMPIRE, spiced her up by suggesting that she had the
incestuous hots for Alfonso, and may have had a thing for the Cid as well.
(Historians interested in the private lives of these figures report the
Cid was the most handsome man of his time, and that by the age of 20 he
was already knighted, and that Chimene was a cousin to the royal family.)
As Urraca, French actress Genevieve Page, looking like an embittered Elke
Sommer, does what she can to insinuate the sinister (her clipped English
helps), but, though this movie has been "fully restored," there's either
reluctance on Mann and the writers's parts to dive deeper into her or that
scenes were cut. This happens to Frank Thring too: though his brief
moments are comic relief -- he's like the Australian version of Jay
Robinson -- surely there should be more to him than what we get. (Still
short of tongue, looking grotesquely rotund with his bald head and chin
down to there, Thring played The Collector in MAD MAX BEYOND THUNDERDOME.)
The legend of the Cid as incorruptible probably isn't quite true, either:
he was a soldier of fortune-opportunist who fought on the sides of both
Christians and Moslems, and was richly rewarded. Only when the North
African Emirs threatened to overtake Spain did he see his heroic duty of
uniting Spain. Though the movie emblemizes the oft-repeated legend of
Rodrigo -- that he fell as a result of a battle-inflicted wound and rode
off into history strapped, dead but open-eyed, on a white horse --
historians record that he actually died four years after defeating the
Emirs in Valenica. His death at 49 is said by biographers to have been
brought on by grief and shame over the huge numbers of casualties it took
to do so. The Cid is buried at the cathedral in Burgos.
        If Elizabeth Taylor is contemporary, out of her vocal element as
the Queen of the Nile or Shakespeare's Katharina, Sophia Loren seems much
at home in antiquity; her stressed, emphatic English befits the colloquial
language of epics. Like Heston, it's her size and voice -- they emit a
transitory authority. It's only when we think about some of what she says
do we have misgivings: "Moors? You let Moors live?" (Every once in a while
she sounds like Gina Lollobrigida in Vidor's SOLOMON AND SHEBA.) She looks
gorgeous in costume: perhaps her best is the emerald green cote-hardie
over a white bliaut with embroidered amoeba-like leaves, topped with a
starched lifted collar, that she wears at the wedding banquet. (The
richest-looking wardrobe, however, belongs to Douglas Wilmer as brown
liquid-eyed Lord Moutamin.) And only on the big screen can we appreciate
her swaying hips as she, dressed in mournful black, struts through the
King's Court. Heston, once more, bitched that Loren refused to allow
herself to age, noting that the movie's time span covers more than twenty
years. Covering the criticize, Raf Vallone says to her, "Even all these
months in the dungeon have not marred your beauty." But she was smart to
resist the makeup effects: she's not there for anything other than her
desirable ornamentation. Borrowing from Helen of Troy, Loren's is a face
that launches a thousand men against the King-captor. 
        "Script, acting, images and music all act in perfect harmony,"
writes British author Derek Elley in THE EPIC FILM. Not exactly; the
script's cliches aren't fully saved by the cast's efforts because too
often the cliches are central to the movie's problems of conventionality.
There's one glaringly hokey sequence that somehow Heston, who fought with
Mann regularly, didn't consider worthy of fighting against: when the Cid,
in exile, comes across a leper named Lazarus. A genuflection to BEN-HUR,
it's appalling, and made even more so when up pops Chimene, who decides
she must support her stripped-of-wealth, sexually deprived husband. You
have to ask: how did she get to the locale as quickly as the Cid without
him knowing it? And sometimes the acting isn't as large-scale as it is
anxious, over-wrought. But the right god and goddess are in awfully fine
harmony with the imagery, music and sound effects. Miklos Rozsa's orgasmic
score, notes Elley, was originally written to cover almost 100% of the
film, but Mann discovered in Verna Fields (who would do the film editing
for BONNIE AND CLYDE and JAWS) a gifted sound technician: her matchless
ear for a slap with a glove, for dueling swords, galloping horses,
convinced Mann to eliminate over an hour of music. What survives is more
than enough. Rozsa, who won an Oscar for BEN-HUR and died in 1995, went to
Madrid to research with Nobel Prize-winning historian Dr. Ramon Menendez
Pidal, who introduced the composer to the 12th Century cantigas of Santa
Maria and the 13th Century cantigas of Alfonso X, which were inspired by
Phrygian culture. The score's most likely at its loving zenith, and its
simplest, when the Cid returns to the convent to meet, for the first time,
his twin daughters, and when Chimene puts her hand to his scar. Excluding
script convention, the movie's most troublesome element is in the actual
sound recordings: in Heston's diary, he reported that as much as seventy
percent of the soundtrack would have to be redone, "something to do with
inconsistent Spanish current." What's amazing is that, in spite of the
echo of hollowness -- the lack of integrity that results from looping --
the results aren't harmful, as they definitely are in BARABBAS, probably
because of the decision to noisy up the soundtrack with stereophonic
blasts of Rozsa's frenzied score and the sound effects. Film editor Robert
Lawrence has one remarkable feat: during the joust for Calahorra, he not
only has to avoid showing the double used when a sword is swinging away at
the Cid's saddle, he also has to splice in Loren's reaction shots, which
were filmed weeks before. (You can tell: the lighting & wind effects in
the King's grand stand don't quite match the actual outdoor shots.) But
the binding used to wrap it all up is Robert Krasker's painstaking
photography, much of which could pass for paintings. The restoration
returns glorious moments like the first scene of the Cid and Chimene
together in the rotunda -- wherein the stars perform the greatest non-kiss
in movie history; the Cid, underneath the spiral staircase, bracing
himself against the very sword he used to kill Chimene's father; Chimene
sitting in her bed chamber on her wedding night; Ferdinand's
lying-in-state; the opening shot in the barn; the night scenes of Ben
Yussuf's's men riding their horses towards Valenica (the movie makers used
Peniscola) and his infantry banging its drums. There's not a single shot
in BEN-HUR that equals them. In retrospect, given that BEN-HUR remains the
most Oscar-awarded epic so far, the sentiment may come to be that EL CID
is the most egregiously neglected epic by the Academy. But thanks, Marty,
for returning to us foofs the gold we've long waited for.

Title
Review for Breathing Lessons (1994) (TV)
        If Joanne Woodward and James Garner, two of our most ingratiating 
performers, aren't enough to save the Hallmark Hall of Fame version of 
Anne Tyler's BREATHING LESSONS, then no one could. There's something about 
Tyler's work -- this Pulitzer prize winner and THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST -- 
that doesn't translate easily to the screen, and I think it has to do with 
Tyler's temperament as a writer: she loves the quirkiness of ordinary 
lives, and works gallantly via labored cadence to bring to her characters' 
fits, foibles and idiosyncrasies an enriching emotional humanity; she is 
the Little People's champion. Part of the fought-for joy in reading Tyler 
is the supreme confidence of her dialogue -- like when in TOURIST Sarah 
drops the neutrons on Macon, exploding with "You're ossified. You're 
encased. You're like something in a capsule." But it's also this kind of 
revelatory scolding that makes many of us fight extra-hard to get into her 
books: she can be a very chilly experience, a strange mix of Ann Beattie, 
Gail Sheehy's "Passages" and a whole lot of William Inge -- without the 
Freudian sexology. This is what's scary about Tyler's success -- she gets 
acclaim for seeing us as "lovably" muffled, psycho as well as 
sociologically. Tyler once said about the movie version of THE ACCIDENTAL 
TOURIST that there wasn't anything more to get out of it because there 
wasn't anything more to her characters. That's what's troubling about most 
of them -- they're not fleshed out, they're Word Perfect stuffocated, 
oozing with add-ons as seductive filler.  In "On Movies," 
Dwight Macdonald wrote a series of reviews under the chapter title 
"Kazanistan, Ingeland, and Williams, Tenn." If writing today, he'd update 
it to include "Tylerville" because she's got woman problems, too. What may 
be more surprising than anything else is that the literary set hasn't 
discovered that what they praise Tyler for -- her gentle touch, her 
compassion, her "inexhaustible observations" -- conceal what I think is a 
psychologically worrisome, perhaps subconscious dislike: her treatment of 
her female creations. Almost always the central women characters are 
mind-numbing chatterboxes; while steering clear of the monsters Williams 
knew how to breathe fire into -- because it would be unthinkable of her to 
ever allow her ladies to knowingly inflict psyche damage -- she revives 
Inge to a rather uncomfortable degree: they're wired to be "The Lights at 
the Top of the Stairs." We're supposed to see them as life forces beyond 
their everyday ordinariness, that when they touch other lives, they touch 
us. Unlike Tyler's legion of fans and the Pulitzer prize committee, I'm 
not moved, I'm annoyed. How could so many lovers of TOURIST not see that 
Muriel, the angel-catalyst to Macon's renewal, is most probably 
responsible for her son's psychosomatic illnesses? In BREATHING LESSONS we 
get genteel, interfering Maggie trying to get her daughter-in-law and 
granddaughter back into the fold, but not before a myriad of flashbacks 
(cut for the TV version), not before attending a funeral, not before a few 
rather stupid car accidents (the second of which is blessedly altered for 
the film) and not before a few embarrassing roadshow "little people" 
numbers. With some exceptions, Tyler doesn't seem to show affection for 
modern women; she's trapped in a time-warp.
        And no actress these days is more likewise trapped and more 
regularly miscast than Joanne Woodward. She's obviously the first choice 
among women authors to play educated scatterbrains and nincompoops -- her 
Maggie in BREATHING LESSONS, coming a short time after her Vinnie Miner in 
the TNT production of Alison Lurie's Pulitzer prize-winning FOREIGN 
AFFAIRS. Pulitzer prize winning male authors get her too: she did the 
smell-of-rot movie version of Paul Zindel's THE EFFECT OF THE GAMMA RAYS 
ON THE MAN-IN-THE-MOON MARIGOLDS and the highly theatrical TV version of 
Michael Cristofer's THE SHADOW BOX, both directed by Woodward's husband 
Paul Newman. She got stuck in the boo-goo of Inge's COME BACK LITTLE SHEBA 
in a TV adaptation, co-starring a very badly miscast Laurence Olivier. 
Newman directed her in yet another unnecessary remake of William's THE 
GLASS MENARGIE, which hadn't a prayer with that thing called Karen Allen 
as Laura. (I'm trying hard to remember Woodward in a recent or fairly 
recent performance that wasn't pre-"encased" -- her doctor in SYBIL, her 
braless sass in SHADOW BOX, perhaps parts of DO YOU REMEMBER LOVE? Have to 
go back thirty six years to recall a screen performance that really caused 
sparks to fly -- THE LONG HOT SUMMER and a year before that, in her 
memorable THE THREE FACES OF EVE. That's a long time to be idle.) Even 
more than in the remake of Inge's LITTLE SHEBA, Woodward in BREATHING 
LESSONS is Estelle Parsons as Shirley Booth; all the fussy, busy tricks 
and ticks are prefabbed "Hazel." The harder Woodward works at pulling off 
what are essentially unactable scenes, the more disbelieving she gets: 
she's watchable in the worst way -- compulsively. 
        Tyler's men seem never to be excessive verbalizers; instead, 
they're the quiet good men who tolerate the super-exasperating nonsense of 
the women in their lives. In BREATHING LESSONS, James Garner is a chronic 
user of Ann Landers-isms -- "Wake up and smell the coffee." More in the TV 
version than the novel, there's a touch of Andy Rooney in Garner; with a 
bad dye job but looking quite fit, he's less picture framer than retired 
newscaster, and he makes it seem absolutely natural to bring out a deck of 
cards in a church and play Solitaire. In thinking it over, BREATHING 
LESSONS is rather like an Andy Rooney essay -- elongated and without the 
humor. But Rooney would never have stood for the fact that, at the end, 
the film makers change Maggie's psychological need for ice cream to 
yogurt. Ira-Rooney would drop a Landers -- "Wake up and taste the fudge 
ripple."  

Title
Review for Heart of Darkness (1994) (TV)
        Factoids about Joseph Conrad and his HEART OF DARKNESS, the 
famous tale first published in a collection entitled "Youth" in 1902:  
Born in Russian-occupied Poland in 1857, Conrad acquired a wide-eyed 
fascination with the sea from his father; orphaned b 12 (both parents 
died of hardship), he left Poland at 16 and headed to Marseille, from 
where, for four years, he sailed on French vessels, dabbled with 
"legitimiste" causes of certain French and Spanish pretenders, flopped at 
financial enterprises, and  en had a love affair that brought to him the 
brink of suicide. Needing to escape France for these and other reasons, 
he hopped aboard an English freighter -- The Mavis -- without much 
knowledge of the English language but in short time he conquered it,  
came a master mariner, and a naturalized British subject by 1886. Until 
1894, when he retired from his travels and married an Englishwoman (and 
went on to become the father of two boys), Conrad sailed the entire 
Mediterranean, and onto Australia, the In an Ocean, Singapore, Borneo, 
the China seas, South America, the South Pacific, South Africa, and, 
places to be featured prominently in his writings, to the Malay 
Archipelago and up the Congo River, where he was stricken (and never 
fully recovered) from  ver and dysentery. Conrad didn't start writing 
until he was 37; his writing was done in English -- his fourth language, 
after Russian, Polish and French. Though he had received extraordinary 
praise from other writers like H. G. Wells and Henry James for is early 
works -- "Almayer's Folly" (1895), "An Outcast of the Islands" (1896), 
"The Nigger of the 'Narcissus'" (1897), "Tales  of Unrest" (1898) and 
"Lord Jim" (1900) -- he never made much money from his writings. (Two 
novels -- "The Inheritors" and "R ance" -- were collaborations with 
editor-critic Ford Madox Ford, who would later break down to famed 
muckraker George Seldes over publishers re-issuing editions of both books 
without his name appearing as co-writer.)
        Conrad had a physically torturous time getting his prose on 
paper: when his masterwork "Nostromo" was published in 1904, he said that 
it was "an achievement upon which my friends may congratulate me as upon 
recovery from a dangerous illness." The analog is neither false nor 
exaggerated: while in the process of writing, and often at a work's 
completion, he'd suffer severe flare-ups of rheumatic gout. Some critics 
suspect his illnesses were psychosomaticly induced: as writer, Conrad, 
like James, was atte ting to dive into the unexplored darkness of 
psychology, fictionalizing the craze of Freud but through their own 
experiences. Unlike James, and unlike Melville, to whom he's sometimes 
been compared, Conrad's visions of the human condition -- the complex 
ies, pessimism of his characters' consciences and souls, the estrangement 
brought on by isolation, guilts, fears and sometimes courage -- are 
literature derived from the challenge of a foreign language. While it's 
true that the mazey chronology of his s ries can be off-putting, 
sometimes irritatingly because, as in HEART OF DARKNESS, supporting 
characters are unnamed, and often the florid prose is thicker than our 
palettes are used to, almost a hundred years later we're still in awe of 
how his command   English narrative blooms of mystery and psycho and 
moral perceptions. HEART OF DARKNESS has the beauty of language 
comparable to Joyce's "The Dead" and Dylan Thomas's "Under Milk Wood" -- 
that is, a language of beauty for voices. 
        For many more years than movie makers have wanted to bring 
Malcolm Lowry's "Under the Volcano" and Paul Bowles' "The Sheltering Sky" 
to the screen they've wanted to film HEART OF DARKNESS. The late John 
Huston managed to make both UNDER THE VOLCANO and THE DEAD; in the case 
of the former, he was only able to bring a safe literal translation to 
Lowry's sloshed, toxic voluminosity, and in the latter he seemed to 
impress a whole lot of Kaelettes with what looked like an invitation to 
an Eveni  of "Amateur Hour" Finals, until the very ending, when Donal 
McCann, off screen to boot, brings Joyce to glorious life. (Only 83 
minutes in length, it seems three times that long.) Bernardo Bertolucci 
seemed to be having a Mass for the Dysenterics said  ring his version of 
THE SHELTERING SKY, when perhaps what might have been celebrated was one 
for sexual obfuscation. And, as most everyone knows, Francis Ford Coppola 
used Conrad's Kurtz in HEART to moralize against the American 
intervention in Vietnam   APOCALYSE NOW. Despite the expensive, 
impressive panoramas, Coppola couldn't make the kind of connection 
between what Conrad was cautioning about and the Vietnam War. As I see 
it, Conrad's Kurtz, the ivory hunter turned jungle Messiah, is -- and it 
nee 't be the author's intentions -- paralleling the Cortes expedition 
into Mexico: awaiting Kurtz was a tribe of black Montezumas, who, like 
the Aztec emperor, believed as destiny that a God was to come. The 
Vietnamese were never looking for a "White God t rule over the dark 
hordes." 
        Directors who wanted to make HEART OF DARKNESS had two obstacles: 
getting the financing and producing a filmable script. No major movie 
company saw audience interest in a gloomy, diseased-mind horror story, 
and they readily backed up their fears by pointing out the dismal box 
office of other Conrad-based movies: AN OUTCAST OF THE ISLANDS, thought 
to be the best of his stories on screen; the bummer LORD JIM, starring 
Peter O'Toole; and Ridley Scott's THE DUELLISTS, based on Conrad's 
mini-novella "T  Duel," its only virtue being how it looks. The larger 
problem is in getting a coherent, playable adaptation, because, despite 
the persistent acclaim for the story, and all the scholarly 
interpretation, Conrad creates in Kurtz an astonishingly weak, vag  
megalomaniac -- a mouse. Academicians have been remiss in not pointing 
out that according to Marlow's first person narrative, he saw that 
Kurtz's "soul was mad. Being alone in the wilderness, it had looked 
within itself, and by heavens! I tell you, it  d gone mad...I saw the 
inconceivable mystery of a soul that knew no restraint, no faith, and no 
fear." Eleven paragraphs later, Marlow says Kurtz "was an impenetrable 
darkness. I looked down at him as you peer down at a man who is lying at 
the bottom of  precipice where the sun never shines." Oh, really? How can 
we the readers "peer" at what Marlow is describing when what he's 
describing isn't there? As shrewdness, a literary and psychological 
construct, Conrad turns the tables on his own promise of an vil vision by 
not delivering; this journey into a blackened soul is all in the 
imagination. This the major frustration of the multitude of directors and 
screenwriters who have attempted to conjure up movie imagery worthy of 
Kurtz's psychosis, of Conrad' nebulousness. The late Orson Welles had the 
most intriguing concept: he wanted to voice over an unseen Marlow and 
play Kurtz.
        The risk-takers over at TNT-Turner Pictures believed they could 
get a version of HEART OF DARKNESS made, and, perhaps on the strength of 
his abilities at occult and visual decay in DON'T LOOK NOW, and his 
CASTAWAY, which is something like an English Couple Robinson, accepted 
Nicolas Roeg as director. For what was accomplished, we have to call 
Roeg's version respectable, and though I would resist it as full praise, 
faithful. One immediate success: Captain Charlie Marlow, pl ed by Tim 
Roth, and for the reason we wouldn't have thought possible: in spite what 
seems everyone's obsession with the madman, in the written tale as well 
as the movie, Marlow does not get overshadowed by the demented Kurtz. 
With a voice at the beginni 's narration that suggests Daniel Day-Lewis's 
Fryer in THE BOUNTY, and confirming that this is indeed a play for 
articulation, Roth is what keeps us watching; his thin frame, large nose 
and sun-bleached hair combine to give his performance a strength th  
oughtn't be there, because Roeg's direction is, elsewhere, soft as 
room-temperature butter. More to the point: we as viewers sometimes don't 
know exactly what Marlow's doing up that river, in that everyone else 
suspects -- probably knows -- that Kurtz  s gone bonkers. (More than one, 
overly-attired White Man confirms "there have been rumors, rumors...") 
But Roth's curiosity holds us to him: maybe as actor he needed to see 
what was in store for him as much as wanted to see how Roeg would visual 
Kurtz's emonic craziness. In fact, the movie was filmed in exact 
sequence, to help build the dread, the fear, the encroaching evil. (Only 
there isn't any persuasive dread, fear, evil.) Watching Roth's Marlow, 
especially when he smears blood on his face, I thoug  of Werner Herzog's 
anguish in the documentary on the making of his FITZCARRALDO entitled 
BURDEN OF DREAMS, which would be a fine subtitle to the years-long quest 
to make HEART. And the maxi-thin FITZCARRALDO seeps into our thoughts 
even before this, wh  we see Marlow and the village blacks retrieve the 
sunken boat that will be used to seek out Kurtz. 
        Conrad knew, of course, that our curiosities would be aroused by 
what is a tease of a look into (at the time unchartered) depths of 
psychology, and don't we all know that literary classes spend most of 
their time discussing Kurtz. And since APOCALYPSE  W, which unfortunately 
TNT used as a come-on in their ads, Marlon Brando has become so 
identified with the character that not only do students "see" Kurtz 
"Brandofied," actors who might play the character probably do as well. 
Hence, we get John Malkovic  wrapped in what looks like a raw silk 
curtain, reduced to a half-tub version of an idol. Though Brando's voice, 
which seems to be getting weaker and more whiny as the years pass, has 
its semi-deranged effects, what's mesmerizing is his piggish grotesqu 
ess; it's scary, all right, but not Conrad-scary. (Marlow describes Kurtz 
as "not much heavier than a child.") Malkovich's voice doesn't have any 
resonance, either, and without that, he doesn't have anything else to 
fall back on, he can't get Kurtz to e n visually penetrate. All said and 
done, the only depth Conrad could supply about how power corrupts, how it 
infects with psychological horror, is through his stylishly arched prose 
-- and it's Marlow's verbal account that supplies whatever depth there   
because Kurtz speaks less than two hundred words. So it's no surprise -- 
may even be Conrad's Revenge -- that this is where Roeg and screen 
adapter Benedict Fitzgerald get trapped: excepting four lines, nothing 
they've given Malkovich to say is in the  vella; they've written for him 
such phonied up mediocrity that we might believe they've borrowed whole 
sentences from introductions published in various editions of the story, 
pedantry about "light, darkness, the abyss." In trying to pin Kurtz down, 
we  t this: "There is no more detestable creature in nature than the one 
who runs away from his demons" -- not once but twice. There might have 
been the chance that this Conrad-like fakery could have been forceful had 
Malkovich "discoursed" with a voice tha Marlow recalls "rang deep to the 
very last. It survived his strength to hide in the magnificent folds of 
eloquence the barren darkness of his heart." Malkovich's doesn't; and 
he's limp, soggy -- as if the humidity is more the disease that kills him 
inst d of the illness which inevitably does. The way he baby-shuffles 
around his thatched, ornate hut, you'd swear he wasn't so much dying as 
recuperating from his Camilled Port in THE SHELTERING SKY. But the larger 
mistake is putting an American actor into  e part: this is a role for 
searing craziness, for the kind of actor who can rattle our moral cages, 
something we don't train our own actors to do. (Unlike the Brits, ours 
either go flat, weary, or do a lot of screaming.) Malkovich can get by 
with his ma uerades in an Eastwood picture like IN THE LINE OF FIRE and 
he somehow worked commanding magic against his own unattractiveness in 
DANGEROUS LIAISONS, and brought a pleasing surliness to his photographer 
in THE KILLING FIELDS. Physically at least, he sh ld have been able to 
mirror "the ivory face, the expression of sombre pride, ruthless power, 
(the) craven terror" of Kurtz. Instead, he's become a master at measured 
prostitution, as seen in that gagger PLACES OF THE HEART; he grants his 
favors arbitrar y. He's not Conradian here, he's Capotesque.
        After Roth, there's a second, albeit easier success -- the use of 
Belize as a substitute for the Congo. You don't have to be anything more 
than an armchair traveller to know that Belize isn't Africa, and some 
will point out that tropical settings pract ally film themselves, as 
we've seen in APOCALYSE NOW, THE AFRICAN QUEEN and THE MOSQUITO COAST, 
but Roeg and photographer Anthony Richmond come very close to Marlow's 
view: "Going up that river was like travelling back to the earliest 
beginnings of the  rld, when vegetation rioted on the earth and the big 
trees were kings. A great silence, an impenetrable forest. The air was 
warm, thick, heavy, sluggish. There was no joy in the brilliance of 
sunshine. The long stretches of the water-way ran on, deserte  into the 
gloom of over-shadowed distances." About the only things they don't get 
-- the avoidance of which is right -- are the "silvery sand-banks hippos 
and alligators." The substitution is most effective when, drenched in a 
twilight fog, the boat is  ing closed in on by the warrior-clad tribe, 
some of whom wear headdresses that could be out of THE CREATURE FROM THE 
BLACK LAGOON and PREDATOR. Roeg succeeds in getting the beautiful Iman to 
look like "a wild and gorgeous apparition" whose "face had a t gic and 
fierce aspect of wild sorrow and of dumb pain mingled with the fear of 
some struggling, half-shaped resolve." The only fun: The actor who plays 
"Alphonse Degrief," a name that's perhaps a planted joke about the 
difficulties encountered while mak g the movie, wears what appears to be 
a Napoleon-like nightshirt. 
        Purists have insisted that HEART OF DARKNESS is intrinsically 
unfilmable, that there's no way to visually record Conrad's inner sanctum 
of dementia. They've said the same about UNDER THE VOLCANO and THE 
SHELTERING SKY, and, in looking over the results, they may be right. 
Arguably movies are, for the most part, intrinsic common denominators -- 
by their very nature they dumb down original source material. This 
process can be exacerbated by movie makers wanting to secure the largest 
possible aud nce, and even if they don't, their backers do. And it's 
often compounded by the movie makers inaccurately weighing an audience's 
interest in the source. These are some of the reasons why UNDER THE 
VOLCANO doesn't work as movie as it might as opera; the  dience is 
pre-judged not to be as interested in Lowry's hallucinatory verbiage as 
it would be about a literal story that doesn't make one damned bit of 
sense. As opera,the torrent of psycheboozydelic words could be showcased 
by a Greek chorus and we wou  have been able to accept the central 
character's dumb-dumb wife as operatic convention. And yes, HEART OF 
DARKNESS has strong possibilities as opera: it may be the only medium to 
give credence to Kurtz's megalomania, allowing for a show-stopping aria a 
political and psycho caveat. Where but in opera can you turn a mouse into 
a giant?

Title
Review for Paper, The (1994)
        I don't believe but a minute of Ron Howard's THE PAPER. It's
typical Howard -- showing his general competence as a storyteller and 
once more showing his insistence on making movies for the boobgoisie. If
Howard had an adult movie maker's vision and audacity, THE PAPER would be
about what's eating away at our media faster than an unchecked cancer --
the frightening Power PC speed of tabloiditis. But Howard's too
pedestrian, too ready to avoid the very issues this and some of his other
movies bring up and instead goes in for goofy fantasies: in his puerile
confusion about the real condition of journalism, he's dispensing
retrograde honor to a profession that lost its way -- way long ago. Giving
benefit of doubt he's even aware there's a very powerful danger in what's
happening in our press, the question may be -- Is Howard afraid of
tackling it? He drags everything down to a suburban ha-ha teenage level;
like James Brooks in BROADCAST NEWS, he codifies sitcom behavior. When one
half of the audience for THE PAPER is listening to the other half laugh at
scenes that don't seem to be very funny, it's like edited-in canned
audience responses used by TV comdies to cover up their emptiness. 
        The news business has become the nation's favorite whipping boy --
as well as whipper -- by the very nature of its pervasiveness. It's our
most publicly accessible, bottomless pit -- the ultimate voracious
consumer. If we attack it for its excessive abuse and callous intrusion,
we must also remember that it's often asked to be or condoned as the
national intruder -- our communal "private eye." The current recklessness
of media is the rage of disseminating fractured information: it's
"Gotcha!" before the facts. All of us have the same conflicting feelings
about the press, and especially TV news. As a nation reeling in a case of
the hates over just about everything and probably hating the press more
than anything else, we paradoxically "love" it because it makes complex
issues simplistic and debase. We don't have to think if headlines and TV
news shows scream out allegations of wrongdoings, cover-ups, scandals; the
preponderance of gossip, rumor, innuendo, grudges make it seem that
whoever is alleged to have committed a crime or violation is guilty first,
innocent -- if that even matters nowadays -- later.  (Like the apparent
joy in branding the First Lady guilty of phantom crimes.) We love being
glued to the box during a crisis or scandal or tragedy, absorbed by its
immediacy, how we're "right there," as we were during the Persian Gulf
War, or the scorching of the Waco cult compound, or the Oklahoma bombing.
Our adrenaline is really pumping -- and particularly true in a live
interview. Those of us who saw the original broadcast-exchange between Dan
Rather and George Bush in 1988, or watched the Senate Confirmation
Hearings of Clarence Thomas, felt a heightened sense of response, of
danger, because we didn't know what direction the interview or hearings
would take. (It is this element of risk, of the unknown, of intoxicating
provocation that no other news medium can match. Radio is close, but it
can't provide truth-or-lie-or-demeanor-telling properties the way the
camera usually can.) What we hate about news isn't merely our suspicions
about those in the business -- that "Gotcha!" is replacing hard news and
real facts -- or our fears concerning our growing voyeuristic cravings for
the sensational, as in the Thomas-Anita Hill, Gennifer Flowers, Magic
Johnson, Michael Jackson, Tanya Harding cases, it's also our guilt in
allowing ourselves to be so damned consumed by the titillating drama of
news. Like we were during the trial of William Kennedy Smith vs. "I'm not
a blue blob," or the Bobbitt thing, or the on-going mockery of justice of
the O.J. SImpson fiasco. 
        Many of us feel guilty when we don't watch the unfolding of a news
"event" -- afraid that we're going to miss something. Until very recently,
some of us even felt guilt about missing a nightly newscast or two. It's
the need to get it now and not later, in a newspaper, because by the time
we read about something in the morning edition, the box has already
updated that something; it's a matter of instant discretion -- the
zapper's power -- because the growth of TV news has permitted choice; it's
also subjective, aesthetic and cosmetic -- selectively allowing specific
TV anchors or reporters or commentators into our homes because they appeal
to us. Some women fantasize about suave Peter Jennings; outdoorsy males
respond to Tom Brokaw's Lands End quality; college-age fattie bigots
worship Rush; technocrats mainline with CSPAN. We're picky about
newspapers and magazines and their writers too, but we can better control
whatever our responses; we don't have to fight sensory overload. Yet it is
the very addictive nature of the "overload" that compels us and the
programmers and editors onward and thereby permitting a proliferation of
TV tabloids, ideological talk shows, informercials, a rush of speculation
in newspapers and, the latest kick, online forums. News has become
stimulation, visceral, but without a filter of veracity. Is it any wonder
that we've become a nation of instant paranoids, panicked not on the basis
of facts but over rumors and gossip packaged as factoids? Murderess Susan
Smith claimed a black man kidnapped her two children and Newtie invects
implicit racism as election ploy. CNBC's effete flabbermouths are probably
more responsible for any week's stock market dive than the Fed and actual
investors. Is it exaggeration to say news has become dangerous to our
national health? If dangerous now, what will we call it when the 500
channel nightmare arrives? To keep those channels profitable, there will
be a new crisis or scandal manufactured every hour. 
        How often have we heard the media defend themselves over their
moral infractions and insensitivity and intrusions by saying that they're
constitutionally guaranteed freedom to "report"? Had Ron Howard had given
us a newspaper that once had a tradition of solid reporting, of
respectability, and had to resort to using tabloid tricks to bring in the
revenues, there might have been something beyond fantasy, something
hopeful, in the way THE PAPER climaxes, but more than that he might have
looked into the future: he might have guessed that soon the Supreme Court
will re-address the issue of the freedom of the press. Tthe Court is going
to go after total disregard of the facts in reportage; it will recognize
that, some years back, when decreeing that public figures are fair game,
it set into motion a freedom of irresponsibility. That's why we can get
Xmas time sex scandals concocted by misogynists like David Brock; that's
why there's never an apology from the press over such stories that can not
be proved, only alleged. That's why we're getting Gutter Encounters of the
Weird Kind about Whitewater: Rush on TV repeating groundless rumors that
Vince Foster was murdered in a "safe house" rented by Hillary Rodham
Clinton. That's why we're getting scum like Jerry Falwell using a
president to publicly preach hate as a family value. Scarier still is that
perople are willing to accept fabrication over fact, as Paula Jones' money
hunger confirms. The press has never been innocent, yet in recent years
it's gotten intolerably bloody and trashy. Can we pinpoint a reason why? I
think so: When sleepyhead Ronnie was elected in 1980, one of the first
demolition jobs he instructed his henchmen to perform was on the FCC's
"Fairness Doctrine." Basically, this guideline demanded, with TV in
particular, equal time for opposing sides on issues. Ronnie didn't like
that because it prevented his Morning in America propaganda from being
promulgated as gospel. After his re-election, he managed to get the
equality mandates downgraded to voluntary and national and local public
affairs programs shifted the emphasis of fairness to screaming
contentiousness: the exchange of views became ever less civilized and ever
more Buchanan-loaded and Rushy. One notes with deep regret that though
there are minimal efforts to maintain a balance of opinion, the scales
have tipped to hypertensive demagoguery. The demise of the fairness
doctrine also meant the death of hundreds of locally-produced public
affairs shows, which at one time served the community well in that large
numbers of the citizenry got on TV. What's left of these kinds of programs
is now exclusively the domain of the hacks of local newspapers who write
unreadable columns and send out correspondence written on notes with their
pictures plastered on them, and the "nobodies" have moved to cable access
channels where, to say the least, production values and sometimes
transmissions are poor and viewership small. Something else happened as a
result of the lack of enforcement of the fairness doctrine: a deluge of 
TV tabloid exposes that don't even bother to attempt to explain the
absence of the "other side"; we're getting more and more on the so-called
prestige newscasts and magazine shows a virulent form of vigilante
journalism -- indicting and convicting people on air for only alleged
crimes, especially child abuse crimes, that, with closer inspection, never
happened. (It was TV that caused California to spend over $120 million to
presecute without conviction the McMartin Pre-School case.) We get
televised show trials that pretend to be "fair," but are monuments to
horrible exploitation and very likely unconstitutionally censored. I'm
thinking specifically about the rape trial of William Kennedy Smith. 
        Acknowledging that only two out of 250,000,000 really know what
happened, the trial was, in the final analysis, a mockery of equal
justice. CNN and other broadcasters decided that not only would they cover
Patricia Bowman's face with the infamous "blue blob," but would do as much
as they could to keep her name from being revealed. Spokesmen for the
networks said that they were honoring so-called "shield laws," which in
effect are supposed to be civilized protections of privacy for alleged
rape victims. I even heard a few say that they were forced by Florida law
to protect Bowman's identity. It didn't matter that the very shield law
they used to defend their actions was in fact declared unconstitutional,
and therefore, during the trial, not law. It gets worse: the media did not
extend to the defendant the same level of privacy. As a member of the
Kennedy Clan, he became a "public figure" who could be freely smeared
without fear of litigation. The press, at the conniving behest of a Betty
Anderson-Harrington, whose endless string of men, parties, drug-taking,
abortions, mental history were community knowledge, made a private man a
figure of obscene public abuse. Watching as much of the trial as was
televised, I'd have voted for acquittal simply because of Bowman's
performance. Not that I believed Smith more -- his demeanor drove me nuts
and there's every likelihood he's at least as good a liar as his accuser.
But there's every reason to believe that Bowman wanted not only the
"shield" protection but also the show trial; it would give her the
opportunity to audition for the her own story: PALM BEACH PLACE. Her first
breakdown was moving, and the second almost as touching, but by the third
cue-prompt, there was a surprising actor's polish in her voice -- even the
sniffles were too grand. (I kept wanting to blow my nose.) Then she showed
a fatally clumsy intellectual side -- having answered "I don't know or
remember" 162 times. She wasn't helped when the prosecution's star witness
admitted to taking $40,000 from "A Current Affair" and falsified under
oath as to when she first met the plaintiff, and it didn't help Bowman
much either that her heavy drinking and popping of muscle relaxants the
evening of the alleged crime were disclosed. Booze and relaxants -- legal
kicks for the trust fund set. Did the media pay much attention this, or to
the witness for the prosecution's repeated lies, or to the lack of
physical evidence of any forceful assault, or the sheer mind-boggling fact
that during the time of the alleged rape, nine people were sleeping in the
Kennedy compound, which has no air conditioning? No, they went on their
merry way with the protective blobs and rumors that Bowman, having lost
the trial, would likely file a civil suit for unspecified damages. She
didn't; and one look at her PrimeTime and Larry King appearances tells us
why.
        The popular, sometimes accurate perception that most if not all
news reporters are hard-boiled or bloodthirsty -- or, in some cases are as
corrupt as the corrupters they report on -- probably got started back with
the late 19th century London newspaper wars, many of them centering on
Jack the Ripper, and the feeling was reinforced during the American yellow
journalism wars engaged in by William Randolph Hearst and Joseph Pulitzer.
And renewed by the proliferation of lurid sex & crime tabloids and cheapie
magazines that displayed boobs and bums and dismembered guts on their
front pages during the 50s. In no small way, Ben Hecht and Charles
MacArthur's THE FRONT  PAGE, a play that has been steadily performed since
it first opened back in 1928 and has been filmed at least four times, has
done its share to perpetuate the perceptions by glorifying them in a macho
reverie. The almost-validating bite of their play is that journalism
wouldn't be fair without some lowdown hanky panky. Movie makers in recent
years haven't given the press a clean bill of health either: ALL THE
PRESIDENT'S MEN, which on the surface looks like a salute to journalism,
eventually taxes a fair-minded audience's receptiveness by not only using
our national hatred of Nixon but also by using the mysterious "Deep
Throat" as method and news source -- subterfuge that, in retrospect, fails
to earn an acquittal: doesn't the accused have the right to face his
accuser? NETWORK, the bitchkrieg that admonishes TV-induced paranoia
that's a 1976 look into our present; ABSENCE OF MALICE, ridiculing a
reporter's naivete; THE  YEAR OF LIVING DANGEROUSLY," a slam against a
reporter's desire to make a name for himself; UNDER FIRE, depicting the
suicidet of reporters when they take sides in political battles; and THE
PAPER dealing with tabloid economics vs. twenty four hour suppression of
facts. Naturally these films aren't acceptable to most responsible
journalists -- they mistakenly think they're above the moral muddle, like
Helen Thomas, who one day suggests Hillary should hold a news conference
to explain Whitewater and then turn around and publicly attack the first
lady on CSPAN for doing what she suggested. 
         At the height of Joseph McCarthy's rampage against supposed
American Communists in the 50s, the climate in newspaper and radio
journalism -- TV not having quite come into its own, although it played
the key national part in McCarthy's demise -- was so rotted and feverish
with paranoia that lives were daily sacrifices to the vicious killing
machines of yellow headlines. Only when it became clear that McCarthy
could be broken by the soft-spoken rebukes of rational voices did the
press then turn on him, vilifying him for exactly what they so freely
practiced without fear of retribution. Arguably the nation absolved the
press of its role in whipping up a frenzied battle over the semantics of
political freedom because it shared in the guilt. Slanted journalism,
according to the ultra-conservatives, hit an apex during the Vietnam War
-- especially television's coverage of it. No war before and probably no
war after -- as proved by the Persian Gulf episode -- has been more
documented by the lie-detecting camera; the daily bloodletting images of
the Michael J. Arlen-termed "Living Room War," shown on ABC, NBC and CBS,
betrayed the weekly General William Westmoreland pep rallies that promised
victory. The Agnew speeches, jerked off by shock troopers Patrick
Buchanan, and William Safire, were designed to counter the rising
revulsion and attack those, mostly in the press who were against the war,
as "nattering nabobs of negativity," "pampered prodigies of the radical
liberals," and all the verbal attacks were peppered with codes like
"pusillanimous," "sniveling," "eunuchs," "effete soobs." After the
assassinations of John and Robert Kennedy and Martin Luther King, Jr., and
after the fascist Chicago Democratic Convention, "The Time of Illusion" --
the title of Jonathan Schell's collection of political pieces originally
written for The New Yorker -- came to a halt for most press outlets. (Only
temporarily: softball reporting got retrofitted for Reagan, and would
again go soft during the actual bombing duration of Bush's tantrum against
Saddam.) The gulf between country right or wrong and a national conscience
would only enlarge when Nixon's Watergate adventure destroyed him. But
audiences, at least at this writing, may not have evolved as much as the
technologies of TV communications: voters may not fail to recognize a
scoundrel, but that doesn't mean they won't vote for one: the
Republican'ts recently elected a prevaricating, deadbeat daddy as House
Majority Leader who once served his former wife divorce paper while she
was in the throes of a serious battle with cancer.
        Actors as anchors, editors or reporters aren't exactly
caricatures, or impersonations; they're more like examples of the fear of
being hip. You almost hear the actors anxiously half-giggling, "Are we
getting it right?" Jane Fonda couldn't get in right in THE CHINA SYNDROME.
Neither Sigourney Weaver in EYEWITNESS nor Christine Lahti in JUST BETWEEN
FRIENDS got it right. Sally Field was a wipeout in ABSENCE OF MALICE and
Joanna Cassidy failed to get "radiospeak" down pat in UNDER FIRE. Mel
Gibson had the romantic fantasy but hardly the authority of a foreign
correspondent in THE YEAR OF LIVING DANGEROUSLY and Sam Waterston, looking
a little like D. H. Lawrence, was a Yale poseur as Pulitzer Prize winning
Sydney Schanberg in THE KILLING FIELDS.
        With receding hairline and toughened face, Glenn Close could play
a bean-counting managing editor, ala Katherine Graham, but not as Ron
Howard directs her in THE PAPER, and he allowed Michael Keaton to be too
scatterbrained a city editor to have the kind of righteous punch aimed
for. He'd make it as an editor for something as low as the New York Sun
but it's an insult that he'd be considered for anything more than a
janitorial position for a competing paper like the New York Sentinel,
which surrogates as the N.Y. Times. Only when Robert Duvall, as the Sun's
editor, flays into his own editorial pages filled with "columnists, guests
columnists and celebrity columnists," is there a bit of reality. (It's the
only time the silent half of the audience responded -- by cheering.) Maybe
it's me; I just can't seem to accept actors playing overly-familiar faces
or professions. The blurring of celebrity tends to discount whatever value
is left of the real professional journalist. This happened to Carl
Bernstein and Bob Woodward when Dustin Hoffman and Robert Redford play
them, respectively, in the moldy, chiaroscuristic ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN.
Somehow the movie fakery intensifies the often fake seriousness and
righteousness of the business of news. Perhaps this is why audiences felt
and still feel a charge from Peter Finch's Howard Beale in the bombastic
NETWORK, which earns masterpiece status compared to the snoozing BROADCAST
NEWS and the juvenile PAPER. Finch's rantings were manifestly rigged, and
the audience knew it, but the rigging was also premonitory and the
audience felt it. (Pauline Kael's most grievous error of perception is her
review of the movie, entitled "Hot Air.") Though Finch, William Holden and
Faye Dunaway weren't required to be anything other than Paddy Chayefsky's
conniptions about what the box was -- in fact, is -- turning all of us
into, they did it with such frenzied passion that the warnings,
particularly those expressed by Holden about the dangers of many of us
turning into Dunaway's Diana, have real resonance; we HAVE become little
Diana horrors. These actors have a rip-roaring good time (and so does the
audience) with dialogue actors kill for. What glorious diarrhea of the
hates! Despite a few passable one-liners, William Hurt in BROADCAST NEWS
seems frustrated by a lack of words -- he's constipated. He'd be right at
home in THE PAPER, in which the only bits of minimal interest take place
in the men's room.
        Andy  Rooney once described BROADCAST NEWS as "one of the best
movies I've ever seen," and, if that's not enough of a wound, inflicted
this: "As a writer, sitting there watching the movie, I was exultant, to
the point of tears, with (James Brooks') success in converting what was in
his head to paper and then to film...A movie director doesn't really want
good writing -- just a sheaf of papers that provide some notes and an
outline to keep in mind where to set up the cameras and what to tell the
actors to do...The best writers have, with a lot of exceptions which I
won't stop to note, never written for television or motion pictures. This
is partly because good writers are nervous about being associated with
what usually are considered to be second-class art forms, but also because
good writers don't know how to write for television or the movies, and
they're reluctant to expose their ignorance of something they don't
respect much, anyway." No reluctance on Rooney's part to expose his. And
clearly, in THE PAPER, in spite of the clever ads for Compaq, Multi-Sync
monitors and QuarkXPress, Howard isn't afraid to reveal his, either. The
one inescapable fact we can derive from the media's triumph of hype over
fact, shamelessness over decency is that ignorance is indeed bliss.
"Gotcha!" without responsibility, without accountability, is destroying
what moral value is left in journalism.                            

Title
Review for "Elizabeth R" (1971) (mini)
        Elizabeth I may have been the 16th Century's regal Mae West -- a
sexual tease who liked to have herself surrounded by pretty boy studs. She
loved playing the coquette, deliberating enticing her many suitors into
believing they had a chance to do more than kiss her hand and bow. The
royal vamping started early: at age 14, it was hotly rumored but never
proven that she consummated an affair with Lord Admiral Thomas Seymour.
(What's true is that their presumed sexless amorous play in and out of her
bedroom would lead to his arrogance and death.) As her charms manifested,
which included formidable intelligence (she spoke five languages) but not
true physical beauty, she thrived on as well as encouraged false flattery.
She selected "pets" and consorts like the Earl of Leicester (Robert
Dudley, her "Sweet Robin") and the Earl of Essex (Robin's stepson) because
they were unacceptable partners in marriage. She was steadfast throughout
her child-bearing years her resolute position that she'd never marry -- no
matter the long list of royal kings and princes who wished for marriagr
circle of council, who seldom let up on the need for her to give birth to
an heir. By all acceptable accounts, the queen remained a willed virgin
out of survival instincts. The bastard offspring of Henry VIII and the
beheaded Anne Boleyn -- scholar J.J. Scarisbrick calls the infant "the
most unwelcome royal daughter in English history" -- Elizabeth became
necessarily cognizant of her need to stay alive at the age of eight when
her stepmother, the beloved Catherine Howard, was also sent to the
chopping block. Shortly thereafter her brother Edward died prematurely and
she had to outfox a conspiracy lead by her Catholic half-sister Mary
Tudor's minions, who saw heresy in Elizabeth's Protestantism and mortal
threat to Mary's reign and succession. Not above the self-serving,
Elizabeth "converted" to Catholicism as a means by which she kept her
head, though such fears never -- not even during the more secure portion
of her reign -- dissipated: the murderous machinations of the Royals of
Europe and her own court's hangers-on precluded the feeling of safety.
Elizabeth understood that marriage and heir would not merely lessen her
own position, but would increase the likelihood of successful plots
against her. As Sir James Melville whispers into the queen's ear in part
two of ELIZABETH R, "For now you are both king and queen, but if you are
married, someone else would be king." Born out of the dread of the ax,
this Elizabeth, like Claudius some fifteen centuries before, survived by
the wisdom of political acrobatics. 
        As Elizabeth, Glenda Jackson benefits from the miniseries format
and the lack of media-recorded impressions; there's no shortage of time to
watch her grow from lion's cub about to be devoured by prey to lioness --
a feline whose ferocity ruled England for forty five years -- and no film
or tape or voice recordings to permit petty criticism. Well, maybe this
one little quibble: she's long in the tooth to attempt to play the queen
as teenager -- she looks a tad ridiculous trying to, and often she
resembles Washington political writer Elizabeth Drew, irregular teeth, bad
epidermis and all. But the moment Jackson starts to outwit her
conspirators and then dons the title with its powers of governance, any
misgivings are wiped out, any comparisons to Flora Robson or Bette Davis
sent straight away to the trash heap. Though Jackson's got the peremptory
gestures, the roaring fearsome voice and hardy physique for Imperialism --
and her preeminent hard-edged, semi-masculine aura helps magnify the
imagery (you get the chills as you watch her pull back an arrow during a
game of archery) -- she's agile enough as actress to pull off the
coquettish games that were so integral a part of Elizabeth I. She
convinces us that her beloved Robin and all the others were kept from the
royal bed chamber, feats borne out of the queen's own unnamed fears about
marriage. In ELIZABETH R, she confesses to Sussex, "I can't do it. Every
day, I am more and more afraid." Supposedly an actual quote from the
queen: "I hate the idea of marriage for reasons that I would not divulge
to a twin soul." Publicly she vacillated between anger at courtiers'
proposals and humor: when informed that Spain's Philip II in marriage
could visit occasionally, and then only for a brief time, she replies: "In
short, the perfect husband." Historians continue their fascination with
her fears: some suggest that her doctor discovered a "woman's infirmity";
Ben Jonson the playwright believed she had "a membrana on her, which made
her uncapable of man," and others surmise she could have suffered from
Rokitansky's syndrome -- a very shallow vaginal canal and an
underdeveloped uterus. (During her own time, the London gossip be that she
had a child by Robin; in Catherine de Medici's court, as shown in part
three of the series "Shadow of the Sun," a dwarf Elizabeth mocks rumor of
the queen with "I am too narrow for a man.") Whatever the impediments to
marriage, they're all guesses, and mine is that she recognized what sex
had done to her family and suffered severe trepidation over the potential
consequences; her public pride of virginity acted as shield by which she
could protect herself. The six teleplays comprising the series smartly
avoid any license to explication de texte but as one hears Jackson's queen
periodically proclaim in vainglory her state of purity, it's more than a
guess that the actress is using it as her character's nucleus. 
        Time has not much harmed the 1971 technique used for ELIZBAETH R:
using mostly video tape, there are a few jarring moments of film used for
the outdoor settings (this because of technical and lighting problems not
yet ironed out for tape), and perhaps the studio sets themselves are too
confining and overly dark, but it would only be a few years later when
Herbert Wise, who directed the second part of ELIZABETH R entitled "The
Marriage Game," would helm I, CLAUDIUS and perfect the use of video,
calibrating the actors to the settings in such a way that, especially with
Derek Jacobi's Claudius and Sian Phillip's Livia, the characterizations
would not be three dimensional but a 3D-like effect occurs: these
histsoric figures jump out at you, quelling the often irksome tape process
while at the same time aggrandizing it. Keith Michell as the king in THE
SIX WIVES OF HENRY VIII opened the doors to this kind of intimate TV guide
to traverse the maze of history, Jackson would bring the prestige of a
great actress to the emerging miniseries genre, and Jacobi would become
its ultimate pilot. Some of the casting in ELIZABETH R can vex you: as
Mary Tudor, Daphne Slater is mea-culping like Martha Scott crossed as Jean
Harris; David Collings the traitor Anthony Babington a male Maggie Smith;
Michael Williams' Duke of Alencon about as appealing as the frog Elizabeth
refers to him as; Stephen Murray as Francis Walsingham emblematic
stereotyping; and Robert Hardy's Earl of Leicester and Robert Ellis' Earl
of Essex far removed from what most of us would see as handsome beaux to
the queen. Inflecting as sharp as a serpent's toothache, Vivian Pickles
comes close to juvenilizing Mary, Queen of Scots: recalling Nancy
Marchand, Pickles grates and you're not altogether sure if this is
intended as fair view, or if that voice is being used as a means by which
the character will be denied even a trace of sympathy. Pickles goes to her
death with the class of a royal, and Hugh Whitemore's script of this
episode, "Horrible Conspiracies," ends on the just the right notes of
horror and rue. (The same year as ELIZABETH R, Pickles would costar with
Jackson in John Schlesinger's modern soaper SUNDAY BLOODY SUNDAY, playing
a liberal, pot-smoking mother of four.) 
        A few regrets: the series offers up little evidence of the
explosion of the arts, especially the theatre and Shakespeare, that
erupted during her reign. Thus, a separate chapter of her considerable
achievements and what flourished as result would have been appreciated:
Elizabeth attending a Bard production, reading or commenting on or even
socializing with Marlowe or Spencer. (Sirs Francis Bacon and Walter
Raleigh are included -- minimally.) While there are smidgens about
commerce, trade, standardization of coinage, judicial reform, ruinous
monopolies, these subjects are brought in as scene introductions, leading
to the more urgent and dramatic matters of petitioning for a decision
about marriage and heir, consoling bruised egos, battling over or
preparing conspiracies, decreeing punishments for treachery and treason.
(In "Horrible Conspiracies," Elizabeth demands a new killing device for
Babington, and Richard Topcliffe, the Queen's chief executioner, tells
Babs: "In such matters, I have the delicacy of a practiced seducer...the
sword begins here...with the privities. Castrated, ripped up...bowelled
alive...quartered yet still living. So many wonders await you...")
Watching the series, you get the impression that she saved her wrath
against Catholics only if conspirators, but history records that she
regularly persecuted Catholics and Puritans alike, and tried to wipe out
gypies. The defeat of Spanish Armada -- the basic subject of part five,
"The Enterprise of England" -- is maladroit and confusing, and though this
part's writer John Prebble attempts to make funny the details of England's
would-be naval battles, they're exasperating. All of the writers -- John
Hale ("The Lion's Cub"), Rosemary Anne Sisson ("The Marriage Game"),
Julian Mitchell ("Shadow in the Sun"), Whitemore, Prebble and Ian Rodger
("Sweet England's Pride") -- have refrained from the heavier colloquialism
as well as the lofty prattle of the time, in order to gain a wider
audience, but no line is fakespeak: this is the vernacular of the educated
using language as an instrument of precision, even when applied in a
manner most craftily evasive.
        Celebrating its silver anniversary, ELIZABETH R also celebrates
its survival against our Pentium age of media gotcha; our manic
destructive trashing hasn't reduced the magnitude of Jackson's portrayal,
which remains luminous -- historically just and sonorous. And she
accomplishes something else that astonishes in this era of special
effects: she burrows through all the powdered and rouge grotesquery of the
queen's smallpox-scarred last years; she conquers the horrors of Dawn
Alcock's spot-on kabuki makeup. You could get easily transfixed by it, and
by Elizabeth Waller's bejeweled wigs and progressively more majestic
costumes, a few of them gaudily adorned with butterfly wings. But Jackson
in character stays paramount: entrenched in her vision yet never
overwhelmed by it, she's not about to let us forget that she's playing --
and becomes -- the absolute Gloriana. Like Derek Jacobi's in the
triumphant I, CLAUDIUS, hers is a performance as the supreme example of
the balance of artistry. Both renditions are history as art and art as
history. Jackson's entitled to the superlative rarely earned --
magnificent.

Title
Review for Love Affair (1994)
     Onliners may recall that a few years ago when Warren Beatty and
Annette Bening were hawking their bomb LOVE AFFAIR, they appeared on
Oprah, who was wetting her panties with false enthusiasm. When she wasn't
soliciting her in-studio audience for undeserving favorable reaction to
the movie, she was kissing the stars' asses. Actually, their stoney asses,
because Beatty and Bening were so guarded about themselves, so tight and
controlled and cool, that they almost came off as snobs. And just this
kind of aloof self-protectiveness about themselves is what they bring to
their movie. Beatty and Bening brought this type of dung to BUGSY and won
over some noodle-brained east coast critics, but to bring it to a four
hankie tribute to AN AFFAIR TO REMEMBER is suicide. What makes it all the
more offensive is that no one had the guts to tell Mr. Hollywood and his
Ice Princess to shove their acts where the moon don't shine. 
     Followers of Beatty know he's usually a smart producer, but
somewhere along the line, in wanting to make his own version of the Cary
Grant-Deborah Kerr comedic weeper, he lost brain cells: he didn't ask the
most obvious of all questions: is a remake necessary? Whatever your
feelings about the Leo McCarey sudzer (which he also made earlier as LOVE
AFFAIR with Dunne and Boyer), it's just about impossible to see how it
needed an updating; this is the one of those movies that are best
described as "guilty pleasures," for you know you're being had but what
the hell? When you have two beautiful stars like Grant and Kerr, you go
along for the cruise. And you can't help yourself: even when you fighting
off the heart-clogging schmaltz, you're preparing for the water works when
Grant opens Kerr's bedroom door. All that matters is that they belong
together. But what is one to make of Annette Bening as the 90s Terry
McKay? Who'd want her except a masochist? 
     As LOVE AFFAIR begins, and it's in trouble right from the start,
what with that cloying Uncle Tom Bobby Short singing "Changes," Beatty's a
retired quarterback about to be married to a television personality (Kate
Capshaw) who got him a sports anchor position he isn't qualified for; like
Grant, he's a gigolo. Bening's a sometimes singer who tricks as a
decorator for her betrothed -- wheeler-dealer Pierce Brosnan; in other
words, like Kerr, she's a gigolette. Beatty and Bening end up together in
the first class section of plan headed for Sydney, but engine trouble
forces the 747 down on a tiny atoll! (Don't even consider asking about the
likelihood of survival.) They're rescued by a Russian cruise ship and
while on it, they fall in love. One wonders what they find attractive
about each other: in de-aging lighting effects, Beatty looks and acts and
talks like he's suffering from the very earliest symptoms of Alzheimer's
-- though sometimes he appears to be bumming from Steven Weber's Brian on
"Wings" -- and Bening, with a runway model's thinness and haughty sarcasm,
is this or any season's polar vortex; she'd have no trouble immobilizing
Mr. Freeze. Lovable? She's not even tolerable. As the ship docks in
civilization -- Tahiti! -- it just so happens that Beatty's aunt doesn't
live far away and he asks Bening if she'd like to go along while he visits
her. She's dubious of an auntie, but hey, she's got time to kill while in
paradise. Old auntie is Katharine Hepburn of the Tremors, who promptly
upgrades Cathleen Nesbitt with one line: "f..k like a duck." 
     Though based on the Leo-McCarey-Delmer Daves screenplays from the
two previous versions, writers Beatty and Robert Towne slice away (or
later edited away?) the relationships Mr. & Mrs. Supposedly Beautiful have
with their intended. Beatty has only a few scenes with Capshaw, who's
never allowed to be anything but a distance presence. (At least with Neva
Patterson in AFFAIR TO REMEMBER, we had the chance to watch her die of
public embarrassment over Grant's future in gooey artistic expression.)
And Capshaw has been horribly attired and photographed: in a flat shag
reminiscent of Fonda's in KLUTE, and wearing a god-awful beaded beret,
she's more prostie than celeb. (TV newsers are whores, but not Kate.)
Bening has only a bit more time with Brosnan, who doesn't steal the movie
-- because he's not given the chance -- but he's the only one with any
blood circulating. Unintended in its real meaning, he's given the only
true line of dialogue to utter: to Bening, he says, "Boy, you're a tough
nut to crack." The writers retain McCarey's worst part: the kids' stuff,
including Bening "farmer in the dell"ing. It slumps further into
abjectness when the kids turn Lennon and McCartney's "I Will" into
REMEMBER's nauseous "Tomorrow Land" and "He Knows You Inside." All this
"family value" warmth can't thaw Bening out of her chilled encasement.
     Rumor has it that director Glenn Gordon Caron wasn't really in
charge, and I think it's entirely possible to see that he wasn't as soon
as the movie opens. This is another of Beatty's vanity productions, and
his age insecurity is all over the place; while Caron acted as traffic
manager, Beatty applied the soft focus to Conrad L. Hall's camera lens.
Frankly, the movie doesn't feel directed; it feels staged for still motion
-- every bit, every jerk, every blink and sip and kiss and everything else
seems stilted. And because Beatty makes us exceedingly aware of his fears
of aging, as he in did in DICK TRACY and BUGSY, he has made himself the
target for the charge that he's too old -- 56 -- to play this part. Grant
was too: 53 when he made REMEMBER. But Grant had intrinsic class, which he
used as a cover; Beatty's too suspicious to discover if he's got any. The
sharpie Beatty usually is as movie maker has dulled: he's opted for drabby
glamour and the sobby cutes to get by, when, if he really believed in this
project, he'd have put Brosnan in as star and put him opposite the kind of
personality who could enliven the garbage, give it the spark and wit it
needs for the 90s -- someone like Carrie Fisher. Hepburn's tremors most
likely became Beatty's when he saw what he ended up with: an expensively
stupid movie that has zilch reason to be.

Title
Review for Lilith (1964)
     After reading "Warren Beatty and Desert Eyes," you wonder if
author-critic David Thomson can sleep well at night knowing that his
hyperbole on Robert Rossen's LILITH is so far off the mark as to become
self-tormenting: it's "the best film Beatty has made at that point in
his career and you could make a case that it is the best he will ever
make. A failure in its year (1964), the picture grows more profound and
beautiful as the years pass by. It is a lake that resists every effort
to plumb its depths....(it's) the picture that most clearly engages
Beatty in something like his own appetite for sexual encounters."
Anyone who has paid even the slightest attention to Beatty's
near-legendary sexcapades knows that Hal Ashby's SHAMPOO comes closest
to what we perceive as the image of Beatty's hungers (not excluding
self-respect). And how is it possible not to fathom Lilith when its
depth is considerably lower than one's own crotch? But Thomson's
British-born and educated, which goes a long way in explaining his
witless annotation. His across-the-Atlantic view also explains why he
doesn't "see" a more reasonable explanation for Rossen's movie having
failed at the box office and as an artfully lyrical examination of
sexual addiction: American audiences were deep into Hollywoodized
mental analysis about themselves in movies like SPLENDOR IN THE GRASS,
THE HUSTLER, A VIEW FROM THE BRIDGE, THE CHILDREN'S HOUR, THE
MANCHURIAN CANDIDATE, DAVID & LISA, and via TV shows like "Alfred
Hitchcock Presents," "Ben Casey," "Kraft Suspense Theater" and the
psycho-doc-is-in-session stuff like "The 11th Hour," "Breaking Point,"
and, if none of that enough, the English booked appointments for us in
ROOM AT THE TOP, LOOK BACK IN ANGER, A TASTE OF HONEY, THE ENTERTAINER,
SONS AND LOVERS, SATURDAY NIGHT AND SUNDAY MORNING, THE MARK, VICTIM,
THIS SPORTING LIFE and, unsure if it's an English or American
production, LOLITA. So when LILITH came onto the scene, and concluded
with a "Twilight Zone" last line from Beatty, intimating that he too is
trapped by the irresistible lure of sex, smart but babble-fatigued
movie goers weren't too impressed. After SPLENDOR IN THE GRASS, THE
ROMAN SPRING OF MRS. STONEand ALL FALL DOWN, they had already granted
that Beatty was well on his way to proving that he indeed saw Hollywood
as a great big bed.
     Rossen's LILITH is a respectable bomb, though: it wants to dive in
to the murky waters of sex, into an exploration of what turns people
on, that just because one person's appetites are different from the
norm, they shouldn't be conclusively judged as abnormal. As the
scheming Lilith, Jean Seberg is institutionalized because she's a
nymphomaniac, and, as a therapist-in-training trying to pull her from
her amoralism, Beatty falls in love with her. But the premise is
misleading. He isn't really in love with her, he's intrigued by her,
and, it becomes obvious, is turned on by her teasing sexuality. (The
only honest scene in the movie is when, after discovering that Lilith
has made it with another woman, he has to have her right then and
there.) But you don't believe that this screen Lilith is so powerful a
sexual magnet that she can draw in so many; something's missing - an
angelic demoness vacillating between sexual bliss and fatal
attraction.  Seberg was never much of an actress to begin with, and
it's unfortunate that she was chosen over other actresses considered:
Sarah Miles, Diane Cilento, Samantha Eggar or Yvette Mimieux, who might
have been the most rewarding. Not only needing the break, Mimieux had
the beauty to pull off a sort of supernal looniness needed to entice,
to entrap, to be the icon of free sex. Seberg, on the other hand, isn't
much more than a tramp with extra-large looking front teeth that have a
repellency when viewed close up. Seberg's real-life suicide may add a
mystifying lore to LILITH, but it has zero effect in enhancing her
performance. And that once more Beatty is a movie's most beautiful love
object is disconcerting, and made even more so by his ludicrously
moody, intentionally evasive portrayal.
     Watching LILITH, based on the 1961 J.R. Salamanca novel, you will
quickly surmise that it would have benefited from having been made,
say, in the 70s, when the subject of sex didn't face the threats of
censorship and the National Catholic Office. But you can appreciate
Rossen's attempt in trying not to make judgment on the self-discovery
of the ease with which one can become a sexual habitue. Rossen's last
movie, and it's also lenser Eugen Schufftan's last American picture -
another example of what we miss by not using b & w. The more observant
amongst viewers will note the house that Gene Hackman and Jessica
Walter live in - designed by Richard Sylbert - will two years later in
WHO'S AFRAID OF VIRGINIA WOOLF? become the playground in which Liz and
Dick play their "hump the hostess" and "get the guests" games.

Title
Review for Bull Durham (1988)
     There are other sports more boring than baseball but I can't think
of one I hate more. It has everything to do with having grown up in a
family that lived baseball every waking moment of every hour, 365 days a
year: The McLains, the most (in)famous being ex-Detroit Tigers pitcher-now
ex-con Denny McLain, the first pitcher since Dizzy Dean to win thirty
games in a single season. Unmercifully teased throughout my youth that my
intense dislike for the game had everything to do with my ineptitude -- so
incompetent even as a batboy that I was once replaced by a pair of twin
girls -- I always knew what my family refused to admit, that I wasn't and
didn't want to be athletically inclined, and while Denny and his brother
often tried to shame me out of my shortcomings, I was content to sit in
the bleachers, secretly praying for rain, hoping that during the
interminable games my Hitachi radio's batteries would hold out to hear for
the umpteenth time "Please Love Me Forever" or "Quarter to Three." I
maintained my hatred even when Denny was well on his way to Cooperstown,
instead of where he'll end up -- the Hall of Shame. (Though inexcusable,
this explains why Ken Burns omits Denny from that eighteen hour
error-filled snoozer "Baseball"; assembling footage of the 1968 World
Series, Burns gives the viewers the impression that the St. Louis
Cardinals were victorious, instead of the Tigers.)
     The mindless jock fanaticism of baseball got to me early on: too
many people actually took this g.d. game seriously. How I remember the
sheer insanity of the fights -- usually between parents -- that ensued
when Denny "lost" a Little League or Babe Ruth game. Hearing those
screamfests and recriminations never made much sense to me and even way
back then -- in the late 50s and early 60s -- I realized that this
"healthy" All-American pastime was corrupt and, worse, victimizing. My
fears were confirmed not only when Denny's father died prematurely at 36
from a stress-related heart attack but also when Denny signed on with the
Chicago White Sox and later with the Tigers: the extent to which
illegality -- gambling, prostitution, underworld fixes --  coexisted
cavalierly with pro ball didn't shock as much as confirm to me the whole
rot of big moneyed sports. BULL DURHAM doesn't explicitly examine the
underbelly of celebrity sociopathology -- all we really have to do is
recall goofus Pete Rose, womanizer Steve Garvey or read Denny's lie-filled
apologia "Strikeout" for a re-confirmation (or note that once again
Denny's been indicted for fraudulent business activities) -- but the movie
more than implies that obsession for "the show" stunts the mind and
inhibits spiritual growth. Considering the realities of baseball as I
perceive them, BULL DURHAM is of course too clever by half: I challenge
anyone anywhere to name players in one or any of the major or bush league
teams who could tell us who Susan Sontag is, much less what her books
might be about. Granted, this name-dropping doesn't hurt the movie -- for
baseball haters, it's pure revel -- but it tells you that
director-screenwriter Ron Shelton has one eye on the bleachers of the
bored and the other on the mound. Not to say anything about the bed: BULL
DURHAM is an insistently sexy movie, with a tantalizing, if not
over-emphasis on crotches: the men's have a big screen fullness and
leading lady Susan Sarandon is quite eager to expose hers. It's refreshing
and honest: Shelton not only has his own oral fixation, he also knows what
baseball really is -- an oral sport. This is the only movie about baseball
I can think of (or could tolerate) that hits a grand slam without needing
to be in a stadium. Not too shabby for a director making his debut.
     Kevin Costner couldn't have been photographed in a more
seductively tired way -- it's a minor triumph all by itself. He physically
encapsulates what we often see in failed or retired sports figures -- that
they seem quasi-boozed fatigued, not necessarily from the ever-handy
Miller's but from their sport of choice having nearly beaten out
everything inside them. This specific performance could be interpreted as
an early Mickey Mantle warning about how sport suppresses adulthood in
bozo athletes, how the child in them never grows up. If it's not a
warning, it's because Costner's Crash is that rarity -- a thinking man's
athlete who recognizes the trap. This is also the first time Costner
merges with his movie character as if he belonged, something we can't say
about his puniness in the silly frenzy of NO WAY OUT, his fractured
boy-man in the overblown SILVERADO or UNTOUCHABLES, his hogging-the-camera
stuff in the tanned romantic twaddle of DANCES WITH WOLVES, the bad hair
day martyrdom in THE BODYGUARD, the worthless WYATT BURP. There's an
obligatory cliche that Crash has to utter -- "I want to find me"  -- and
when we've heard other actors attempt to justify something similar, we've
been embarrassed for them, like we are when we read the throwaway quotes
by nude centerfolds in Playboy, but Costner delivers the line with an
exhausted conviction that bares what's dangerously empty-headed in sports:
that too often athletics strive to become record-setting icons not because
of who they are or what they really want to be but because of what others
want of them, like Denny living out his own parents' dream, which turned
into a nightmare. 
     When not jingle-jangling silver jewelry, Susan Sarandon's Annie
Savoy is reciting Blake and Whitman; but she's not just an over-dressed,
hot-to-trot poetess -- she's also a baseball groupie-coach as the Queen
Bee of Triple A ball who literally builds shrines to the sport. She's a
fire hazard too: just how long could those candles be allowed to burn so
close to walls that are most likely covered with combustible, if not toxic
wallpaper? But here's the greater concern: Sarandon almost didn't get to
play her. "I had to grovel to get that part," Sarandon told Bruce Newman
in a N.Y. Times Times News Service interview. "The studio had a list of
people who they preferred, and I was not on it." Those others were
actresses who refused to audition for Annie, so when Shelton asked
Sarandon, who didn't yet know she wasn't even on the list, to move beyond
the humiliation of having to read, she dressed herself up in what becomes
one of the movie's bright teases -- a "showy red and white striped" number
as invitation. Happily, Sarandon got Annie, and even more happily, she's
been decaffed, so we won't have to go through the feminist jitters, yet,
despite how wonderful she is -- and it's a performance that gets better
each time you see it -- I have to say that I've met very few women like
her Annie. Except in television, where Annie might (and should) end up as
a sportscaster. Maybe this is the reason she didn't earn Academy Award
recognition -- "I was shattered when I didn't even get a nomination. I
wept for days," she told Newman -- because, despite their enormous
likability, Costner's Crash is almost atypical of sports and Annie surely
is; they're too intelligently conceived, which, for a baseball audience,
is a major turnoff. But I have met plenty of the other kind, the young
bimbos whose only aims are to latch on to athletes on the rise. Denny
married one. In "Strikeout" he calls her a saint. That's code for
vacuousness; in baseball, it's contagious.

Title
Review for Barcelona (1994)
        In his 1968 Iberia, James Michener wrote, "To travel across Spain
and finally reach Barcelona is like drinking a respectable red wine and
finishing up with a bottle of champagne." From the late 80s, especially
since the Olympics of '92, and right up to the present, it's even truer:
Barcelona is the quintessential European metropolis, an optimum Paris on
the Mediterranean complete with its own Eiffel Tower -- Gaudi's
magnificently eclectic El Templo de la Sagrada Familia. Updating, Michener
would call Spain's intellectual and publishing center the Dom Perignon of
the continent. From atop the Muntanya de Montjuic, Barcelona is deceptive
in scale -- an urban Guanajuato. Traversing by foot or subway, it's so
continually a picturesque surprise of spacious, manicured boulevards,
centuries-old narrow-street neighborhoods, endless architectural delights
that you bemoan the egregious lack of movie maker appreciation. And anyone
who's been there knows that it deserves much better than what Whit
Stillman gives us in his BARCELONA. Putting it as mildly as I can:
Stillman should be required to rename it -- to BARFALONA. 
        BARCELONA isn't a movie about the city or its dwellers; it's about
two snot-nosed American cousins pretending to be Woody Allen Reaganites
foisting puffed-up, bogus Hemingway on any Barcelonan as Eurotrash who'll
consent to listen. Does director-writer Stillman have a case of the hates
against the city he claims to love? Rhetorical question: the city dwellers
in general are treated with contempt and the city is never photographed to
show its true metropolitan flavor, or show off, however fleetingly, its
renowned symbols: Las Ramblas and Gaudi's gaudy masterpieces. Shortly into
this yupchucker one of these two asinine Americans whines about the lack
of Barcelonian appreciation for Americans having died ridding Europe of
fascism. What Stillman never mentions is that while America -- along with
its allies, of course -- rid Europe of Hitler and Mussolini, Spain was
left in the grips of fascism until Franco's death in 1975. But Stillman,
who lived in Barcelona for several years and married a resident, has no
respect for his host's history: he repeatedly swacks Barcelonians over
their heads for their anti-Americanism, which he sees as insulting
ingratitude and uses it as a form of ersatz self-righteousness. Lovers of
Barcelona know where Stillman's head is -- up his a double s.
        The cousins are played as well as they're directed, which is to
say that there's no faulting how they perform the numbskulls Stillman
penned for them. (Is there any way to trust a writer who names one of his
characters Montserrat?) Taylor Nichols, as a salesman based in Barcelona,
has the cutie boy charm of Casper Weinberger, Orson Bean and Judith
Light's husband, actor Robert Desiderio. You don't believe a word he says
except about his fears of losing his job -- and the only reason you
believe that is because you don't buy for a minute he'd be an effective
salesman for anything. He does have one asset that not only betrays his
insecure character but is more European than anything else in the movie:
his seductive swagger of a walk. (He'd make a sensational aristocratic
misogynist.) His cousin, played by Chris Eigeman, is more closely related
to E!'s Michael Castner. You have to wonder how it could ever be that the
U.S. Navy would send this jerk to Barcelona as an advance man to test the
"welcome waters." Of course, the Navy wouldn't, but that's Stillman's
problem. Only once is there something about the character that rings true:
when he mimic's Benjamin's howls of "Elaine! Elaine!" from THE GRADUATE.
Clear and away the only amusing bit in the entire movie.
        BARCELONA is such a crock that Stillman postulates the city's
women became sexually revolutionized in the early 80s. Nonsense. The
liberalization of sexual mores actually began in the mid 60s, when German
and Swede Suecas came down to the sunny beaches of Spain's Costa del Sol
and bounced around topless to the delight of the Spanish male population.
Though it took Franco's death to unleash their own sexual assertiveness
and independence, Spanish women consented to sex without commitment or the
burdens of Catholic guilt long before it became publicly fashionable.
        Can you believe there are critics out there who, in one breath,
think Stillman has an attitudinal resemblance to Henry James, and in the
next breath claim he's a combo of Bunuel and wacky Almodovar? No
forgiveness for that. Speaking to a reporter, Stillman used the following
as his own excuse: "By being kind of square you can get into material that
isn't open to other people. I feel square -- insulated from the cool."
Detesting Stillman's prissified attitudes, vehemently objecting to his
indulgent insistence on confirming why there's a steady drumbeat of
anti-Americanism, isn't the same as calling him an incompetent numbers
cruncher: in fact, it takes a very competent economist to make a movie
that looks like BARCELONA for just over $3 million. That what's captured
is thoroughly inadequate to measure the city's romanticism and sensuous
grace (even his panoramas are too short to absorb the pleasures),
Stillman, if he doesn't sell out to Hollywood's money spending mania,
could help deflate the spiraling costs of movie making. That's the best I
can say about him, because, considering his Reaganesque context -- that
is, creating illusions by disposing of fact -- Stillman's the type who
would likely trick us into believing there's a nimbus of virtue
surrounding the Valley of the Fallen. (Just what Ronnie tried at Bitburg.)
As for Barcelona, well, it has two options: Sue Stillman for defamation or
deny him re-entry. Both should be exercised.

Title
Review for Nun's Story, The (1959)
        THE NUN'S STORY is Audrey Hepburn's one genuine triumph as 
actress. You never get passed that it's Hepburn as Sister Luke, but you 
never not accept her either; she could be playing the first "recovering" 
Catholic, of which there are now millions. You don't really need to be a 
Catholic to recognize that Sister Luke had to rebel the way she did, but 
it helps. Fred Zinnemann has made from Kathryn Hulme's best seller a movie 
that puts some sting into Catholic-slanted tests aimed at destroying 
pride. 
        Hepburn's portrayal of Hulme starts out with naive hopes for a 
vocation in nursing but she soon discovers that she's made to pay the 
price for her advantages -- having come from a father renowned in the 
field of medicine -- and she has to be humbled into obedience by her 
order's hierarchy which decrees that no single star shine more than the 
collective mission of the Church. (This before the days of Sister Teresa 
and Mother Angelica.) Hepburn accepts the subservience at first, trying 
hopelessly to gain false humility and bow to compliance. Soon enough it 
becomes too much to endure: she can't fulfill vows that subjugate personal 
worth; her "I accuse myself" notebook of culpas fills up fast. Then she's 
asked as test of  "humility without hooks" to fail her medical exams to 
appease a jealous, incompetent nun. At this critical juncture, Hepburn's 
decision -- a clerical lese majeste -- is sparked by several converging 
factors: her own ego and expertise, her father's reputation, and, though 
never overtly expressed, her fears that anything less than her personal 
best would be giving in to demands made by a nun who sees no damage in 
stifling potential for the sake of rules and regulations that border on 
infantilism. (Hulme never explicitly condemned this in her book, either, 
but she very powerfully suggested it.)
        Hepburn's success in the part is based partly on downplaying the 
Givenchy image. She doesn't have any fall back positions to rest on, like 
those svelty, classy "gamine" qualities people go gaga over; even the 
inimitable Audrey smile has been downsized so as not to fall too deeply in 
love with her. (But like Peter Finch's Dr. Fortunati, we all do anyway.) 
The real strength of the performance, though, is that it's all in the 
face: showcased in helpful habits, Hepburn has to emote from within and 
bring it all out through her eyes and voice. Her Sister Luke is amongst 
the best things going for the Congo -- and Catholicism -- but she's made 
an unwilling victim of her own intelligence and success. The pride and 
vulnerability and mounting irritations with her situations and dilemmas 
are all right there to be empathized with  -- especially by conflicted 
hearts of Catholics who see the Church today as a collapsing haven for 
totalitarians and pedophiles, not the promise of ecumenical charity. 
There's a painful understanding of regret mixed with relief when watching 
Sister Luke shed her religious garb and reenter the secular world; the 
very kingdom of goodwill became an isolation ward of perversity she had to 
escape. Yet a ward she committed herself to by making an unsuitable 
choice. 
        Zinnemann's THE NUN'S STORY and Otto Preminger's THE CARDINAL 
could be defended as companion pieces: Catholicism the central theme and 
target, with both handling very respectfully their criticisms; both are 
episodic in format, with travelogue-like transitions between periods; both 
have solid supporting work by some very fine actors who know what to do 
with Catholic Churchspeak -- that intoned, arched lingo as reverential 
superiority. Catholics world-wide who were educated by nuns have it in 
their systems like a virus, and performers almost always have the greatest 
time getting infected by it, as Edith Evans, Peggy Ashcroft and Mildred 
Dunnock confirm in THE NUN'S STORY and as Burgess Meredith, Joseph Meinrad 
and especially John Huston do in THE CARDINAL. The one crucial difference 
between the movies is the central star: Hepburn has been lovingly coached 
by Zinnemann, and you can see how it blooms in just about every detail of 
her performance, but Tom Tyron as the Cardinal has been browbeaten by 
Preminger -- he's been humiliated into submission, into what some of the 
nuns wanted to make of Sister Luke. The director's tirades against Tyron 
are well-documented and you can see the affects in just about every detail 
of his performance. It's tormenting to watch him in some scenes -- you can 
feel his real agony; his pocky facial scar could be stigmata. (And you 
wonder about Tyron's quota for abuse: he worked with Preminger a few years 
later in the black & white IN HARM'S WAY.) A decent print of THE CARDINAL 
is hard to come by, so it's time for it to be restored, not as a sterling 
example of movie making -- though Otto won a Papal medal for it -- but as 
a general view of the conflicts caused by celibates in expensive robes 
who, with presumed carnal-free experience in matters of sex and marriage, 
oughtn't be advising anyone about such matters. (And Australia's "Brides 
of Christ" would tackle the Church's positions on birth control and the 
Vietnam War.) 
        That's fundamental to the on-going subversive pleasure of movies 
about Catholicism: its extraordinary grandeur, panoply, artistry and 
seething sensuality contradict more than augment its catechism. It's the 
only religion that asks its adherents to defy the enjoyment of all its 
built-in sensations. THE NUN'S STORY isn't exactly about sensations, 
except for Hepburn's performance and Finch's handling of her. But they're 
not the sole reasons the movie, which doesn't lose much on TV, is a 
classic. A friend once wrote that "getting hooked on Zinnemann's method of 
movie making is similar to getting hooked on actor George Montgomery's 
carpentry -- you get high on their craftsmanship."  

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
        Would INDEPENDENCE DAY be a better movie without all that Area 51 
bs? Did director Roland Emmerich and his co-writer Dean Devlin get their 
filler by watching those sci-fi nuts on Larry King's TNT special? (I 
confess to seeing it -- twice; anyone who imports a desk and uses the 
sunset in the near-Roswell desert as his backdrop is a showman deserving 
of an encore.) Would ID4  be more receptive without Bill Pullman mouthing 
perfunctory lines that flash in our heads before his cue? Without Randy 
Quaid's boozer-turned-hero? Without Will Smith a little too conveniently 
landing his chopper at his decimated base to be greeted by his gal pal? 
(Vivica Fox is, though, the prettiest black squeeze to grace movies in 
years.) Let's face it: like JURASSIC PARK, ID4 is just okay. We don't have 
to be movie addicts or snob technocrats to roll our eyes or turn from the 
screen when Quaid is on; enjoyable at the "suspend disbelief" level up to 
a point, we all probably begin to quietly mumble Oh no, they're not going 
to let him do that and sure enough Harvey Fierstein does his toxic 
schtick, and Oh God, it's another tiring mutation of Ridley Scott's aliens 
-- this time much smarter: they're hegemonic invaders. We're going to ID4 
to see the long-advertised special effects, which are, alternately, wowie, 
good and blurry. There's one huge collective disappointment: the mother 
space ship and its 15 mile-in-diameter babies. We never get near enough to 
them for clear-eyed views; just when we think we will -- like when one of 
the midget terrors comes out of its fiery CLOSE ENCOUNTERS cloud over San 
Francisco -- it's gone; this magnificent "Phenomena" isn't held long 
enough for us to perceive its paralyzing other-world majesty, what should 
be one of those "Wow!" moments that only movies can provide. And inside 
the mother ship, things get awfully hazy, we can't get a techno fix. (We 
get better views of the movie in the MVP licensing publication 
Independence Day, the Official Collector's Magazine.) The lack of the 
luxury to linger is a mistake; this movie is really all about the terror 
of technological awesomeness and in order to feel the fright and panic, in 
order to respond to what's pretending to be larger than we are, we need 
some realistic impressions -- we need to be convinced of the expensive 
razzle dazzle we're watching. On this level JURASSIC  PARK succeeds: if 
we're unavoidably aware of the mechanical contraptions and 
computer-generated effects, we're in awfully close proximity; we marvel at 
how Spielberg and his Merlinettes give their monsters a real charge. In 
ID4 we want to ooh and aah too, we want to get caught up in the War of the 
Worlds, yet we're detached -- we're watching FX that initially intimidate, 
only to become elusive to our senses; they stay "out there" for too long. 
(And sometimes the effects are shoddy, like the exteriors of the Air Force 
One model, and the aliens' humpy fighters look like those plastic HairWiz 
cutters you buy at Walgreen's.) Actually, the movie's trailer, which kept 
Fox from having to spend much money on ads, has been out there for too 
long: our politics aside, when the White House explodes, the audience I 
saw the movie with didn't cheer or react demonstrably in any way -- not 
like it was reported from theatres during first screenings. We've been too 
prepared for it; even people who haven't gone to the movies in years have 
the scene burned into ever-lasting memory. The explosion works against the 
picture in another way too: it's pop 'em sock 'em sci fi pyrotechnics but 
it's also pop culture debasement, maybe not too different from women's 
Stars & Stripes halter tops. (A wit who saw the movie early in its release 
observed, "Titsnflaggers who want a Constitutional amendment outlawing 
flag burning seem to be the ones hooting it up the most when the White 
House gets it.") What laughs there are come out of a peculiar 
embarrassment: I got a good one over the fact that there was little 
objection to blowing my town Houston to bits. No one will win any blue 
screen acting awards, with the exception of a possible Razzie nomination 
for Quaid. It's Jeff Goldblum's good luck to be cast in blockbusters; I 
still don't know why it's taking so long for him to play opposite Barbra 
Streisand -- their ethnic beauty should be able to ignite a raucous 
romantic comedy. Pullman's wonderfully deep-octaved voice helps, as does 
the "comeback kid" persona. Playing his Dee Dee Myers, Margaret Colin's a 
pleasant clone of Mary Louise Parker and Elizabeth Perkins. ID4 has made 
its virtual three hundred million dollar domestic gross in the same way 
JURASSIC PARK did -- by giving summer movie audiences the stories they 
love but movies they end up feeling indifferent about. A loving update of 
Ray Harryhausen's "Earth Vs. The Flying Saucers," it's not much more than 
a joint of Roswellian hemp from which outer space buffs can get a so-so 
buzz.

Title
Review for Devil in a Blue Dress (1995)
     About an hour into Carl Franklin's black noir DEVIL IN A BLUE
DRESS, costume designer Sharen Davis appears to have discovered for
Denzel Washington a style that's not new but is rejuvenated and
welcomed:  in suspenders over a white sleeveless T-shirt, Washington
brings to what is usually a slob dress code a genuine smolder. His
beefy contours and conscious swagger feed the burn, as does his skin,
which viewed through Tak Fujimoto's sandy-colored photography sometimes
looks burnt-orange. In the late 60s and early 70s, there was great hope
in Billy Dee Williams to break through the barriers, and in a few
quarters he has -- if you accept the STAR WARS stuff -- but he never
really got to the promised land. Bad scripts and personal demons
notwithstanding, I think it's the superfly hair that prevented larger
contact: it was often too greasy or greasy-curly or cut so
exaggeratedly that his charisma took a nose dive; his slimy overdose
made you feel unclean. For some black beauties, ethnicity can be
stunning -- Lena Horne and Iman, for example, or when not reeking of
camp, Whitney Houston. But for bl concession is required, and it hasn't
hurt Denzel one bit. After all, thanks to his predominantly white
audience, he's a bona fide super star. It's worth noting that, in
looking over receipts, it's also the white breaders who kept turning
out for WAITING TO EXHALE long after blacks deserted the box office.
One of the discomforting ironies of this may be that whites are more
receptive than black men to the argument the movie was invecting.
     The majority of the black audience didn't show up for DEVIL IN A
BLUE DRESS, and not many others showed up, either. Despite good
reviews, the box office fizzle is both understandable -- it was
released during the Simpson fiasco -- and regrettable. The movie seems
tailored for Washington's comely appeal, and while it's there, it isn't
used to the extent most probably wish it had. As you're watching, you
flash on Lawrence Kasdan's BODY HEAT, a movie it doesn't take after
except in potential for sexuality; you prepare yourself for sizzle.
It's definitely set up for it: opening in the L.A. summer of 1948,
Washington's Easy, a W.W.II vet-unemployed machinist, needs some quick
cash to save his house from being foreclosed and he's asked by a
typical hood to hunt down Jennifer Beals' Daphne Monet, who has a
"predilection for jazz, pigs feet and black meat." When Easy first
meets Daphne, a chat about weapons commences and he asks her, "What do
you prefer to use as your weapon?" and she invites, "Why don't you
search me and find out?" Need I say more? I'm going to have to: finally
recovering from the imbecilic FLASHDANCE, Beals's handicap isn't only
that she doesn't bounce the mattress with Washington, she's also a
repellent mixture of Liza Minnelli out of NEW YORK, NEW YORK and Dixie
Carter; you start thinking maybe it's a blessing Washington doesn't bag
her. Her performance above complaint, yet she's not enough of a charge
for Washington; in a blue bath robe, holding a cigarette, her shoulders
drooping inward (is it the pads?), she's a great granddaughter to the
40s dames of the damned but the generational distance allows for a
different noirish tack: there's nothing hateful about her to love. (In
this movie, it's the whites you hate.)
     In most critics' estimation, Denzel Washington still seems to take
second place to Morgan Freeman as America's best black actor.  Where
Freeman's insistently subtle, a giant of modulation and technique,
Washington's a 5th of vigor -- a passionate dynamo. Since STREET SMART
and DRIVING MISS DAISY, Freeman's learned enormously that the camera
detects his notorious cool and he's re-channelled it so that it emits
its power in a subterranean way that sneaks up on you and before you
know it you're overwhelmed -- like in THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION.
Washington has this knowledge about the camera almost instinctually --
he's virtually born to be unleashed on the screen. Without overdoing
it, Washington spills over the brim; he shakes things up because he's
excited about his love of acting, his love of the territory that is
movie acting. He's not sloppy or egotistical in commanding his realm,
as is the great bad Al Pacino; though he isn't the center of
PHILADELPHIA, his egalitarian brio makes him its real champion -- its
Black Knight. In DEVIL, he's hero, but not solely:  Easy would be an
obit without gold-toothed Mouse, played with warpy morals by Don
Cheadle. Washington's the matinee idol director Franklin wants him to
be -- and a generous one: Easy gives Coretta (Lisa Nicole Carson, a
double for TV's Jackee) what she's hankering for. Right now, no other
American actor -- black, white or any other color from the rainbow --
has all the ingredients to produce a new kind of alchemy on screen.
When he gets to act opposite a woman with equal star magnitude, someone
like Michelle Pfeiffer, the explosion should be magical -- a close
encounter of the most erotic kind.
     To keep the budget down, Franklin's economized on the atmospherics
-- though Gary Frutkoff's design is more than adequate. What isn't
satisfactory is the score by Elmer Bernstein, who's snoozing in the
orchestra pit, and the classic recordings -- including T-Bone Walker's
"Westside Baby," Jimmy Witherspoon's "Ain't Nobody's Business,"
Ellington's "HY-AH-SU" and "Maybe I Should Change My Ways," Lucienne
Boyer's "Parlez Moi D'Amour," Frank Loesser's "On a Slow Boat to
China," Thelonious Monk's "Round Midnight" -- don't quite get us deep
into the Zapata-smoked, jazzy, illegal club ambiance. Had the
selections been more carnal and rhythmic, they might have done a lot to
shore up the missing heat between Washington and Beals. Doing his own
adaptation from the Walter Mosley novel, Franklin keeps things moving
along rapidly. As the story and secrets unfold, he sticks to the plot
details, wasting little time in extracurriculars or in efforts to
outfox us, and just as we're wondering what's to become of Easy, who
has blood on his hands, the noiry summation is explicitly conveyed.
What's a little unsettling about the movie is the question raised at
the end about ratting on your friends.  Coincidental, what ricochets in
the mind are that recent infamous L.A.  trial and the brother of the
Unabomber. DEVIL IN A BLUE DRESS -- a misnomer of a title -- is caught
in a time trap: it may not find its larger appreciating audience until
one of those murderers, who like Easy probably "laughed a long time"
about the verdict of events, finds his phantom killers. Let's hope
Washington maintains his self-respect by continuing to reject offers of
millions to play him. Being Easy, he can; being susceptible to
temptation, it won't be.

Title
Review for Morte a Venezia (1971)
        Venice -- the great watery serpent of indefinable plagues and 
forebodings, the last grand visitation of rotting romanticism, the Grim 
Reaper as elegant theme park. This city's atmosphere of Borgesian imagery 
is the quintessential setting for the pitifu end of Gustav von Aschenbach 
in Thomas Mann's exquistely prosed DEATH IN VENICE. There's no locale on 
earth more conducive to let Aschenbach feel, as Mann wrote, "a dark 
contentment with what was taking place...(the) wicked secret of the city 
was welded ith (my) own secret." But too much of moribund Venice and 
rationalized sexual repression can do a reader in: Mann's writer, who 
lost Cicero's "foundation of eloquence" early in the story, is already 
pegged a sexual malcontent by the fourth page and by t  time his 
Aschenbach finds in a fourteen year old his Prince Charming and goes on 
and on about the boy's Narcissism, you're very close to exhaustion; you 
can't wait until the sirocco -- the winds off the Mediterranean that have 
been known to carry death - overtake him so you can be relieved of his 
unfulfilled desires. Mann believed "writers are happiest with an idea 
which can become all emotion and an emotion all idea," but he's 
insistently Germanic with mythological veneration of beauty as pardon for 
 e emotion that dare not speak its name. He may have gone beyond his 
Germanism; he's eclipsed the spiritual and physical enthrall of beauty -- 
the young Tadzio is, by end, not Herrmes but Michelangelo's David -- and 
made Aschenbach an intellectual pedoph e. The story isn't so much a study 
of the dangers of consuming beauty as it is punishment for private 
thoughts as crime never committed. 
        Luchino Visconti's movie version of DEATH IN VENICE, even with 
changing Aschenbach from writer to composer, modelled after Mahler, is 
reconstructed with stunning fidelity to Mann: just about every major 
scene in the story is brought to the screen witho  compromise. Visually, 
with maybe not more than a few dozen pages of dialogue, Visconti and his 
crew -- photographer Pasqualino De Santis (who also did 1984's best movie 
BIZET'S CARMEN), costume designer Piero Tosi and art director Ferdinando 
Scarfiotti - give us a languishing, glamorously stifling Venetian holiday 
at the turn of the century as a malignancy of class snobbery; the images 
reek with an aura of knowing denial. While his camera scales Venice to 
exacting proportions -- St. Mark's Square is m e to look its real size -- 
De Santis also catches the funereal gandola and its seats perfectly, just 
as Mann did, and the green goo of the canals and the cold, damp walls you 
bump into as you make passage through the mazy narrow walkways, which can 
be l e journeys into a menacing past. Even the author's pathos that makes 
you squeamish -- the barber's vulgar touch-up of Aschenbach's hair, 
cheeks and lips -- is here in all its ingloriousness. 
        Dirk Bogarde's Gustav is made up to look like Thomas Mann, but he 
doesn't have Mann's imposing height or air of eloquence, and he could 
never be accused of being Germanic; every flabby cell of his being 
confirms he's an English pris. It's this later pa  that makes him wrong 
for the role but obviously appealing to those closeted academicians who 
rave about his performance -- because educated inverts who don't engage 
in the sex of their wishes and who hide between the stacks of their 
libraries often do  come grotesque parodies. Bogarde manages the slow 
death of consumption -- a crumbling artist devoured by beauty and its 
controvertable attractions and hindered by restrictive societal 
proprieties. And the less he says, the better the performance. But Bo rde 
isn't Aschenbach the German, and without that identity the story loses 
its tragedy; though Gustav is already in the fall of his lifetime, it's 
his Teutonic masculinity that he betrays in his feeble attempts to 
reenergize. We're supposed to be in hor r at his dissipatedness when he 
uses any trick to recapture what's gone forever. As Bogarde plays him, 
Gustav's a dignified horror right from the start and so when he's being 
primped up or when he slumps over to his death, with his hair dye running 
down is face, there's no tragic punch. He's a pathetic English Yuri out 
of a gay Pasternak -- and his Lara doesn't continue onward through the 
snow but out to sea, stopping long enough to give the old man his last 
jollies with a David come-on. 
        What's ambiguous about Mann's story is Aschenbach's pride in 
virility -- his lack of admiration for his own maleness -- and that is 
the opening that Visconti takes advantage of through Bogarde. There is 
something annoyingly simpy about Aschenbach, espe ally to those of us who 
are attracted to Germans and don't see them as fearful when it comes to 
their sexual curiosities. Discreet, yes, procrastinators, no. One of the 
more effective psychological weapons Hitler was able to use on his own 
people is the doration of assumed Aryan perfection; he took advantage of 
their idolization of their own robust, hearty physicality. He didn't 
invent it, he only re-packaged what has always been there. (Enamoured of 
Germany, having spent a year in the baroque conceit   Wurzburg and having 
returned to the country three times since, I can say with a modicum of 
authority that some of the most exciting experiences a traveller can have 
is finding one's self inflamed by the Germanic; the heat can be best 
described as sexua fascism.) Recent biographers claim Mann also had 
personal conflicts with his own attractions to men -- particularly to 
orthodox Georgian Ernst Glockner. And if true, this explains why his 
Aschenbach hadn't the inner-fortitude to go to his logical step:  German 
true to his loins would have at least sneaked a peek into Tadzio's beach 
tent.
        Mann ejaculates, "With astonishment Aschenbach noted that the boy 
was absolutely beautiful. His face, pale and reserved, framed with 
honey-colored hair, the straight sloping nose, the lovely mouth, the 
expression of sweet and godlike seriousness, recal d Greek sculpture of 
the noblest periods; and the complete purity of the form was accompanied 
by such a rare personal charm that, as he watched, he felt that he had 
never met with anything equally felicitous in nature...it was clear that 
in his existenc the first factors were gentleness and tenderness. The 
shears had been resolutely kept from his beautiful hair; like a Prince 
Charming's, it fell in curls over his forehead, his ears, and still 
deeper, across his neck." The more Mann's Aschenbach goes on dolizing 
Tadzio, the more you wonder where an actor could be found to physically 
live up to the description. Visconti did, though, in Bjorn Andresen. If 
the effeminacy isn't quite Grecian, he's still a ravishing icon; he's so 
delicate a creation that ev yone wants him and at the same time wants to 
protect him. Mann suggests that Tadzio is oblivious tease without sexual 
experience, but Andresen is directed to be a precocious temptress; 
Visconti allows Andresen to imply through too many glances a recepti ness 
to invitation. But I couldn't respond to Andresen, perhaps because I kept 
seeing in him his British equivalent actress Patricia Hodge, whose 
identical porcelain symmetry, while an attraction in THE LIVES AND LOVES 
OF A SHE-DEVIL and THE CLONING OF  ANNA MAY, can also leave you stone 
cold. (They're not quite celestial androgynies, they're Draculized 
inflatibles.) From the movie's point of view, though, there can be no 
question where Tadzio's looks come from -- Silvana Mangano. She's a 
breathtaking  rgaret Leighton. 
        Born into authentic nobility in Milan in 1906, Visconti became a 
Communist ideologue who, with his OSSESSIONE (which borrowed heavily from 
James Cain's THE POSTMAN ALWAYS RINGS TWICE), raged against Fascism. When 
Mussolini and Hitler were finished off, so were the director's passions 
for the proletariat, though he'd periodically return to condemn Fascism 
-- 1969's THE DAMNED his last major treatise. Aficionados of trash still 
talk about mommie Ingrid Thulin and sonnie transvestite Helmut erger 
bedding down together; about the "Night of the Long Knives" sequence; 
about what goodies were edited out. (The truth may be that, for all 
Visconti's harping about the Nazis, he's an inveterate German, addicted 
to his adopted culture's degenerate c ssicism.) Most of Visconti's time 
was spent dreaming about and occasionally making epics on the aristocracy 
of Europe -- THE LEOPARD (with Burt Lancaster doing Visconti) and LUDWIG, 
about the innocently mad King of Bavaria, famous for his addiction to r l 
fairy tale castles, Wagner and his music. Attracted to DEATH IN VENICE 
partly as a tale of woe about unconsumated Adonis worship that Mann 
literally came upon while visiting Venice -- almost all the details in 
the story are authentic to his observance  including the threat of 
wind-carried disease, prophetic encounters with an aging queen and his 
Tadzio; attracted partly because of his own sexual preference; drawn to 
it partly because so many intellectuals were pushing him to film it -- 
can't you just ear the ivy leaguers sighing, "Oh, Luchino, it's my 
story!" -- and attracted partly, if not largely, to it because of his 
aristocratic iciness, Visconti's as good a choice as any to make a movie 
of Mann's frost-nipped melodrama about proscriptions neith  probably ever 
considered justified. They both knew how to give you a case of the chills 
about sexual heat.

Title
Review for Fountainhead, The (1949)
     Lovers of old films claim King Vidor's 1949 version of Ayn Rand's
THE FOUNTAINHEAD is among the most neglected of classic bad movies.
They're right. Scorned because of Rand's Objectivism -- in a nutshell
the antithesis of altruism -- and attacked because its style reeked
with cheapie film noir effects, the movie never got the audience it
deserved until revival houses flourished in the 60s and 70s and, later,
became available on video. Hard to imagine audiences in 1949 not liking
it, especially since the rapid fire invective against collectivism is
screamingly funny: "Give in, compromise, you'll have to later anyway";
"You can't stand alone, give in, become one of us"; "Be middle of the
road, why take chances?"; "Can't you give in just once?"; "Don't defy
common standards." Wasn't all this as jocular then as it is now? Not
even the Harvard Lampoon appreciated the bombast, naming it one of that
year's worst. (Today that crowd would cheer, though perhaps in private
they did back then, too; they may have been Tooheyed into public
conformist reactions.) What's possible is that much of the audience
simply didn't get Rand's diatribe-warning about the "world of the mob"
and its rules that destroy creativeness, individuality. Coming out when
it did, a few years after World War II, when the Communist scare was
just about to explode, when the middle class was about to be tracted to
death with suburban living, there was no tolerance for a movie
advocating the virtues of self.  Rand's Objectivism was then, and still
is, anathema to religious and political demagoguery, because it loudly
proclaims that the creative self is more important than the denial of
self for the sake of others. It's Rand's simplicity -- not
simple-mindedness -- that scares the money-grabbing celibates,
pedophiles, phony evangelicals and corrupt politicians; without the
continual suffering of others, they lose control.  Admitting that this
is a stretch, THE FOUNTAINHEAD is the precursor to the 1956 B-movie
chiller INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS. Both warn about the dangers of
Stepford Wifeism.
     Rand was adamant her architect Howard Roark wasn't modeled after
maverick Frank Lloyd Wright, but readers and viewers of THE
FOUNTAINHEAD can't escape the similarities in that Roark's
architectural style and his difficulties with the establishment
parallel Wright's in so close a fashion that there's no way out of
comparison. It was always a disservice to herself that she denied any
linking, because what could she have lost had she said Wright's
insistence on not compromising to "the drooling dolts" of sameness was
a model? (Nothing; she would have gained.) Even capitalist ring-wingers
and smartened-up liberals who might have otherwise been sympathetic to
her philosophy, which is more American than her critics acknowledge (or
are aware of), found themselves turned off by her denials. And surely
when she wrote the screenplay, and saw the artists' concepts of Roark's
architecture, which includes a ripoff of the masterpiece Fallingwater
and an "Enwright" skyscraper, or listened to Gary Cooper closely
approximating Wright's voice and its cadence, she had to recognize that
she couldn't go on fooling anyone anymore. But none of this takes away
from the sheer pleasure of the movie itself; in fact, it may help us
enjoy it more.
     An erotic madness swirls throughout THE FOUNTAINHEAD, and though
the novel itself is a glory to macho sex  -- rape as prelude to love,
high-rises as phallic symbols -- the movie has the additional heat of a
real-life affair between Gary Cooper as Roark and Patricia Neal as
Dominique. Movies before this one have dealt with female submission to
the penis in much the same way -- the heroine has to first pound on or
claw at what she surrenders to. Here, there's something dangerous added
to the mix: Neal's insatiable, pent-up desires must first be stoked by
swacking Cooper's his face with a riding whip, urging him on to sexual
assault, which no doubt she has been fantasizing about. Though these
scenes are lifted from the book, they don't have the frenzy that Neal
and Cooper bring to them. Coop's stoic impassiveness and Neal's arched,
caustic instability comicly implode; while they're combusting with
lust, we laugh at the high theatricality. But the carnality's real:
when their fling ended, Neal was in the throes of a nervous breakdown.
Postulating the male viewpoint of sex -- Dominique's more like a
feminist male hustler than a frilly romantic -- Rand implicitly essays
that women want to be raped before they can love; she even has Roark
say -- it's in the book too -- "Pressure is a powerful factor, leading
to consequences." The book doesn't have the mocking merriment that the
movie flaunts: when Neal hears that line, we know that it's only a
matter of minutes before she'll experience sex as the natural and in
her case very much needed leveller.
     Neal's appeal is limited; she's pre-hardened as most of her movies
begin, so about all that's left to react to are the mind games her
characters insist on playing. Her Kentucky accent suggests an imposing
Tallulah, without the extension of satiric drawl, and she's far more
attractive to look at. Her hyper hot ice demeanor is super charged --
she's a simmering defiant. In her finest hour, as Alma in Martin Ritt's
HUD, there's a looseness -- her Texan-Sears catalog dresses seem to
free her from the haute couture modulation she relied on as acting. But
her dare is strongly catalytic, and Paul Newman's Hud, like Coop's
Roark, is compelled to conquer. Unlike Dominique, who "loves" Roark not
only for his sexual powers but also for the "greatness of (his)
achievements," Alma has always known that Hud's no good; even if she
coaxed on Hud's advances, his assault of her confirms the lowest
estimate he has of her, and women in general. In THE FOUNTAINHEAD,
she's archetypic, a pressure cooker, and -- hard to know if it's
intended -- intensely likable; when she emotes, it's as if she's
edged-out on one of those grass-induced contemplative, paranoiac highs
during which the mind races while the body & face remain chicly
immobile.
     Gary Cooper wasn't much of an actor, though his granite stolidness
was -- and may still be -- appealing because it seemed indestructible;
there was no way he knew how to let us down us in the moral crunch.
Seldom believable in anything he played because his monotone, his
inflexible face never had any depth, he managed to move audiences
anyway: his stiff curmudgeon in LOVE IN THE AFTERNOON taxes us yet
we're delighted that his at-the-very-last-minute romantic sense takes
charge so he can go after Audrey Hepburn. But Coop's pure Americanness
is his reel virtue; he's the independent, sturdy God-like WASP who
reassures audiences against corruption. (James Stewart and Henry Fonda
define morality too, but as actors they once in a while could get
mighty humanly riled up.) Defending himself in THE FOUNTAINHEAD--
having deliberated dynamited a project he designed after it was changed
to meet mediocrity's demands -- Coop is the pinnacle of the stalwart,
resolutely honing in on the blessings of the "creator" and the evils of
the "parasite." A forgone conclusion that the shame he inflicts on a
society mired in conformity will acquit him, it's still persuasive
fifty years after Rand's novel first appeared.
     Robert Douglas is incomparably snakey as Ellsworth M. Toohey, the
"impractical intellectual" architecture critic for the yellow-streaked
N.Y. Banner. The ultimate bourgeois, out to destroy originality that
endangers the mainlining of the mediocre, with cigarette in filtered
holder, penciled mustache, receding hair, Douglas's Toohey is the
emblem of those wanting to control all others and rule the world in
their own image. We've had the snobs-leeches before and since (George
Sanders won an Oscar for his "Ratsputin" DeWitt in ALL ABOUT EVE) yet
none personify the calculated viciousness we know exists in many of
them in quite the way Douglas does; his Toohey might be Rand's updated
perception of Brendan Gill going berserk on venomous afterthought in a
N.Y. Reviews of Books piece about Joseph Campbell -- written after
Campbell's death.
     Rand's the original Libertarian -- the pontess of freedom
advocating "the concept of man as a heroic being, with his own
happiness as the moral purpose of his life, with productive
achievements as his noblest activity, and reason as his only absolute."
That sounds a little like Republicanism before the fundamentalists took
charge with their Contract on America, but even when the
holier-than-thou fascists weren't in power, right-wing had the
connotation that we must conform to a singular idea of what our
democracy stands for: the rich get richer, while the rest become
slaves. It's clear that Rand, through Roark, would rather suffer
hardship before becoming another's lackey. She certainly wasn't a
Democrat, because she railed against social welfare. But she knew
labels themselves were restrictive and dangerous, that though labels
were nebulous of real meaning, they were sold as having strict
definitions, mostly dictates to subservience. Its original source less
so, the movie THE FOUNTAINHEAD is impossible not to like because the
crazy, wildly ludicrous elements that make it an expressionistic attack
against social and spiritual peonage are more torchbearing than ever.
Probably King Vidor didn't have the prescience in seeing it for what it
would become: just about the most liberating bad movie ever made.

Title
Review for Kiss of the Spider Woman (1985)
                 Reading Manuel Puig's KISS OF THE SPIDER WOMAN, I kept
having this nagging doubt: Is Molina, the self-described homosexual window
dresser imprisoned in Buenos Aires for corrupting minors, a real
homosexual or a candidate for a transsexual operation? The question
actually comes so easily as to wonder why all the people who love the
novel and the movie -- with William Hurt as heroine Molina -- aren't
asking it themselves. Puig's book is, of course, stacked against Molina in
such an obvious way -- eight lengthy footnotes are included, explaining
away homosexuality by the likes of Freud, Anna Freud, Lang, D.J. West,
Marcuse -- that how could it be possible to interpret Molina as anything
else? That's what's fraudulent about the book: It provides these archaic
references -- almost as a collective apologia -- about a character that
simply isn't there. Closer to the disguised truth, the novel is
unwittingly ahead of its time while the novelist is not. The tip-off that
we're dealing with someone more than just an old queen comes less than
twenty pages into the book: Molina says, "Since a woman's the best there
is...I want to be one." If a post-adolescent said this to entice and
shock, we'd accept it as part of the process of being an emerging gay --
acting out the vernacular one hopes he'll soon discard. But Molina is no
chicken; he's middle-aged and adamant. Making a clear separation between
himself and faggots, he says, "As for my friends and myself, we're a
hundred percent female. We don't go in for those little games because
that's strictly for homos. We're normal women; we sleep with men." As
shaky as transsexuality may be on physical and psychological grounds, one
of the essential criteria for candidacy as a transsexual is just what
Molina feels: he doesn't consider himself a man, and much less a
homosexual. It's a sad craziness that he calls himself a faggot and
engages in homosexual behavior, but doesn't feel homosexual; in fact, he
hates homosexuals. And never once does Molina betray his inner-most
feelings; you sense that the character is more faithful to himself than
the guilt-soaked author is. Puig allows Molina his fantasy: being pumped
by a "real man" named Valentin (in the movie Raul Julia), a revolutionary
who battles the oppressive Argentine military rule (it's roughly 1976) and
who is jailed in the same cell. Puig extends the fantasy to the ultimate:
He explicitly has Molina state that, after having had his desires
fulfilled, he's ready to die -- and happily! This makes for fermented 40s
melodrama and by no means an accident, but as mechanism and message, it's
nonsense. First of all, as plot device, Puig has already put Molina in
prison for having sex with a minor before the story starts. Except to tell
Valentin why he's been jailed, Molina never speaks about it, we never get
to "see" the minor so that we can judge for ourselves what is meant by
minor, and, most telling, just what would a "one hundred percent female"
be doing with a boy anyway? Secondly, given that Puig is unmistakably
writing more a sexualized polemic than movie-inspired escapism -- had it
been escapist reading, or strictly a compassionate plea for tolerance of
differences, it would likely not have been banned in Argentina -- the
novel's unwitting harbinger to the political Homocaust, and the movie
explicit exemplification. That spider weaving its fateful web for Molina
is the trap of hopelessness -- and who the hell could ever die happily
with that kind of resolution? 
        The late Puig, who answered the perpetual question "Are you gay?"
with "I'm a person," shows a detached sympathy for Molina that isn't
dishonest, exactly, but it suggests the psychologically wormy: Puig, like
many Latin homosexuals, might have been trying to kill what's inside him,
while at the same time revelling in and giving one's self over to gay
melodrama, flaunting contradiction as self-preservation. What's dishonest
is that he sets Molina up to be what's not really in his own head -- a
silly old queen -- and then strips him of his affectations at the end,
turning a 40s heroine into a modern hero, a startling role reversal that
may have worked had he been a flaming sissy who wanted to be a manly gay.
(Which seemed to be the rage during the Jeep & Jeans 80s.) But how can
this be when Molina wants desperately to be a woman? One f... and he's a
butch martyr? The novel isn't persuasively analytical to the degree and
intent Puig rather desperately aims for, unless the reader accepts all the
footnoted psychobabble. And if a reader does, how can he reconcile it to
the character? Though there's a ton of detail designer chat from Molina,
it's all in reference to the lullabies he dreams up to pass the time while
in jail; the info, voluminous and amusing, basically tells us nothing.
KISS OF THE SPIDER WOMAN really isn't a novel at all -- it's a
full-of-holes screenplay in search of actors who have to fill in what's
missing. 
        Feeling trapped as something you're not and living in a place
where much of what makes life worth living is not freely available is a
fairly accurate way to describe the vibes of Buenos Aires. The city is
said to be the most European-looking in all of Latin America, and I think
a travel agent friend hit it on the head when he cracked, "It's Vienna on
a bad day." You're seized immediately not just by the derivative music,
architecture and transportation or lifestyle, mannerism and dress but also
by the heavy moldiness: the dark wood paneling, oversized furniture, dank
draperies and yellowed lace dollies are so omnipresent and oppressive that
you want to hit an exit almost as soon as you enter interiors of
restaurants, hotels, government buildings, stores. (And that there could
ever be a miniature Harrod's says much about the yearning of Argentines to
be something other than what they are.) Even Buenos Aires's manicured
boulevards seem to cut off your oxygen supply, and this may explain why
the cemeteries -- and especially the one in which Eva Peron is said to be
buried in -- are the city's most interesting tourist sights. (You don't
feel fresh-air constricted in Vienna.) Though everything and everyone
looks securely built, you somehow don't trust, you hesitate because you
sense the atmosphere of all pervasive insecurity -- psycho Gothic, like
the tombs. These faked Europeans myopically rush -- and I mean rush, even
faster than New Yorkers -- to wherever it is they go. This rush doesn't
only typify impersonal big city living, it also a permeation of the
dreaded historical Latin American inevitability: that, sooner or later,
the military takes over. If the tango is the national symbol of sexual
dramaturgy, it can also represent the deeply-rooted cult of fascism:
Peron, his Eva are felt in such strong, intangible ways that the tragedy
of Argentina having no recorded moral history is strengthened. While
leathers, sweaters and beef are Argentina's most prized exports, the
arched, slick dance of priggish ritual is the metaphor for a nation
unwilling to import honesty. In conversations with city dwellers, no one
wants to remember the "killing fields" past; their dour, swarthy faces
retrograde into paranoia at any discussion of the tactics of past regimes.
This is what makes APARTMENT ZERO, a perfect companion piece to KISS OF
THE SPIDER WOMAN, particularly unsettling because it gets closer to
verity: when the central character struggles to do the right thing but
instead succumbs to murder and porno, he becomes the symbol of a willfully
sick nationalism.
        A few too many nincompoop critics and moviegoers missed completely
the meaning behind the elaborate fictitious movie Molina describes to
Valentin. This special lullaby is entitled "Her Real Glory," ostensibly
Nazi propaganda about the Germans occupying France and how one dimwit,
rich-hating French chanteuse falls in love with a Nazi officer after he
shows her movies about how world hunger and depression have been caused by
the Jews. (Reminiscent of Hitchcock's WWII propaganda shorts, recently
released on home video.) Can it really be possible for people not to see
that Puig's mocking Eva Peron and her fascist husband Juan? Eva was a
third rate actress when she married Peron, an army colonel, in 1945. Eva
became the living icon for the poor of Argentina -- she had a passionate
hatred for the rich (though that didn't stop her from living lavishly) --
and not too unlike Leni in "Her Real Glory," died the death of a heroine.
(Eva expired from cancer in 1952.) Not even our best movie critic caught
Puig's clever subversion -- but Argentina did and banned the book. It
didn't help Puig any that a previous book of his, about Peron, THE BUENOS
AIRES AFFAIR, was laughably censored: any overt reference to Peron was
left blank. Puig is condemning what is a grievous lack of critical
Argentine biography, of truthful historical introspection. Whatever
happens to Molina and Valentin, representing as lullaby the vast numbers
of oppressed and forgotten, nothing will come of it, no record will be
made of it. When Molina's body is dumped in garbage, who will know of it?
Probably not even his mother.
        Because of the raging politics of the Homocaust at the time, every
major American movie company passed on filming the novel, despite the fact
-- or maybe because -- director Hector Babenco, who did the 1981 stunning
Brazilian muckraker PIXOTE, wanted Burt Lancaster as Valentin and Richard
Gere as Molina. Refusing to give up, Babenco asked Raul Julia, who agreed
and suggested what otherwise would seem like an impossibility: William
Hurt as Molina. Begging for every dollar, deferring salaries against
future profits, they headed to Sao Paulo to film, only to be met by more
resistance. Members of the Brazilian film industry kicked up quite a fuss
because Babenco was neither filming in Portuguese nor using Brazilian
actors for the two leads. Then there was the political consideration which
foolishly demanded that the prison in KISS originally set in Buenos Aires,
be changed to a nameless South American city in order to reduce potential
alienation of the now-civilian government of Argentina, as well as to
avoid endangering potential grosses from the massive Argentine movie-going
public. As if these handicaps weren't enough, Babenco had never made a
movie in English. But he knows the terrain of crud: as with PIXOTE with
its barf-inducing horrors of juvenile dormitories and toilets, he brings
to KISS the decaying textures of grime and slime of cell walls and when
one of the character's suffers from diarrhea, he approaches
Smell-o-Vision. He's a master at shocking sex scenes, taking Pixote's
Oedipal suckling and Molina & Valentin's anal intercourse and makes them
deeply haunting, almost lyrical.  (He was equally prodigious at squalor in
IRONWEED, though more as a cold, Depression muralist: keeping us at a
distance, that movie is like a month of Saturday nights with candidates
for A.A.)
        Something else works for Babenco -- his clarity in showing that
hypocrisy knows no rationale. It's this element that helps make PIXOTE the
most powerful docudrama of its kind; it shoved an updated, more
frightening kind of Pharisaism at us, one every major city is now dealing
with -- throwaway kids. Through subversion and subterfuge, KISS has
principals using and discarding each other, only it's never quite so
explicit as in PIXOTE. Molina's homosexuality is used by the prison and
government officials in order to get Valentin to open up about his
underground organization and activities; Molina is using his sexuality as
a tool to get out of prison; Valentin is using Molina's vulnerability --
knowing Molina wants the love of a "real man" -- in order to get a message
to his compatriots; and, finally, the homosexual issue is used to make a
statement about the worth of people different from the norm. It's obvious
that Babenco uses Molina as a warning about God Squad Fascism, and in the
process just about usurps Puig's caution against Argentina's more
traditional brand of it. Babenco narrows the warning and updates it:
Molina gets it because he's "a f...ing fag." The novel isn't as overt as
that, but what it does say I didn't believe -- that he's somehow a hero
now that he's been good and screwed. As I see it, Molina sacrifices
himself because every fiber of his being said he was a woman but trapped
in a man's body. 
        Unfortunately the majority of moviegoers who view KISS haven't
seen PIXOTE, which has a character named Lilica, who's around 17 and is a
swish, and who probably is by now a drag queen. (If he hasn't been cut
short by AIDS.) Watching William Hurt as Molina, I thought, It's Lilica
all over again, but this time it's not for real. And I mean that literally
because the actor playing Lilica is gay, while of course Hurt isn't. This
bothered some of the nincompoops: Richard Corliss, for example, cries that
Hurt "does not have one queenly bone in his body. It's not just that he's
playing a homosexual; he's playing a raging queen. And he doesn't have the
voice for it, he doesn't have the gestures for it. It's a terrible piece
of miscasting." Corliss conveniently forgets the glories of acting -- he
doesn't want to see our better actors take risks. What he seems to want is
for Michael Greer to reprise his performance from THE GAY DECEIVERS or
Zorro David to pull another Anacleto from REFLECTIONS IN A GOLDEN EYE. Is
Richard Burton to be condemned in STAIRCASE because he didn't have a
"queenly bone in his body"? Because of FRAIDS, there are many who don't
want to see a raging queen in a movie, though MTV has given Rupaul the
chance to broaden his audience in a way the late Divine only got from John
Waters. I would argue that right now only a straight actor without a gay
bone in his body could play a raging swish. Of course the audience is more
comfortable with a Dustin Hoffman in TOOTSIE, or a Robert Preston in
VICTOR/VICTORIA or, most recently, Robin Williams as MRS. DOUBTFIRE --
because the audience knows they're not turning serious on us; in other
words, they're safe. Or safe in the way Peter Finch's homosexual doctor
was in SUNDAY, BLOODY SUNDAY or Tom Hanks in PHILADELPHIA. Maybe what they
are carping about it that Hurt at times goes too far, moving beyond their
own personal comfort levels. Said Puig: "You won't recognize him in this
film -- he's totally changed. A real transformation. He plays Molina with
red hair, flowing gowns. Very risky." Indeed. And it's this daring, this
true gutsiness, that I most admire in his work here. 
        Surprisingly, Raul Julia holds his own against Hurt, which must
have been quite a challenge: watching and having to respond to Hurt's
tricks might have tempted a co-star to just hand the picture over to him.
Julia doesn't; he thwarts Hurt a bit, and when Julia's character is
rightly perplexed by Molina, frustrated by his steadfast belief that
fantasy is better than reality, the confusion and irritation are terrific
balances; we can truly feel his exasperation. And, unlike our willful
suspension of Hurt's obvious lack of ethnicity, Julia looks the part, and
performs the infamous Latin sexual ambivalence with astonishing assurance.
        KISS OF THE SPIDER WOMAN fascinates more for what's not on the
screen or the pages than for what's on them. The relationship between
Molina and Valentin is bogus -- a self-destructive misfit's fantasy -- but
it might have been meaningful, funny, ironic had just once either of them
had said or hinted that Molina, after getting out of prison, should get
himself an appointment with a sex change specialist. It would then have
given him something, a real hope, to be happy about, instead of becoming a
victim of the very spiders he conspired with. Romantically sacrificing
yourself to your own self-hatred isn't very heroic if what you hate really
isn't what you are.     

Title
Review for Streetcar Named Desire, A (1995) (TV)
     Playing one of American theatre's greatest tragediennes--Blanche
in Tennessee Williams' A STREETCAR NAMED DESIRE--actresses tend to go
full hog into actressey mode, surrendering to the techniques of breathy
vocals, flashy southern belle accent, hair and hankie fiddling, psycho
flutterings.  The mannerisms are built in, but they can overtake
performers.  As with Ann-Margret in the 1984 TV version: hers the old
community playhouse try, you keep rooting for her even though you know
the part's much too large and too grandly maddening for a pop star as
sometimes actress.  While amazingly watchable as the whoriest
version--she does a quite fine attempted seduction of the young bill
collector, delivering with slutty exactitude, "You make my mouth
water," and, "I've got to be good and keep my hands off children,"--she
can't get the flowery language to blossom; she hasn't the power or
range to bring pained dignity and restraint to the blooming insanity.
Respectable and respectful as she is, at her most dramatic she sounds
like Betty White's Ellen in "Mama's Family," only more shrill, and she
can't elicit what's mandatory--commiseration for Blanche.  The audience
has to sense that Blanche, right from the start, is walking a tightrope
between crushing realism and magic; in order for the part to get to us,
we have to feel her desperation for the latter.
     Jessica Lange's interpretation of Blanche in the 1995 CBS
Playhouse 90 revival starts out as a super wallow of actressey schtick:
the constant hands to the hair, chest and mouth, the twisting and
pulling of the hankies.  It's already too much and we haven't even
gotten to the showier numbers.  What saves her at the beginning is that
we can hear echoes of Vivien Leigh's incomparable vocal ability to
catch the rhytm and flourishes of Williams' floridness.  Accidental
lift as homage perhaps, but we're sure glad it's there.  Not until
roughly ninety minutes into the play does Lange finally move into
Blanche: looking like the sister Tuesday Weld never told us about,
she's sensational--and later, when thinking over the performance,
haunting--in her disquieting quiet when she tells John Goodman's Mitch
about her husband's suicide.  She gets deep into Williams
territory--his specialty of exposing torment and vulnerability through
poetic dissipation.  She manages more compassion for Blanche than
Ann-Margret, and we can feel the pain of her embarrassment in the
realization that she's got to exit passed Stanley and Mitch on her way
to the loony bin, but the tragedy gets squelched.  Part of this has to
do with the way CBS inexcusably jumped to commercial after the rape,
which lessened the impact considerably.  Part of it may be that Alec
Baldwin's Stanley is too elementarily defined--that is, his motives get
rattled off a, b, c--and therefore whatever mystery lurks within his
brutish ape is terminated.  But mostly, I think, Lange's Blanche is
demonstrative challenge as actress, and not a totally successful inward
reach for the character.  Touching greatness at the conclusion of scene
seven, and again during the final, Lange eludes triumph because she's
reliant on all the externals.
     Yet in spite of the quibbles, the misgivings, I can't get Lange
out of my mind.  Weeks later and her scenes unexpectedly pop into
memory.  If it hadn't been for the notes I took about Ann Margret's
Blanche, I mightn't have remembered much.  But I do recall Leigh's
performance--unforgettable in its anguish and slowly revealed
nutsiness.  The most demanding of Williams' female characters may
require that the actresses playing them also be a little gone.  It's
certainly the key to Leigh's landmark portrayal in Eliza Kazan's 1951
movie.  And Geraldine Page's SWEET BIRD OF YOUTH and SUMMER SMOKE and
Katherine Hepburn's Mrs. Venable in SUDDENLY, LAST SUMMER wouldn't have
been nearly as effective without their imperial, theatrical
neuro-kinesthesia.  Lange, though, isn't the kind of actress one feels
borderline about; her healthiness--her full bodied frame, including
wide rump--and no nonsense demeanor are like ballast, keeping her
stable, especially since SWEET DREAMS, her real comingout.  She faked
it in FRANCES, a somber, cloudy hodgepodge of SNAKE PIT psychotics and
queasy, Reaganesque anti-Communist politics, but she wasn't ready for
the assumed depth: looking hardened from the insulin and shock
therapies and eventual lobotomy, she couldn't act it.  At the end, when
Frances appears on "This is Your Life" as an ad for the wonders of
hocus pocus psychiatry, she's give an odious consolation prize for all
that she suffered--an Edsel; but having to show the difference between
the fiery actress locked up against her will and the mental
somnambulist she became, Lange can't bring a convincing emptiness
because it was already there at the start.  She's much more persuasive
as Carly in Tony Richardson's BLUE SKY.
     A sort of trial run to Blanche--she says to a commander's spouse,
"A woman's charm is mostly illusion"--Carly is wife to lifer Tommy Lee
Jones, and the ravages of inconstancy, the relentless vagabonding from
one base sight to another throughout the years has made her not insane
but a little cracked.  Her daydreams of wanting to be another Ava
torreroing in THE BAREFOOT CONTESSA or a Marilyn wowing the guys in a
SEVEN YEAR ITCH dress are her defense mechanism against the dreariness
of military living; her bold, flirtatious dancing a plea for attention
and physical need.  She's longing for escapist fun: when the
commander's wife speaks about a base sho w she and the other wives are
putting on, Carly festively giggles, "Do you need any dancers?"
Unfortunately, the script gets soggy with social, environmental and
moral consciousness--Tommy Lee Jones suffers the after-ef fects of
post-military McCarthyism--and the movie loses some staying power.  But
Lange hangs in, valiantly giving credence to the melodrama.  And
showing that she can do edge: pitching a fit over the dump she has to
make a home, she runs to the family car, smashes into a jeep and ends
up at a PX, almost losing control as she touches and unravels bolts
of fabric.  Her despairing leads her to unintentionally victimize
Tommy, but, of course, she finally gathers her wits, and, at end,
dragging it up as Liz's Maggie from CAT ON A HOT TIN ROOF, she gets
her Brick back and her smile as she exits the base is as wide as the
convertible she's beaming in.  Carly's mildly dotty but not unhinged;
she's able to use her flightiness as weapon without embarrassment.
     Not long after making BLUE SKY, ready to tackle a real loon, Lange
opened on Broadway with STREETCAR, to a less than enthusiastic
reception.  Having seen only clips from the box, I can guess why: she
was showing the labors of effort--the tricks, tics--and hoping to catch
the essence of Blanche in the process.  However, friends who saw her
toward the end of the 160 performance run say that she seemed to get
transfixed, becoming almost motionless before them, and they felt a
foreboding about her--about Lange, not Blanche.  The thrill of watching
her, said one, was "in whether she'd lose it completely.  She wasn't
Blanche, she was possessed by Blanche."  In the April, 1995 edition of
US, Lange admitted to being swept away. "Sometimes I'd just sit on the
floor and weep.  I felt so alone, I felt so incredibly alone.  After
finishing the run of the play, I actually missed Blanche.  It was a
visceral sensation.  Oh, I miss her so much."  (Her kids would know when
she was in her Blanche mode at home, complaining that she was in the
tub again, with the lights low.)  Lange's still seized by Blanche for
the TV version.  She said, "If you want to talk about the spine of the
character, of course, I think it's really about aloneness.  Wanting to
be able to stop all of this finally.  To find a place to fit in.
Blanche says, 'I want to rest.' I always think that's the key...She can
never rest.  Physically or emotionally, mentally, spiritually."  And
that's central to Lange's portrayal--she never stops.  And it is her
exhaustion, on top of Blanche's and ours, that makes us give in the
inevitable conclusion--that the only way for this Blanche to find rest
is to be put to rest.  It's likely that the drainage is what keeps us
from responding less to Lange than we do with Leigh--that is, the
cumulative effect is in effect a wipeout; we're so tired by the
transfixion that we're relieved to see Lange's Blanche fyked off.
Leigh's Blanche achieves something pitifully supernal: we know she
needs the rest cure, but her "aloneness," that which makes her so
different from her sister Stella, from everyone, is what will never
give her peace, because she is not of this realm.  But Leigh's private
agonies joined with Williams' semi-self portrait (he saw himself more
as Blanche than any other character he wrote) as if an ethereal fusion
of souls.  We're watching the real thing --a real disintegration.
     Lange's no stranger to Williams.  She played Maggie to Tommy Lee
Jones' Brick in a 1984 TV version that was very faithful to the
original play--text-wise.  But when things go wrong in bringing
Williams back as reverent stage or film revivals, they can go terribly
wrong.  Treating his text as sacred, playing without cuts, the
50s-style word heaps sound arched, faked, and--because so many of the
actors in the revivals lack tonal poetry--induce sleepiness.  As
Maggie, Lange is so bad she's beyond laughter; one minute she's Tuesday
Weld, the next Geraldine Page, minutes later she's Page doing Weld, and
then vice versa.  She causes self-willed atrophy; we lapse into
vegetation, trying not to listen to all the blabber. (This happened to
Natalie Wood as well, playing Maggie to husband Robert Wagner's Brick.)
With his pocked, savaged face, Jones might look like a candidate for
homo hanky hanky with Skipper--something we reject in Paul Newman, and
ridicule in Wagner--but he exposes more than the others how
under-developed Brick as character is. (It is irony that it took a
strong, solid male presence like Newman to bring weak, booze-soaked
Brick to movie life; and it's certainly Williams good luck that mostly
good to great actors on stage and in the movies played his lead male
characters, almost all of them weaklings.)
     But Blanche, like Martha in Albee's WHO'S AFRAID OF VIRGINIA
WOOLF? and Mary in O'Neill's LONG DAY'S JOURNEY INTO NIGHT, is a test
of an actress's mettle.  It takes courage to be play a role that strips
you of the protections of vanity, especially when vanity is all the
character has before being raped of it.  While many of Williams' women
border on the seriocomic, deifying as well as mocking matriarchalism
and femininity, endlessly searching for magic but for the most part
trapped by male-dominated reality, Blanche is finally destroyed by the
realism of an act she may have envisioned as a delusional
seduction--that Stanley would succumb to her charms.  It's true that
Williams wrote himself into Blanche, admitting that "we're both
hysterics ... lascivious, demonic," and that both were raped ("I had a
very attractive ass," he told Playboy, "people kept wanting to f...
me.").  It's also true that Blanche's instability comes out of his
sister's tragic mental history--she was lobotomized, a fate that may
befall Blanche.  And during the writing of STREETCAR, originally
entitled THE POKER NIGHT, Williams was involved with a male lover who
became the basis for Stanley.  (A Stanley-like scene: this lover would
one day rage at Williams and throw his typewriter out a hotel window.)
Though Williams wouldn't come to realize it until years later,
Blanche's end was premonition: sloshed and incapacitated on booze and
pills, embittered by an unfeeling, foolish press and unappreciating
Broadway, Williams would for a time be institutionalized against his
will.  So watching Lange (and Ann-Margret) get carted off has an
unintended, heartbreaking resonance for us now--a reminder of an
author's demise, one he never deserved: that even after A STREETCAR
NAMED DESIRE, A CAT ON A HOT TIN ROOF, after so many other hours of
transport, he was considered only as good as his last hit. (Is Gabriel
Garcia Marquez less of a master craftsman because he can't top ONE
HUNDRED YEARS OF SOLITUDE?)  While director Glenn Jordan could have
achieved for Lange a larger degree of greatness had he not permitted
the excesses of her affectations, providing instead a stronger
confidence within herself, what may matter more is that Lange's Blanche
reminds us and reinforces what Williams is often forgotten as--the
female soul of American theatre.

Title
Review for Victor/Victoria (1982)
     Julie Andrews has been maligned for so long that even when she
wanted desperately to change her prissy English tomboy image--as she
tried to do in S.O.B.--she still got a royal spanking from the
critics.  When she bared that ample set of boobs, there was more blase
in the reactions than pleasure.  If any other movie saint had done
this, she'd have been the next month's spread in PLAYBOY.  But Andrews
elicits venom that is, I think, more telling of the temperaments of
some critics; she's an easy target because she defies their case of the
hates through her indomitable spirit.  In defiance to what the vultures
tried to do to her after STAR! and DARLING LILI, two of the most costly
failures in movie musical history, and in spite of a background that
includes a poor education and being a child breadwinner and caretaker
to a mother and alcoholic stepfather, and in spite of being tested by
two daughters drenched in narcissism and drugs, she remains, if always
reserved, a rather naughty, spicy, fun-loving woman. (Something Dick
Cavett knows how to bring out.) I fell in love with her in THE
AMERICANIZATION OF EMILY, in which she co-starred with James Garner.
Got to be one of the most pleasant surprises of the 60s, a low-scale,
sassy anti-war-bittersweet love story, the precursor of sorts to the
late Paddy Chayefsky's other irreverent screenplays, THE HOSPITAL and
NETWORK.  I doubt if Andrews (or Garner) has ever been better.  Her
Englishwoman's shell had cracks in it, some secrets were oozing out.
And confirmed by Andrews to Mike Wallace on a recent 60 MINUTES, on
which she admitted that she had a "wonderful time" doing loves scenes
with Garner. (When those shots were finished, she said, "My knees
buckled.") In LOOK magazine back in 1966, famed photographer of women
Douglas Kirkland confirmed her polished dishiness with a color blow-up
showing tantalizing cleavage; as Alfie might say, she's one sexy bird.
     It's the imagemakers in Hollywood who filled in the cracks with
sugar and the weight of their dubious achievements is painfully obvious
in STAR! and THE TORN CURTAIN and DARLING LILI and THE TARARMIND SEED.
They took what was a winning formula in EMILY, MARY POPPINS, parts of
HAWAII and THOROUGHLY MODERN MILLIE and most of all THE SOUND OF MUSIC
and made it upchucky.  Though packed with Civil Defense supplies of
sweets, THE SOUND OF MUSIC created so powerful a false image for
Andrews that she got trapped; no movie role of hers caught the public's
attention more, and, according to the Hollywood money men, the audience
wouldn't accept her any other way.  But it's more than that: no
musical, with the exception of WESTSIDE STORY (or possibly AN AMERICAN
IN PARIS) has been subjected to more hindsighted scorn.  And she
became, very unwillingly, a dual symbol: one of unasked for saintliness
as well as phoniness.  But nothing I've ever read or heard about THE
SOUND OF MUSIC throughout the years accounts for why it became such a
surprise hit.  The fact is, 20th Century Fox didn't expect much from
it, recognizing the dangers of possible saccharin-induced coma, and
risked it as a roadshow presentation in an effort to recoup costs.  Its
success is decried as an example of how indiscriminate movie tastes
often are.  True as that may be, there's something deeper about how
American audiences initially responded: our involvement in Vietnam was
heating up and, speaking from the personal experience of having entered
the Army at the time, many of us were terrified that we'd be shipped
out alive but brought back in a box.  THE SOUND OF MUSIC was three-hour
comfort therapy; except the blockheads and their kids, most of us knew
how utterly phony it was--perhaps the most manipulative musical ever
made?--but we clung to the rot of its supercalifragilistic family
values because much around us was crumbling.  The imagery of goodness
got to us; despite everything that shouted otherwise, we wanted to
believe in what we knew wasn't. (Even when, in repeated viewings, we
mocked it by singing along with Maria and the brats.) And we were only
a short time away from battling about the morality of that phony
righteousness in the Chicago summer of 1968.
     Stripping the layers of goo hasn't been easy for Andrews, having
tried like hell in HAWAII and STAR! It's clear she's a finite actress,
and having been too well taught theatrical elocution she developed so
irritating a manner of speech that it's almost deigned, as false as
title in royalty.  It had, and still has, a galloping horseshoe
effect--it charges out and ricochets back.  This irritation didn't hurt
much in HAWAII, in that Max Von Sydow was so dominating, so
compulsively watchable.  It was laughable in THE TORN CURTAIN, though
Andrews, and Paul Newman, can't be faulted: According to Andrews in
Donald Spoto's THE DARK SIDE OF GENIUS, "The first day of production,
Hitchcock announced that for him the fun was over--the creative part
was finished with the script and storyboard preparation--and now, he
said, the rest was a bore." Andrews' persona was ruinous for STAR!: all
those years of vocal outreach from the stage to audiences in theatres
destroyed any chance of variety in vocalizing Gertrude Lawrence as the
clever, conniving harridan the theatrical crowd considered her to be.
Unlike those who deemed Andrews's task impossible, I think she could
have played Lawrence had not Robert Wise's shallow vision and overload
of songs weighed her down.  This expensive movie has the shockingly
bogus, stifling look of 60s television, and every number is performed
without any consideration of what Lawrence's peculiar attractions were;
still seeing only Maria, Wise uses Andrews to obliterate Lawrence.
There's a very discernible current of anxiety running throughout
"Star!": the charge could be that Wise is exposing his lowest estimate
of Lawrence as talet and person; I think the stronger charge is that,
though he gets facts fairly right, he doesn't appreciate who and what
kind of talent he's biographing.  When Andrews gets angry in STAR! or
swears in 10, she's not real, she's Maria Poppins at Drury Lane.  Her
boobs in S.O.B. were indeed spectacular, and when she complimented
William Holden on his unadorned handsomeness, the line was wrought with
such feeling that she might have, in reality, been flirting.  The movie
itself was too drenched in vindictiveness to connect with the
audience--a slam against the way the studio that released DARLING LILI
interfered with the final edit, though one look at Rock Hudson should
have told director Blake Edwards that the movie hadn't a prayer.
     In VICTOR/VICTORIA, Andrews works diligently, with more ease and
self-enjoyment and assurance than she ever has, and while she's
imperfect, she hasn't been this likable since THE AMERICANIZATION OF
EMILY.  Out on her a double s and hungry during 30s Paris, she meets
with an old queen--Robert Preston--who has this ingenious idea of
turning her into a man who pretends to be a woman.  Opening her act in
a swanky night club, dressed in a black gown with stringy bat-wing
sleeves and a rhinestone headdress, like Elizabeth Taylor's in THE BLUE
BIRD and Lena Horne's in THE WIZ, and with Liz eye shadow, Andrews as
Victor as Victoria belts out "Le Jazz Hot" and becomes an instant
smash.  In the audience is smoothie James Garner, who's rather unnerved
by and suspicious of his attraction to Victoria who's "really" Victor,
but his dumb-dumb bodyguard Alex Karras isn't.  He applauds, "She's a
winner!" Happy to confirm Andrews is.  Andrews' voice is a tad more
full-throaty this time out--her singing isn't piercingly
antiseptic--though she's not in any way taxed by the pedestrian score
of Henry Mancini and Leslie Bricusse.  There's evidence of a movie
novice's anxiety in her Emily, though it helped her performance
enormously. (It provided a balance to Garner's effortless sleaze.) Here
as Victor/Victoria, Andrews's own sense of relaxation is another
first:  she really loves doing the part, and the audience loves
watching her do it.
     (It is at the completion of "Jazz Hot," when Victoria whips off
her headdress to reveal she's Victor, that the physical charade must
start strong and proceed to be stronger; instead, weaknesses start
revealing themselves.  Greeting the audience as Victor after the
triumph, Andrews' make up and hairdo are too unconvincing to make valid
their intent; she looks even more like a woman than the Polish Count
she's pretending to be.  With the movies' advances in latex cosmetics,
she could have been startlingly boy-man like-in fact, needed to be.
Amid all the sophisticated fake sets, she looks the fakiest.  In the
recent PBS special JULIE ANDREWS: BACK ON BROADWAY, a 90 minute career
retrospective and often a blatent commercial for the Broadway version
of V/V, we see that the makeup artists--and Julie's aging--have made
her Victor physically more convincing.)
     During the beginning of the movie, Robert Preston, finishing a
trifle of a song at a posh gay club, responds to the chilly reception
he gets by saying to the snobby audience, "Thank you, you're most
kind--in fact, you're every kind." It's a tired old bitch put-down, but
as dropped by Preston it gets renewed punch and a lot of laughs.  He
has the role down pat: his Liberace-like hair, the slightest swish in
the seat, the way he holds his arms to his body with just the lightest
limpy-wrists touch--why, he's every woman's best friend, every gay's
auntie.  Clearly the best performance in the movie, it's probably more
than acting--it's love play.  In the most recent years preceeding his
death, Preston had become a close American equivalent to the grace and
relaxation of John Gielgud, both becoming masterful, endearing
finessieurs.  A tribute to Jean Harlow, Lesley Ann Warren as the
brassy, nasal, shocking pink moll hanging on to Garner may appear to be
getting the worst of cliche parts--when she sings "Chicago, Illinois,"
she could be setting heterosexual sexiness back a few decades--but
she's abundantly charming.
     VICTOR/VICTORIA is director Blake Edwards' most cordial and
sustained picture, even if it is a SOME LIKE IT HOT-CABARET rip-off,
and yet another remake of the German VIKTOR UND VIKTORIA.  Filmed
entirely at London's Pinewood Studios, it's a scrumptiously stylish,
chromy, very easy-going musical comedy.  In the 80s era of Reagan
consumption and intolerance, the prankster movie maker of those
Clouseau farces became a softy movie essayist.

Title
Review for Heart Like a Wheel (1983)
        HEART LIKE A WHEEL isn't a great piece of B movie making, because 
it's striving for A status, but it's a terrific little flick nevertheless. 
Directed by Jonathan Kaplan, from a script by Ken Friedman, it tells a 
true story about three-time Top Fuel hot rod racing champion Shirley "Cha 
Cha" Muldowney and sticks to it in the old fashion way. (Though not 
rotting like Tony Curtis' JOHNNY DARK and not in any way as phony 
fashionable as John Frankenheimer's Sominex epic GRAND PRIX.) This is 
assured moviemaking, confident of winning you over. By the end, I almost 
cheered -- a reaction I'm told was common for evening showings. In rooting 
for underdog Muldowney, this picture is somewhat like MELVIN AND HOWARD -- 
with an ending you wish Melvin could have had. The best news of all is 
that HEART isn't just about racing or the women's lib propaganda inherent 
in it, it's also about the relationships between men striving to make it 
and the women they love who become better at what their men are striving 
for. Muldowney, at least in the picture, is one women in a man's world who 
men can admire -- even while using her. The theme isn't heavy duty 
provocative or sexist, but there are some potently provocative and sexist 
moments that pop up -- the realism of the moments startling and cogent. 
        As Muldowney, Bonnie Bedelia's face isn't as strong as it might 
be; she's missing flesh in her cheeks and with a tiny mouth, she has an 
elongated, pinched chin that tends to make us think we're looking at a 
mannequin, particularly when she wears her helmet. She often looks like 
one of the harpies from the soaps -- Robin Strasser's Dorian on "One Life 
to Live." (Sometimes she resembles Peggy Ann Fleming.) But she doesn't act 
as if she's in a soap -- there's no fishwifery. She gives a fine reading, 
using her incomplete face and her eyes and voice as though she's 
constantly opining, especially when she confronts some competition for 
Beau Bridges' affections in a motel restaurant, or when she's on the phone 
talking to her ex-husband, or when, again on the phone, she's giving a 
radio sportscaster an interview. (It is during these phone scenes that her 
faces merges with her character.) To some there may be hints of the Streep 
method, but Bedelia, at times as calculated, doesn't produce any cold 
fronts. 
        Beau Bridges as the famous hot rodder-womanizer Connie Kalitta 
does what Warren Beatty and Jack Nickolson haven't been able to -- 
realistically womanize his way into our suspicious hearts; the lies this 
character tells endears him to us. Flabbed out, unshaven, fingernails 
greased to the max, revelling in his puppy dog act, Bridges gives the most 
honest portrayal of a womanizer that's come out of Hollywood in years: 
every woman knows a man like this and many of them have loved him, and 
every man has had a buddy like him, if not wanting to be like him. What 
makes this performance so beautiful -- and ongoing even when he's not on 
the screen -- is that Bridges makes us understand why he does things 
without ever having to explain. We know why he attempts to beat Bedelia 
after she publicly disowns him (it's the only real act of feminist revenge 
in the picture and we understand that too). Bridges plays scenes that 
spring from our own lives; I couldn't detect a single false note 
throughout. Leo Rossi, as Shirley's ex, and a muscular version of Kevin 
Kline, is another slice of life: a man who doesn't want his wife to 
succeed all that much. When he calls her for money some years after their 
separation, it's a scene that might be ego-humiliating but it works -- 
there's heart and some valid level of pride in it. (Now that I think about 
it, this movie has more phone scenes than an average episode in a soap.)
        HEART LIKE A WHEEL works so well because there isn't any 
feminist-inspired humiliation in it -- an additive that would have been 
easy to mix in. You like everyone in this movie; and you like the movie 
immediately. Kaplan and Friedman don't waste time in establishing 
Muldowney's compulsion: at the beginning we see her as a child sitting on 
her drunken father's lap, behind the wheel of the car, zooming through the 
air. The thrill has been set. A few scenes later, now married, when 
Muldowney's husband agrees to a night time drag race, we watch as she 
stands in the middle of the highway mimicking her husband's shifting of 
gears. It's in her blood but not his and he loses. In the next race, she 
takes over and wins. The crowd cheers and she waves to acknowledge them. 
But it's really a wave of goodbye -- she's lost her heart to the wheel. 
It's when I lost mine, too. 

Title
Review for "Pride and Prejudice" (1995) (mini)
        Jane Austen's self-possessing sense of humor is finally getting
the much wider audience it has long deserved, thanks to the 1995 British
miniseries PRIDE AND PREJUDICE and the Emma Thompson SENSE AND
SENSIBILITY. Austen, who died in 1817 at 42 after a long illness and who
was never "popular" as a novelist while alive, probably had to suffer the
misfortune of waiting until the 20th Century to get full recognition
because, in her most well known works, P & P being the most famous, she
was trenchant observer of behavior. In spite of and probably impelled by a
lifetime limited to living with her family, which included seven brothers
and sisters, and being educated at home and travelling little, Austen
offered her maiden energy to unnerving, unaccustomed distaff insights
which had to sting the real people on whom her characters were based. One
can only imagine, for example, the horror the actual personage(s) that
Lady Catherine de Berg represents must have endured over Austen's
devastating profile. And no less than Austen's own mother might have
become "vexed" by the portrait of the exasperating Mrs. Bennet. Through
her characters, Austen rarely hesitated to cast initial judgment on others
-- hence the original title of P & P: the ironic "First Impressions."
Understanding the human inclination to do so, perceiving faults and
weaknesses, she conjured embarrassing social ordeal as means to rectify
them. She did in the early 1800s what Dickens would later do, but she did
it without any exhibitions of violence, menace, corruption. Moralist she
was, thanks in large part to her father being a rector (and her mother was
a daughter of one), but unlike Dickens, no heavy social critic: her
stories don't indict society, only the scoundrels in it. Austen's a comic
disciplinarian of manner, custom, propriety. Directed by Simon Langton,
and adapted by Andrew Davies, this latest PRIDE AND PREJUDICE most likely
sparks so responsive a cord in the audience -- in England, 40% of all
televisions were tuned in to the final chapter; and A & E's airing of the
series garnered the network its highest ratings -- because there's a
strong longing for civility and beauty of language. As we feel our own
society dive into hatred, watch as our culture sinks into an "it sucks"
cesspool, viewing the cultivated banter between Colin Firth's Darcy and
Jennifer Ehle's Lizzie Bennet is like an oasis of rejuvenation. It isn't
that we accept the virginal nonsense of love even before a kiss, it's the
restoration of politeness: Darcy and Lizzie raging at each other is the
art of temperance. It's in the richness of the way words have been
designed to inflict wounds and self-righteous opinion, impart wisdom, to
reverberate with humor, compassion and passion itself. 
        After his simpy Vicomte in Milos Forman's VALMONT, after his
repressed, prissy invert-turned-fascist in the sickie APARTMENT ZERO, who
could have guessed Firth an appropriate Darcy? Looking taller than usual,
employing an aristocratic butch gait (the Napoleonic coats and top hats
help), having gained some fleshiness in the face, which is covered with
soft, short nongreasy curls, he brings a bit of Laurence Olivier's Darcy
to the brooding, snob-loner -- perhaps as tribute -- but he's no clone:
this is Firth's first real masculine romantic, and not too far removed
from the monde of Beau Brummell. Photographed to take advantage of the
seemingly endless silence he and Lizzie indulge in, Firth's also very
fortunate that he isn't agonizing over Greer Garson, as Olivier did.
(Pauline Kael on Garson: "A viewer can get weary watching that eyebrow
that goes up and down like the gold curtain at the old Met.") A puffy
Barbara Parkins crossed with Mary McDonnell, Jennifer Ehle's Lizzie, the
second oldest of five Bennet daughters, has a curiously courteous
objurgation that both attracts and repels: the attention she gets for her
various sentiments, notions and social position (which is always in danger
of ebbing) are also the sins used against her by the upper class bitches
-- Lady de Berg, Bingley's sister (in hilarious get ups). Excepting EMMA
and MANSFIELD PARK Austen supposedly never wrote characters of deep
intellectual persuasion, yet Ehle gives Lizzie the kind of searing smarts
that keeps enemies at bay. Ehle has wonderful moments of self-recognition
about her early, faulty views, and only the audience shares in the most
revealing: when she takes in Darcy's mansion. You can "see" her
envisioning herself as the Mistress of Pemberly. The patriarch of the
Bennets is warmly played by Benjamin Whitrow, who's never above calling
three of his five "the silliest of girls"; the youngest silly Lydia, who
almost causes a fatal social calamity, gets the Tracey Ullman treatment by
Julia Sawalha; and Barbara Leigh-Hunt's Lady Catherine is another hybrid:
Margaret Hamilton as Pamela Brown. 
        The first two hours of PRIDE AND PREJUDICE are just about the
funniest pre-Victorian sitcom I've ever seen. That's compliment, not
put-down: director Langton faithfully brings all of Austen's liveliness to
what is a very restricted situation: five brides in search of five moneyed
dandies. The next two hours remain frothy as they get into the requisite
"deepening" of character motivations. (And into Lizzie's realization of
what it would mean materially not to be Darcy's wife.) The final two wrap
it up with more satisfaction than we might have thought possible, since we
know from the beginning that opposites attract and swooning romanticism
will triumph. Yes, indeed, it's all rather like the Bard's MUCH ADO ABOUT
NOTHING, only here readers and viewers get the good dose of Anglo-Saxon
uprightness as bonus. Austen's lack of success as a novelist during her
living years doesn't mean she wasn't appreciated: Sir Walter Scott was a
great champion who admitted that he didn't have the ability to create
Austen's perfectly drawn characterizations. But she had detractors, the
most famous being Mark Twain, who could not abide her love, if not
establishment, of debutante romanticism. Sadly, Austen was never to know
how she would so vex the frauds. Maybe that's the key to her popularity
today: she's the undisputed queen of genteel vexers. She could be to the
besieged Princess Di a mentor in waiting.

Title
Review for Nixon (1995)
        Doomed to the humiliation of resignation over the two bit
Watergate burglary, shattered and dangerously close to the emotional
brink, Anthony Hopkins as Oliver Stone's NIXON stands before an
appropriately sorrowful portrait of JFK and says, "They look at you and
see what they want to be. They look at me and see what they are." It's a
powerful, stinging moment because it's catheterizing: the words channel
not only into Hopkins but also into us as if insertions of excruciating
self-recognition. The complexities of Richard Nixon were and remain his
pathology of lies and fabrication of enemies, which held hostage an entire
nation. Though the only solution the anesthesia of his departure, the
legacy of the politician who built his career on dirty tricks and the
surreptitious continues unabated: the GOP owes its current fair fortunes
on Nixon's devious, sleazy methodology. While Senator Allscum D'Amato subs
as the Nixonian dirty deed plotter for the time being, Robert Dole sobbing
at the Lyin' King's funeral is a most defining, foretelling moment. 
        Anthony Hopkins isn't the first choice most of us would have made
to play our 37th president. And, as we now know, when Stone and Hopkins
started filming, the Welsh actor was deep in prosthetics and voice
duplication. Didn't work because no matter how good an actor Hopkins is,
he couldn't rise above the weight of caricature. Lest we forget, we've
already had that anyway: for example, in the TV miniseries BLIND AMBITION,
Rip Torn mimicked the president so uncannily, so incorrigibly that while
he drafted us into watching him, we wondered if he realized that his
acting had turned into a masquerade of old plaster. A super-scummy
mechanical contraption, we became as exhausted by Torn's preparations -- I
swear that we were able to see them being processed -- as he seemed to be.
Granted, taking on the role of a famous contemporary, particularly the
infamous, is a harder challenge for an actor than trying to bring to life
a famous figure who is historically out of our time. Creating a character
who can't be traced through the omnipresent media can give an actor the
edge; he can take chances in bringing the personage to life in his own way
without having to repeat exactly what we already know, which, right now,
is the most popular form of "acting." For instance, Derek Jacobi stunned
viewers with his title role in I,CLAUDIUS; watching him stutter, squint,
shake and fumble, grow from presumed idiot to master politician, one felt
that not only can history come alive but that TV performance can also
become art.  Like Rip Torn's Nixon, however, Jacobi's Hitler in INSIDE THE
THIRD REICH is a victim to all the media-produced history available. It
can be said that because there's a plenitude of material -- in Hitler and
Nixon's cases next to impossible to digest -- the roles seem safe only
when the actors lip-synch the parts. What happens when actors do this is
that when they imitate the more notorious media-framed impressions, they
become the imagery of our worst, most superficial suspicions about the
people they're only playing. It's not acting, in search of a fresh
perspective or new insights, it's kareoke as verdict. 
        Is the art of respectable representation of the famous in danger
of turning into the art of trashing? If Torn's performance in the
parody-by-accident, bizarrely cast BLIND AMBITION begs the question, maybe
there's no other way to play other than "dress up," which provides a
safety net for audiences so they can somehow believe no one could be like
that or permit such the atrocities Hitler did -- a mechanism to relieve
themselves over the horrible fact that they voted for them. TNT's
KISSINGER AND NIXON, wanting to play it straight, reinforces the dilemma:
drenched in prosthetics, fat pads and speech affectations, Ron Silver as
Henry and Beau Bridges as Tricky Dicky soak up the good intentions and
what seeps out is slightly elevated Mad magazine; it's a drag show in
suits. The TV pic is further robbed of its seriousness because the script
can't cover in two hours (and probably not even in six or eight) the
verbosity and pompous megalomania of Kissinger. Most harmful is that
KISSINGER AND NIXON lacks establishment of fact and clarity of
after-effect. If healing is time's greatest virtue, one of its dangers is
that we forget how the duplicitous shenanigans of statesmen can put a
trusting nation in the vise: Henry and his boss were two of the biggest
prevaricators of their political time who, while playing games with each
other, kept us as emotional prisoners. KISSINGER AND NIXON doesn't flush
us with that kind of fear; instead, it turns an elected sociopath and a
German Machiavelli into pop-up cartoons. 
        If only it were that simple -- to laugh off the damage they
inflicted. But the tragic travesty of Watergate can be comic: Of the
movies and television that have reconstructed the fiasco, my favorite is
Michael Lindsay-Hogg's NASTY HABITS, set in a Philadelphia nunnery and
based on Muriel Spark's satire THE ABBESS OF CREW. It's a delicious little
mockster that didn't do very well back in 1977, having come after the
overrated, chiaroscuristic ALL THE PRESIDENT'S MEN, which used an unnamed
Judas to make us feel good about the press. (As timely as it was, a
catharsis of sorts, its grungy-grim dramaturgy is, now, unwatchable; it's
as paranoid as its target.) NASTY HABITS, however, is extremely watchable;
attacked by many for being an offender of Catholicism and therefore a
sacrilegious format to mock Nixon, it's a classy burlesque that wouldn't
be nearly as effective as it is without Glenda Jackson. Her Nixon is a
performance tilted to disturb on various levels, the most obvious being
the worrisome Nixon loner imperialism, his unearned haughtiness, his
terseness in speech and manner. Neither heavy handed impersonation like
Torn's nor the effervescent demon of Jason Robards Jr.'s portrayal in
WASHINGTON BEHIND CLOSED DOORS, Jackson gets the hard-boiled covering of
Nixon down so pat that sometimes, briefly, Nixon's impenetrable persona
seems to suddenly appear. It's a little alarming, and meant to be, because
at times, when Nixon was publicly emoting, he scared the hell out of us in
that we hadn't a clue as to what he was really feeling. Having been
deceivingly shallow and contrived for so long that when he did display
emotions we had to wonder what new tricks were being employed. NASTY
HABITS is too short to get into psychology, but Jackson isn't afraid to
show us the slippery side, and she achieves this through crisp,
ultra-sharp enunciation that is like hot ice. Male actors playing Nixon go
for the piercing cold too, but Jackson's scenario isn't "just the usual
confession," it's hypnotic. 
        Hopkins as Nixon is a real reach into the man that all the other
performances have shied away from, and primarily, one might assume,
because no director had the guts to try for a definitive study. This is
the surprise of NIXON: that Oliver Stone of all possible directors
attempted to do it. Scene for scene, it's his most balanced, even
honorable work. The caveat is that it's as balanced and honorable a
portrait of Nixon that Stone could accept as the kind of prejudicial,
provoking artist that he is. Because of JFK, Stone has made it easy for
his detractors to attack him for alleged distortion and out and out
fantasy, and, not unexpectedly, the Nixon daughters have issued a
statement of public condemnation over NIXON. Not unlike Dole carping about
violence in movies he never sees, or the  Christers screaming about
Scorsese's LAST TEMPTATION OF CHRIST before they ever viewed it, the Nixon
girls, at the time of the statement, hadn't seen Stone's three hour etude.
If or when they do, there's a slim chance they're feel embarrassed by
rushing to premature conclusions. Stone's script, annotated to support the
wormiest of claims made, won't pass muster with them, but watching their
father through Hopkins is likely to cause flashes of hurtful memories when
they hear this Nixon warn about "the lie" and "the cover up." And deep
pain when they watch Hopkins achieve an intense, extraordinary dimension
built from torment, especially when his Nixon asks Paul Sorvino's
Kissinger to knee with him and pray; when Hopkins is consoled by Joan
Allen's Pat just before they climb the White House steps to the
presidential quarters for one of the last times; and when Hopkins
verbatims Nixon's farewell to the White House staff. It is not possible to
be unaffected by these progressions into dissolution. 
        Hopkins validates the famous Nixon imagery; Stone's "fairness,"
though, isn't the same as fact. Before the movie starts, we're told that
the screenplay is based on what's published, that much of what is
available is contradicted by an equal amount of material, and that the
play condenses, composites and conjectures. Well, that's more honest than
he usually is about his subjects, yet that doesn't stop him from
theorizing without much solid support: that Nixon got involved with
attempting to execute Castro, but the mess backfired and JFK was
assassinated as punishment. And that that is the reason why Castro has
been left alone: like J. Edgar Hoover, Castro knows where the bodies are.
There are slimy insinuations that Nixon was involved in Bobby Kennedy's
death, and in the shooting of George Wallace. (Stone must have read the
predictions of computer pioneer Edmund Berkeley.) The director's not above
putting accusations of crimes into Pat Nixon's mouth: she reminds Nixon
that she knows what he did to Alger Hiss, who unwittingly made Nixon
nationally recognized. As Stone postulates, NIXON becomes a badly edited
Reader's Digest version of Fawn M. Brodie's RICHARD NIXON: THE SHAPPING OF
HIS CHARACTER: lots of smeary quotes, gossipy tidbits, truncated
flashbacks, but no shaping. 
That's what makes NIXON a less than satisfactory picture: there's so much
peripheral garbage thrown in that you end up fighting to stay interested
-- you can feel yourself pushing away all the Adobe After Effects in order
to get to the man. The graphic pizzazz in NATURAL BORN KILLERS might have
been all right for the twentysomethings fed on MTV, but it not only
doesn't belong in NIXON, the filler takes away from Stone's limited
respectability. Cautioning about the psychology of deception, of envy, of
enemies, and how they almost always backfire when used to maintain power,
Stone is striving to produce a rather admirable examination. But he's only
got himself to blame for not getting the kind of positive reaction he
wants, because I doubt anyone begged him to infuse NIXON with an overload
of junked up technology. What hasn't been intended by Stone is what seems
clearer now than during the turmoil of Nixon's immediate and post
presidency: that the myth of Nixon's cavernous complexities is just that.
Through fuzzy-of-meaning flashbacks, which include scenes of Nixon's
parents Frank and Hannah, Stone tries to establish the origins of Nixon's
behavior, but as one watches, and notices what's missing -- like when at
seven he slammed a hatchet into the head of a six-year-old boy after he
refused to give Dick a jar of pollywogs; or Dick's disappointment in not
being able to attend Yale (that, had he attended, might have abated
instead of exacerbated his vengeful hate of the rich) -- it's apparent
that the director can't get to any root causes and linking manifestations
because he can't see where they are. All of us are thicker and fuzzier
psychologically than we'd be willing to admit, but with Nixon, once you
"get it," much about him falls into place. 
        The star-studded cast is, overall, unobjectionable, with Madeline
Kahn as big mouth Martha Mitchell very funny. (There are other laughs in
the movie, but those few of us who managed some chuckles did so with
inexplicable discomfort.) There's a wonderful bit of E. G. Marshall as
John Mitchell in shadow; David Hype Pierce's John Dean a semi-serious
equivalent to Sandy Dennis' ditzsy Dean in NASTY HABITS; Sorvino looking a
little too tanned but getting Henry's speechiness down quite well; and
last but not least, Joan Allen as Pat. Here's a first lady we still know
next to nothing about, and even if Stone claims that sufficient research
has gone into the part, and backed up by advisers who supposedly knew the
"inside story," this Pat is conceived as the public wants to see her.
She's the public "silent majority," mutely suffering for her husband's
sins, but privately she's a chain-smoker (the real Pat died of lung
cancer), drinker, embittered by a lack of love, affection and sex. And a
sort of secret liberal needler: You really want to believe it when she
tells Hopkins' Nixon, "I know why people hate you." If Kahn is close to
looking like Martha, Allen's resemblance to Pat is spooky. In their
understandable protectiveness, the Nixon girls will tell us neither their
mother nor father were drinkers, but the evidence is strong that they
were. (Considering the pressures, you can't condemn them; and Nixon blames
Pat's stroke in 1976 on Woodward and Bernstein's THE FINAL DAYS.) Many of
us regret that Pat Nixon never spilled the beans. No one could have been
more authoritative.
        The passing of Richard Nixon has been an excuse for some, like
Kissinger, Alexander Haig and that weeping Dole, to wax a certain kind of
poetic mendacity about the late president's achievements. But thanks to
the myriad of books, articles, movies, miniseries and, most damning of
all, news film and those tapes on Watergate, eternal reminders of the sad
fact that a stultifying break-in snowballed into the self-destruction of a
president, Nixon will never be allowed to escape his true heritage. No
adversary could have concocted a more just finale: everything we ever
suspected about Nixon was confirmed almost daily during the prolonged
crisis, especially that he was liar, obstructionist, and, maybe most
dangerous of all, paranoid. Could Nixon have survived despite these sins,
if he had destroyed the tapes, as Pat in NIXON suggested? Most of us
probably doubt it. While some evidence would have been more difficult to
attain, the arrogant act of burning them would be tantamount to guilt and,
inevitably, he'd have been re-crucified by the press, who, some are sure,
would have found ways to muddy up his foreign policy triumphs -- China,
mainly -- by calling them betrayals to his hatred of the Reds. (Nixon's
domestic policies were disguised liberalism.) Our national hate for Nixon
goes back to the late 40s, and, though we have forgotten, even Eisenhower
detested him, having twice wanted to remove him from the Republican
ticket. But by the time Nixon was finally elected president in 1968, with
indeed the horrible help of the assassinations of the Kennedys, we were
swirling in the maelstrom of Vietnam, unable to convince ourselves that
the war was, one, strategically unimportant, two, our fault, and three,
immoral. Nixon's close victory came about because his stalwart
anti-Communist stance -- which was a political expedient and leftover from
the old McCarthy days -- still resonated; enough fear-loaded voters fell
for his lie about a "secret plan" to end the war and agreed with him that
the press was to blame for our mounting losses. (Anti-Communism, the press
and the hippies were used by a sick nation to forgive itself for Kent
State.) Shortly after he was reelected in a landslide in 1972, the
still-raging war had two fronts: in the jungles of Vietnam and at home, in
the offices of the President. When the burglary of the Democratic National
Party offices was irrefutably linked to Nixon, every lie converged and
nineteen months after his January, 1973 inaugural, he resigned in
disgrace. What didn't go away, and remain rampant as ever, are the tools
scumbags use to lord over those who elected them or read them: when a
former Nixon propagandist, blinded by the black blizzard of Watergate and
suspiciously forgetful of Nancy Reagan's shadow governance, calls Hillary
Rodham Clinton "a congenital liar," what's being sanction by the New York
Times are promulgation of agenda and, make no mistake about it, a
columnist's and a New York senator's infectious misogynistic obsessions to
destroy a first lady who was once a part of the legal legion investigating
Watergate. They're creating enemies who needn't be, just like Nixon who,
according to that columnist on an A & E Biography, "redeemed himself" in
the end. Only a patent liar, a virtual son of a male bitch, could mouth
the biggest lie of all.

Title
Review for Americanization of Emily, The (1964)
     Based on William Bradford Huie's novel, THE AMERICANIZATION OF
EMILY has got to be one of the most pleasant surprises of the 60s -- a
low-scale, sassy anti-war love story. Adapted by the late Paddy Chayefsky,
it's a precursor of sorts to his irreverent, anti-establishment
screenplays THE HOSPITAL and NETWORK. Fronting as a Navy Commander-aide de
camp to Admiral Melvyn Douglas, James Garner is really one of the infamous
"dog-robbers" of WW II, those notorious personal assistants as foxy
purchasing agents who made sure that every imaginable need, want and vice
were provided for their bosses. (The robbers continue today.) Garner's not
supposed to be quite so attractive, what with his shit-eating grin, his
practicing cowardice, his ever-ready boxes of Hershey's and -- to the
amazement of all who see it -- his small warehouse of contraband like a
miniature Harrods. But in that those he encounters -- especially Julie
Andrews as Emily and her mother -- have all suffered from the mounting
death from war, his recreant's honesty is acid-laced yet magnetic: "God
save us from all the people who do the right thing." Sizing up Andrews'
reserved smugness, he cracks, "You're something of a prig." Irritated by
her bemoaning his party mood in the middle of war, he says, "Lay off, Mrs.
Miniver." Garner's Charlie is Huie's creation, but it's Paddy who put
Charlie on the soap box: his word heaps have the unmistakable pitch of
Paddy's rantings on hypocrisy; viewers not having seen EMILY but who have
seen NETWORK will be reminded of Peter Finch's Howard Beale. Never better,
Andrews' Englishwoman's shell has cracks in it, some secrets oozing out --
confirmed by Andrews to Mike Wallace on a recent 60 Minutes, on which she
admits that she had a "wonderful time" doing loves scenes with Garner.
(When those shots were finished, she said, "My knees buckled.") In Look
magazine back in 1966, famed photographer of women Douglas Kirkland
confirmed her polished dishiness with a color blow-up showing tantalizing
cleavage; as Alfie might say, she's one sexy bird. (Mind you, that's
thirty years ago, but I recall that picture well because I had it hanging
inside my Army barracks locker in Wurzburg.) EMILY as full introduction to
Andrews gave me a goodie-goodie immunization and for this I'm still
thankful, because I was lucky enough not to have first suffered shattered
ear drums from her piercing-like singing or feel oppressed by the
sugar-weighted baggage of Maria. Her Emily is prig, is bitch, and if her
novice movie acting shows, it's fitting: English Emily is a closet case,
outwardly the stoic martyress, inside as much of a sensualist as extrovert
Charlie. And Garner's waggish, effortless sleaze is irony of the most
charming kind: his Charlie's rapid-fire ravings reverb as wisdom even
while admitting, despite prangs of conscience, he's "not equipped to deal
with the truth," most particularly in light of the hero worship he'll
receive as the first victim on Omaha Beach to come back from the dead. If
there are too many harangues -- like an addiction, Paddy often didn't know
when to stop -- Garner makes them worth listening to; you sense that he
knows as an actor that he might never get dialogue this meaty again. (So
far he hasn't.) Directing Paddy's THE HOSPITAL too, and inexplicably
nominated for a best director Oscar for LOVE STORY, it's pretty much
unchallenged that EMILY remains Arthur Hiller's best movie. His confining,
pedestrian style showcases Paddy's zesty pontifications and the cast's
equally joyful verve in reciting them. Douglas, who won the Oscar for HUD
the year before, proves once more there's gold to be mined in character
parts. His Admiral's crazed visions of military glory via subterfuge have
uncomplimentary echoes. Try to avoid the colorized version: it has all the
hues of a latrine.  

Title
Review for Age of Innocence, The (1993)
     From the very start, with the Victorian calligraphy as the
background for the blooming flowers during the credits, to the first
scenes inside an opera house, with Gounod's "Faust" being performed, to
the next set of views touring a splendidly highbrow 1870s New York
mansion overflowing with a decor of velvet, art and stuffed mannequins
as people, viewers are gasping at the implausibility: Can this really
be a Martin Scorsese picture?  Based on Edith Wharton's 1921 Pulitzer
prize-winning novel about ill-conceived and hypocritical American
upper-class adoption of European sophistication, THE AGE OF INNOCENCE
at first glances might seem the atmospheric product of James Ivory and
Ismail Merchant.  Hard to believe, but Scorsese equals them: made in
honor of one of his favorite movies THE HEIRESS, and designed by Dante
Ferretti, THE AGE OF INNOCENCE looks like a gilded age vision by
Luchino Visconti, John De Cuir or John Box, and there's an undeniable
resemblance to Ingmar Bergman's FANNY AND ALEXANDER.  Like Bergman's
feast, Scorsese's is so fancy and rich in detail--everything's splashed
as layouts from Architectural Digest and Gourmet magazines--that you
could get woozy and may have to hit the smelling salts.  (Because
Bergman packed in so much demonstrative warmth, some of us regretted
not taking along the Vivirin.)  But in perhaps the only touch of
modernity that Scorsese risks in this his most audacious movie is that
he allows the unrequited love between Wharton's soon-to-be-married
Newland Archer and the rumored-to-be-loose Countess Ellen Olenska to
not only sadden but also anger us.  This isn't just a story or picture
about stifling customs of denial or high society values; it's a story
and picture about our hypocrisy over values--relinquishing ourselves
to others' demands of imperatives we don't believe in.
     Though David Lean was first in bringing E. M. Forster to the
screen, with the pumped-up nothingness of A PASSAGE TO INDIA, most
viewers rightly believe that Ivory and Merchant have more successfully
brought the genteel sage to film in A ROOM WITH A VIEW, MAURICE and
HOWARDS END.  I've read in some national magazines that Scorsese's
among the first to bring Wharton to viewing audiences, but this isn't
so: the honorable ETHAN FROME was delivered three months prior, and
came and went in a flash.  (Maybe because Liam Neeson needed a co-star
with at least as much of passion.)  Wharton's THE OLD MAID was a 1935
award-winning play adapted by Zoe Atkins,and later a 1939 soaper
starring Bette Davis.  And deep into forgotten movie trivia is
Wharton's 1922 THE GLIMPSES OF THE MOON, made into a film that featured
dialogue titles by F.  Scott Fitzgerald, and there was a forgettable
stage version of AGE starring Katharine Cornell and Franchet Tone.  But
Scorsese picked the right Wharton material as his first foray into the
genre of American period piece: his two lovers are ruled by a snobbery
of class not too much unlike the sociopaths and goons who rule over
their victims in his charged-up modern Americana.  The central
difference, of course, is that there are no bloody corpses as
pornography, though one could argue the lavish spreads of settings and
food in AGE are rather porno-ish in their arbitrariness.  Yet that's
part of the appeal of Wharton: as much as she's criticizing the social
dictums by which her characters are forced to live, she's trapped them
in orgies of addicting lushness.  And Wharton herself more than most:
she was born into and lived the exceedingly pampered life of high
social class New York.  (Like Mark Twain before her and F.  Scott
Fitzgerald after, she did much of her writing in the comfort of her
bed.  Once, when she discovered that a hotel room bed did not face the
light, she flew into a "fit of hysterics.") She was both protege of and
 travelling companion to Henry James, who is the most obvious influence
on her as a writer: she picked up the exactitude of James's prose
style, as well as interlacing her narratives with biting commentary,
just as James did, especially in his THE BOSTONIANS, the seminal work
out of which THE AGE OF INNOCENCE might have sprung.  (Ironically,
James Ivory directed the movie version of the pungently observed
BOSTONIANS, and turned it into an undertaker's adaptation--all laid out
and ready for burial.)  Wharton, who was actually born in France and
was the first woman win a Pulitizer Prise and receive an honorary
degree from Yale, would perform readings, often at her chateau in
Hyeres, of her works-in-progress in front of James and French novelist
Paul Bourget, both of whom specialized in the psychological.
     The gamble for Scorsese is that he didn't give in to what the
movie audience is longing for--the coming together of Countess Olenska
and Newland Archer.  (Newbold is, by the way, Wharton's middle name.)
Had he done so, only the purists would have howled, because our
feelings of distrust for the dictates of others are blood-raw right
now.  That's why the conclusion gets to us in ways we're not prepared
for: we can feel the pain in what the two doomed lovers are forced not
to do--that there would be no real shame in flaunting disregard,
especially in that divorce was already legally sanctioned by the state
at the time.  Wharton's caution, one that Scorsese is surprisingly
subtle in delivering, is that the waste is even more hurting because
these lovers are conspired against to prevent what the conspirators
realize is much more than a flirtation.  Olenska and Archer become
victims to false propriety; they suspect it, the conspirators
definitely know it, and we are left to suffer it.  THE AGE OF INNOCENCE
is a march to folly, and in his only truly fine scenes, coming at a bon
voyage dinner and at the end, Daniel Day-Lewis, as Newland, forces us
to grieve for his loss, his own lack of courage.  The audience in the
theatre fell dead-silent as Newland, bracing himself with his cane as
if it's his only fortitude, makes his decision, and for seconds
afterwards no one moved.
     When casting was announced, no one assumed Daniel Day-Lewis was
wrong for the part of Archer, but there were rumblings about Michelle
Pfeiffer as Olenska and Winona Ryder as Archer's soon-to-be-wife May
Welland.  It's the snot in those who bitched: somehow the prestigious
Day-Lewis belongs in period costume, and Pfeiffer, despite being in
DANGEROUS LIAISONS, and Ryder, despite being in BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA
and LITTLE WOMEN, might not.  But the tables turned and it's Day-Lewis
who isn't quite suited for this story.  No one can call him bad, but
he's mostly unaffecting--until, of course, the ending.  He seems
disassembled--parts of him are there in a corner, weak and prissy and
always it seems on the verge of tears; parts of him seem disbelievingly
mansion-sized self-assured; parts of him simply don't make sense--like
defending Countess Olenska in the first third of the story and then
later denying himself the pleasures of his conquest.  (We're talking
about a 1870s New York City, which even then was a thriving metropolis,
so did no snob ever utilize the city's largeness as a cloak of
privacy?)  Some of his scenes with Pfeiffer bring to mind Jeremy Irons'
Charles Smithson in THE FRENCH LIEUTENANT'S WOMAN.  Day-Lewis can be
all of many things, and all at once, because he's one of the few very
physically thin actors who imparts evolutionary credence; his frame has
the uncanny ability to transmogrify itself.  (In close-up, he's got a
jutting jaw that we can sometimes get lost in.)  Not yet the equivalent
of Olivier, he is the other side of the Atlantic's version of our
Dustin Hoffman.  But since MY BEAUTIFUL LAUNDRETTE, wherein he's
indescribably right as a gay punker, he's become an icon of fakery.
The smart set's still raving about his Tomas in Philip Kaufman's THE
UNBEARABLE LIGHTNESS OF BEING, in which he plays, of all things, a
sex-obsessed brain surgeon-turned-window washer.  He pours on the
illicit naughty boy charm so thickly that it would be understand ably
easy to assume he's sexy.  Not quite; he's a vacuum--using his brows
and the whites of his eyes and a day or two's growth of beard against
his dark skin and his slinkiness to project the image of sexuality.
Behind the facade is something limp: he's like a young Bradford
Dillman, with just a hint of a satyric Rip Torn--only beautified.  That
women peel off their clothes for him as soon as he bats his moody eyes
is fantasy, and it's charming in a feathery way, but what's missing is
the heat of his seductions--they're as cold as UNBEARABLE's
atmosphere.  (He confirms the maxim that sometimes sex is best when
it's confined to our imagination.)  Wearing a top hat and heavily
starched collars with more comic aplomb than any actor since Fred
Astaire, he was a scream in an unexpected take-off as E.M. in Forster's
own A ROOM WITH A VIEW.  (A minority view--no one I kno w agrees.)
While recognizing the torture in his greatness as Christy Brown in MY
LEFT FOOT, I'm simply not a good enough human being to have been able
to sit through its entirety.  Yet what I derived out of what I saw is
what has come to fore in Day-Lewis in THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS and now
here in AGE.  He's endlessly posing, alternately a still life of agony
or an insufferable smoothie, dangerously self-satisfied with his own
reflection.  Though only the meteorologists earned their pay for
MOHICANS (and 1492: CONQUEST OF PARADISE: when have two movies in the
same year ever been so misty, foggy, cloudy, rainy, hazy?), Day-Lewis,
in long hair and plentiful goodness, reminds us of Jeffrey Hunter's
emblematic Christ in KING OF KINGS; he even resembles Hunter throughout
the picture.  It was during MOHICANS that I started to feel unsettled
about Day-Lewis, and the way in which Scorsese and cinematographer
Michael Ballhaus defer to him here in AGE--and it starts with the very
first shot of him--I don't think it's at all too early to consider
that, in what may be his "artistry," he's becoming the movies' most
accomplished con.  David Strathairn would have been my choice for
Newland.
     Scorsese admitted in interviews that he in fact did defer a bit to
Day-Lewis and Michelle Pfeiffer.  He mentioned that in the time between
leaving their dress rooms and arriving on set, a transformation had
occurred, that he began to believe his actors were the very parts they
were playing, that he began to speak to them in hushed Whartonian
tones.  If Day-Lewis wallows in it too much, Pfeiffer keeps her wits
about her and does to us what she didn't quite succeed in doing in
DANGEROUS LIAISONS--get us to believe she belongs in antique
melodrama.  Her voice is the key, I think: it has that slightly pitched
quality that happens to women of leisure, women who resign, though
maybe not privately accept, that they're chattel to be displayed as
pretty possessions.  Ten years ago, Meryl Streep would have played this
part but her voice, so theatrically calibrated, would have betrayed the
novelist.  (Even if unintentional, Pfeiffer honors Streep by pirating
Sarah Woodruff's curly do.)  Olenska has a bit of Wharton in her, in
that the novelist was likewise strapped by a loveless marriage, and in
Olenska is a homage to one of James' leading ladies in THE
BOSTONIANS--Verena, the young, red-haired feminist spitfire.  But
Pfeiffer borrows from neither: this is her own portrait of a woman
accepting defeat by convention and patronage.  It's a performance built
by mystery; there's no way for us to gauge her inner-feelings about the
events by which she's stoically forced into acquiescence.  (Only once
does the performance lose focus: in a living room, she's smoking but
the cigarette doesn't appear to be lit and when she exhales, no smoke
comes out.)  In DANGEROUS LIAISONS, as the sickly pale-faced Mme. de
Tourvel, enduring medicinal therapies rented from Ken Russell's THE
DEVILS, she seemed nearly out of her league against Glenn Close's
venomous Marquise.  Sublimely controlled as she dons her war paint,
Close out-Sondergaards Gale Sondergaard and not even John Malkovich's
devilishly puffed-up, wantonly vain Vicomte can altogether match her
merciless glaze.  (Wouldn't Close make a fab Madame Ming?)  Next to
John Gielgud, no performer has stolen scenes with more graceful
arrogance and confidence.  As a result, save for a scene or two,
Pfeiffer is just about thrown right out of the picture.  You begin to
feel a strange, unwarranted sympathy for her; you tend to want to
forget she's even in the picture.  She didn't have to do anything in
TEQUILA SUNRISE except look beautiful, and she does, and she gives her
lines a crisp, singular reading.  She did the same in MARRIED TO THE
MOB, aided by the funny Mercedes Ruehl.  Looking sensationally sexy in
THE FABULOUS BAKER BOYS she does a terrific "My Funny Valentine," and
she sure knows how to rummage through her purse for and light up her
Parisian Opals and she does a great slip off her feet into Jeff
Bridges's arms as they're dancing to "Moonglow" on a hotel room
balcony.  (The semi-downer ending, though, makes us ask, "Why
bother?")  I had some sympathy for her in BATMAN RETURNS: in spite of
the trash the costumers put her in, and acknowledging that she has a
wicked whiplash, she's stuck in the horror of one unplayable scene
after another.  How she managed to keep her self-respect is beyond me.
(The most clever thing about that bumme r is the Queen's Coat that the
Penguin wears; when he's walking around the cemetery where his parents
are buried, he looks like something out of a novel by Dickens.)
     Out of Dickens as well, and crossed with Aunt Pittypat from GWTW,
Miriam Margolyes gives the audience its best laugh as moneybags Mrs.
Manson Mingott.  Unfortunately looking none too well, the late Alexis
Smith is New York's numero uno grand dame.  Had she been aided by the
right kind of and more sensitive makeup artist, she'd have passed for
Wharton.  (This small part quite a contrast to Miss Smith's last TV
role--as Rebecca's former school teacher who still has enough sexual
power to charge Sam's batteries in CHEERS.)  Chubby in the face, Mary
Beth Hurt is nearly unrecognizable as Mrs. Beaufort.  As her
philandering cad of a husband, Stuart Wilson could be doing a tribute
to Rod Steiger's Komarovsky from DOCTOR ZHIVAGO And it takes a while to
get our bearings and recognize him and remember when last we might have
seen him: as Major Clark, who impregnates Sarah Layton, in THE JEWEL IN
THE CROWN.  Last, but not least (because of the rest of the supporting
cast is very good), there's Winona Ryder.  The breathless May will only
succeed if Ryder can pull off the coup de theatre.  If we hate the
character for doing it, whether we know it's coming or not, then Ryder
can only be applauded.  The act is not only one of desperation, but the
pinnacle of despised entrapment.
     In MAUGHAM, biographer Ted Morgan writes that W. Somerset "was
exasperated by the rightness and exactness of everything Edith Wharton
said." He was particularly out of joint by her usage of the word "no,"
for he "had never heard a more frigid syllable of disapproval." Maugham
snarled, "Her manner was that of a woman to whom a man has made
proposals offensive to her modesty, but which good breeding tells her
it will be more dignified to ignore than to make a scene about."
Indeed, the very essence of Wharton as social prisoner and writer: she
was on the side of the expression of love and sex but never had much
guts to engage in either.  Perhaps Wharton was poisoned by her mother's
frigidity, which might also have helped make her the anti-feminist she
appeared to be, in that she opposed education of women for high
professions, didn't exercise her right to vote, nor bothered to invite
other women to social parties she threw.  Maybe she was further
poisoned by her supposed love affair with bisexual Morton Fullerton.
(A recent biographer suggests Wharton was both homophobic and
anti-Semitic, an d disapproved of such writers as Joyce and Lawrence;
one wonders if she was truly aware of Henry James' predilections.) It's
this Victorian vengeance in her writing that's regretful and sad--and
painful for audiences watching AGE:  she's compulsive about punishing
her fictional lovers.  (She punished them in ETHAN FROME, too.)
Scorsese caught this, but he didn't do it alone: TIME critic Jay Cocks
ferreted out the Wharton upbraidings and helped shape them into a
screenplay that not only envenoms denied passions but also exalts the
power of words.  This is what's surprisingly wonderful about the
movie:  in the past we've come to expect that we're going to get
short-changed when moviemakers bring the classics to screen--images
over words or vice versa, debatable truncation.  It's thrilling to not
only hear the text captured with this much respect, but to see the
images come close to matching the era is almost unnerving: included are
reel life versions of Georges Seurat's "A Sunday Afternoon on the
Island of La Grande Jatte" and winter scenes by Richard Hartmann and
Childe Hassam.  And there's a happy marriage of editing and text:
Thelma Schoonmaker (who gets her name plastered as an advertisement
within the movie) lays on montages of messages and invitations that
enhance the art of personal writing.  (Experts in communication
believed that on-line services might resurrect this art form; it turns
out that e-mail & uploads have degenerated into "it sucks" brevity.)
THE AGE OF INNOCENCE is so respectful of Wharton that her running
commentary is voiced over by Joanne Woodward, caught as if
parenthetical privacies whispered for our ears only.  The only damn
thing wrong with this feast is that after it ended, I felt like
sneaking into a Weight Watchers meeting.

Title
Review for Shadowlands (1993)
The greater astonishment in Richard Attenborough's SHADOWLANDS isn't that
Anthony Hopkins, as C.S. Lewis, the triple threat writer of highly admired
Christian apologetics, Christian-based science fiction and children's
fantasy, could deliver the kind of performance he does, but that he did.
As a recovering alcoholic, Hopkins has been able to support his growing
repertoire in the last several years because, like his characters in THE
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS, HOWARDS END, the megabore REMAINS OF THE DAY, he's
been checking in his inner-most feelings at the door; he hasn't been
called upon by his sponsor to feel his way through his internal conflicts.
These meticulous examples of repression hint he's pent-up by the huge
reserves of boozeless energy, that it's inevitable he'd finally burst, as
he does so movingly here in SHAOWLANDS. This is a performance long coming
-- the kind of self-exposure of an actor as real person connecting with
the audience that often the bottle (or drug) keeps from us, the unmasking
American William Hurt has yet to achieve, even though he's been sober for
more than a few years. Ex-lushes and ex-addicts can go on to become better
actors, as we've seen with Dennis Hopper, Richard Dreyfuss, and now
Hopkins. (Or better songwriters and singers, as with Elton John and Bonnie
Raitt.) But sometimes they don't; there's that "edge" they lose, and Hurt,
at this writing, seems to be unable to regain it. Naturally, a boozing
actor has edge pouring into him, his potency based on his bottle's proof.
Whatever it was he was on during CHILDREN OF A LESSER GOD, and he was a
holy terror on the set, he got closer to the audience than he ever had,
and as something he probably isn't much of -- a romantic. (At core is that
he may have felt he needed the bottle to reach us.) On the wagon in
ROADCAST NEWS and THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST, he's lulled out, a member of the
"Living Dead." Maybe he's been hobbling as a sober actor, in much the same
way Richard Pryor did as comic, because they're looking back for the old,
sloshed verge that they can no longer find in themselves. With Hopper,
Dreyfuss, and assuredly with Hopkins, they've managed to overcome their
long, wasted agitation, they've gotten back on track by moving ahead in
their art -- surrendering to it as their fix. (In A.A., there's a rather
dramatic pretense in looking for a "higher power" to help overcome one's
addiction, but once he quietly finds it, and it's usually within one's
self, he discovers that he's replaced the bad addiction with a healthier
one.) Even in the plodding REMAINS OF THE DAY, Hopkins is on the high of
acting: in his adroit rigidity, you can see that he's flying. The problem
is that only he's enjoying himself, while many of us are languishing
through the one-note boredom. 
        This sort of monotony is nowhere to be found in Hopkins' C.S.
Lewis, a role which could easily become sanctimonious, sticky. Or worse,
it could have been a Malcolm Muggeridge bliss-out. Born in Belfast,
educated at Oxford University, accepted there as a fellow after graduating
with degrees in Greek and Latin literature, philosophy and ancient history
(even conquered the Greek language), Lewis was only 38 when his "Allegory
of Love: A Study in Medieval Tradition," about love as a central theme in
the literature of the Middle Ages, established his reputation within the
intelligentsia. His career as an author actually began a bit earlier, when
his two books of poetry, "Spirits in Bondage: A Cycle of Lyrics" and
"Dymer" were published under the pseudonym Clive Hamilton. It wasn't until
Lewis turned Christian science fiction writer, with the classic "Out of
the Silent Planet" in 1938, that he reached a larger audience: eventually
to be known as the Perelandra Trilogy ("Perelandra" and "That Hideous
Strength" the other two), the initial story is about a planet -- our own
-- that is silent because it has fallen from the grace of God. Critics
called it "a fusion of science fiction, fantasy and allegory.
Unprecedented." Early into Lewis's youthful rebellion, he was a practicing
non-believer, brought on by the premature death of his mother from cancer
when he was a little boy, and reinforced by an atheist Scottish
schoolmaster and Lewis's own formidable education at Oxford. While details
of his conversion are discussed in his poignantly titled autobiography
"Surprised by Joy," the most important also seems the most simple: through
logic and reasoning, he believed common sense dictated a fourth dimension
-- God. It made sense to believe in the comfort of hope that something or
someone awaits us after death than conceding to the sterility, the
nothingness of disbelief. By 1944, in "Beyond Personality," he was penning
embracing defenses of Christianity -- to his own surprise, admired by
agnostics and atheists alike -- and he became so popular that the BBC gave
him time to lecture over the radio during World War II. Two more
collections of his essays followed: "Miracles" in 1947, and "Mere
Christianity" in 1952. Considered by some his best novel, 1942's "The
Screwtape Letters" is a sardonic tale set in W.W.II about a devil -- an
Undersecretary of the Infernal Lowerarchy -- teaching his nephew the ways
and means of temptation. Lewis wasn't particularly happy that he became
famous after the book's publication because he thought some of his other
books were more worthy. But the public was much impressed by his fluency
with the language and, most of all, his unbounded imagination -- given
encouragement by the Inklings, a group he formed with J.R.R. Tolkien who
would gather to read manuscripts in progress. To Lewis's chagrin, only
"Allegory" had the captivating, if not show-off effects of creative word
play, while his other scholarly, syncretic nonfiction works, of which
there are close to three dozen, were staid, formal, lacking no shortage of
his customary erudition but stylish mode. His most loved and widely-read
work is of course his series of children's books known as The Chronicles
of Narnia, the first entitled "The Lion, the Witch and the Wardrobe," and
printed in 1950, and six more that followed at yearly intervals. (The
attics so prevalent in these writings come right out of Lewis's and his
brother's childhood. And regardless of their long friendship, and his own
devotion to Roman Catholicism, Tolkien found the "Narnia" books too
simple, too Christian.) Throughout these years, Lewis remained single, and
with less than a handful of encounters that may or may not have resulted
in sexual activity, voluntarily celibate. He would have most likely
remained a bachelor had not one day an American poet-fan asked to meet
him. Lewis died from a heart attack (after a long bout with heart and
kidney problems) in 1963, on the very day John Kennedy was assassinated
and Aldous Huxley succumbed to a drug overdose.
        Despite the briefest of ipse dixit  -- "Pain is God's megaphone to
rouse a deaf world" -- that suggests screenwriter William Nicholson is
deficient in selecting the more appealing of Lewis' championship of
Christianity, Hopkins gets us to respond to him quickly: we admire that in
his mild case of fear of the sensuous, he manages to wear his slight
superiority, exasperation and wariness not on his sleeve but his
Oxford-Cambridge robe, or more fitting, his vestment. This difference is
integral to our acceptance: while he's fully capable of slicing away his
opponents' arguments or snobbishness or his students' indifference,
because this Lewis carries the aura of the presumptively profound, his own
life looks to be filled with tentativeness, not sure he can commit himself
to anything or anyone other than Godly verbiage. And not exactly sure why:
he recognizes, perhaps even regrets, that he's explored the dogma of
Christianity more fervently than living his own life. This is set up for
us as Hopkins' Lewis is awaiting, anxiously, to meet this fan, played by
Debra Winger: when she calls out his name, the look on his face is
priceless; it's not just Winger's lack of protocol that gets his
butterflies a'flying. Others have written that this is what makes Hopkins'
performance something like a mirror image of his butler in REMAINS. Maybe,
if one believes there's something meaningful underneath the butler's
devotion to servitude. Accidental, REMAINS is like a George Bush movie, in
which a servant can't empathize with or respond to the social fabric,
while SHAOWLANDS, minus the sexsations, is Clintonesque in its healthy
male largesse.
        More in HOWARDS ENDS than in REMAINS and SHAWDOWLANDS, Hopkins
draws forth the late Richard Burton, his fellow and deeply missed
Welshman. (Burton was born in Pontrhydfen, Hopkins in Port Talbot.) In
HOWARDS ENDS and SHADOWLANDS he at times unerringly sounds like Burton,
and there's a fraction of physical resemblance, though not quite as
dislocating as how Hopkins can sometimes bring to mind William F. Buckley.
(Should please Buckley, in that, when he would have to come to frequent
bailout of his own and his friends' often inexcusable public behavior --
like his against Gore Vidal, like Patricia Bozell's assault on feminist
Ti-Grace Atkinson at Catholic University in 1970 -- he'd cite Lewis as
defense: "The higher the stakes, the greater the temptation to lose your
temper.") There's talk that Hopkins is the long-sought heir to the throne
Olivier built, the one Burton might have ascended to had he not given in
to the bottle and his ruinous relationship with Elizabeth Taylor. Such
high glory excludes Sir John Gielgud, who's no slouch. Since THE SILENCE
OF THE LAMBS, there's evidence that Hopkins is the heir-apparent. As
Hannibal Lecter, Hopkins is in but a handful of scenes, yet he dominates
the movie. His star performance is a model of minimalist actions but he
achieves near-maximum effects: he chills the hell out of you while giving
you the movie's the best laughs. Though LAMBS isn't much more than a
supremely efficient TIGHTROPE from a woman's point of view, we're always
thinking about Hopkins: when he too cleverly escapes, we just know that
he's going to pop up for some munchies. When the climax fades, all we can
think about it is Where's Hannibal? Then Jodie Foster gets a call, and,
for some sick reason best left unexplored, we're happy to hear from him.
Hopkins tells her to forget tracing the call, he won't be on the line long
enough because "I'm having an old friend for dinner." Serenely horrifying
as it is, it's nevertheless a spectacular moment of recovery: when was the
last time we left a theatre doubled up over a cannibal? It's highly
immoral, it unhinges our sensibilities, at least what's left of them these
days.
        Debra Winger, well, she's dying -- again. That would otherwise be
enough to keep away from SHADOWLANDS. Early on, with an on again/off again
urban New York accent, Winger's a bit of Streisand doing a lettered OWL
AND THE PUSSYCAT, and Nicholson's screenplay provides her with some snap
and crackle with Hopkins and another don but nothing quite pops. She's not
likable physically at first, either: she has a sometimes near-Eleanor
Roosevelt-Oxford-Shoes clop and an unnecessarily ugly, color-blind
wardrobe, and if there's a straightforward charm somewhere that finds
certain critics' weak spots, these two "attributes" come close to killing
it, and, in what has become trademark, she seems to think it's okay for us
to watch her trying to find her way into the character. I admit I'm rarely
in Winger's corner, having always been cool towards her because I can't
get passed the flashing signals that warn "Don't bother me." In AN OFFICER
AND A GENTLEMAN, she came close to turning into both Elizabeth Ashley and
Lesley Ann Warren. Only the crazed would say anything about the childish
URBAN COWBOY. She was most plainly annoyed during TERMS OF ENDURANCE and
as consequence plagued herself with misplaced glances and gestures and
only once does her very angry-busy work succeed -- her "Oh, brother!"
contempt for the wireless phone someone hands her. (Who could play those
New York restaurant and in-your-dying-honor party scenes?) She looked at
the beginning of BLACK WIDOW the way she should have at the end of TERMS,
and she's of fair interest in MIKE'S MURDER, a small movie somewhat like
JACK'S BACK that went nowhere because the releasing company hadn't any
faith in it. I still can't figure out EVERYBODY WINS: is the script as
badly written as it exposes itself to be on screen? Winger's an
intelligent enough of an actress to implicitly play the late Jane Bowles
in THE SHELTERING SKY had director Bernardo Bertolucci let her. (Instead
she had to play Florence Nightingale to a male Camille.) Winger manages
more class in her dying moments here in SHADOWLANDS than in TERMS. Yet,
something more is the matter with Winger's portrayal, and it's the
scripter's fault: imagine an intelligent peoples' Fannie Hurst novel about
a fan who, with a little boy in tow, hangers to and eventually does meet a
famous author, even becomes enough of a friend that the author agrees,
when needed, to a marriage of convenience. As if to make up for her
invasion of his domain, and for the fact that she's soon to die of S.C.
(sudden cancer), she leaves him with an unwanted child, whose father is
conveniently a cold-hearted drunk. (Not seen, but perhaps the shadow of
Vera Miles in BACK STREET?) On screen, it's rather the stuff of a Purex
Afternoon Special but in reverse: it's not she who is being tested, but
he, and his faith. It unwittingly becomes Harold Kushner's "When Bad
Things Happen to Good People." 
        What hurts Winger's characterization of Joy Davidman Gresham is
that it's shaped out of insignificance -- there just isn't much there to
make her more than a device to loosen Hopkins' buttoned-up Lewis. For
example, maybe the audience would have wanted to know that Joy, although
only a minor American poet (she won the Yale Series of Younger Poets
contest for a book of verse), was married to American novelist William
Gresham, who wrote NIGHTMARE ALLEY, which was later turned into the 1947
movie starring, in possibly their most entertaining performances, Tyrone
Power and Joan Blondell. (James Agee wrote in Time: "NIGHTMARE ALLEY is a
hair-rasing carnival side show. At the dead end of the alley lives the
Geek, as is-he-man-or-is-he-beast carnival exhibit that tears up and eats
live chickens. He is able to stomach his job because he is in the last
stages of dipsomania. [Power as] Stan is one of the most wholehearted and
resourceful heels yet to leave a print of the U.S. screen. He climbs a
ladder made of ladies.") And why the audience is given only one child when
in fact Joy dragged both her sons to England is not explained -- though
maybe to lessen the audience's taxation fatigue. Reviewers and feature
writers are quoting one son, Douglas Gresham, that though SHAOWLANDS is
"fiction and makes no pretenses about that, the emotional values are
absolutely spot-on accurate." Actually, the movie's not much of a fiction:
Joy, a Jewess who converted to Christianity, a 30s Communist turned 40s
staunch conservative, did travel to meet her idol, the man most
responsible for her conversion. Joy was indeed running away from a bad
marriage to Gresham, who was a womanizer and alcoholic. And she did become
ill -- originally and inaccurately diagnosed with acute rheumatism. Those
who knew both Lewis and Joy saw that a relationship beyond correspondence
and before marriage was already building, though painfully slowly. When
England's Home Office did not want to renew her permit of residence,
Lewis, perhaps more out of genuine charity as opposed to budding love,
agreed to a civil marriage in order to automatically grant citizenship to
her and her two sons. Joy's illness turned grave shortly afterwards, and
the bonds between her and Lewis strengthened considerably, to the point
that Lewis decided to offer his hand in a religious ceremony of marriage.
Abundant love, positive thinking and radiation provided Joy with a
remission, and for a few years the marriage had a "honeymoon" flavor to
it. Unfortunately, the movie doesn't give us a real extent of time. What
we get are transitions: first, a fall, second, radiation, third,
wheelchairs, and fourth, stretchers, putting the audience into a
get-ready-with-the-hankies mood. It's gonna be LOVE STORY -- Oxford Style.
There's also an inconsideration of Joy's kiss off -- when the tears come,
all eyes are on Hopkins. However, when he and little Douglas (played by
Joseph Mazzello, who recalls Nicholas Gledhill in CAREFUL, HE MIGHT HEAR
YOU) embrace and release their grief, memories of our own similar
experiences flood in. These scenes takes us where Lewis would never quite
allow us to go; instead, as a gentleman of culture, propriety and
unimpeachable decency, when he did grant a peek into his private anguish,
in "A Grief Observed," he could only do it under a pseudonym: N.W. Clerk.
        Richard Attenborough is a dependable craftsman as movie maker and
he's dignified, making sure we maintain our own dignity as well. I wish
that he were more like Fred Zinnemann, the master who recognized a good
story when he read one and knew how to make it into a better movie.
Referring not only to FROM HERE TO ETERNITY but also to THE NUN'S STORY,
in which Audrey Hepburn's a triumph, to the almost forgotten THE
SUNDOWNERS, with Robert Mitchum and Deborah Kerr doing what Mitchum
fantasized about doing in HEAVEN KNOWS, MR. ALLISON and to the
smooth-as-glass THE DAY OF THE JACKAL. Attenborough could use Zinnemann's
talents to plug his stories' gaps and holes; for example, in GANDHI he
needed an audience decoder -- a Lord Mountbatten, say -- to help sort out
all the complex political actions. (Luckily he had Ben Kingsley as his one
asset, and Oh, what an asset. We watch in complete amazement this
wafer-thin bronze elf and believe in the magic he wields against a very
traditional piece of epic movie-making; he's the biggest little exhibition
of the 80s.) Attenborough's intentions in CRY FREEDOM seem to be that he's
against apartheid, yet the movie isn't so much about blacks attempting to
free themselves from the oppressive South African white rule as it is
about a South African white fleeing from what he might have inadvertently
helped sanction. (Though it was fun to listen to Kevin Kline fake the
Britishspeak.) Recently, I think in an interview with Larry King, Barbra
Streisand said she was offered SHADOWLANDS to direct, and how one regrets
she didn't: like Zinnemann, she'd have insisted on fleshing out details
and make steady the wobbling of Winger's Joy, as well as discipline the
actress's needless, perpetual choler, misplaced here but used terrifically
for TNT's concert version of THE WIZARD OF OZ, in which she plays the
wicked witch. SHADOWLANDS might have been "The Fan Who Would Be Joy" -- if
only Winger had shown any.
